Policy (White Paper on Science and Technology, No. 5) 
<DATE1>  8 April 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     Selections from the Guide to China's Science and Technology </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Selections from the Guide to China's Science and Technology </PHRASE></F></HT>
  Policy (White Paper on Science and Technology, No. 5) 

<F P=102> 93FE0870A Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE JISHU ZHENGCE ZHINAN [GUIDE 
TO CHINA'S SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY] in Chinese No 5, Jun </F>

92 pp 1-202 
<F P=103> 93FE0870A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO KEXUE JISHU ZHENGCE ZHINAN [GUIDE 
TO CHINA'S SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY POLICY] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Book by the State Science and Technology Commission: ``A </F>
Guide to China's Science and Technology Policy (White Paper on 
Science and Technology, No. 5)''] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Preface </H5>
  [Text] The ``State Medium and Long-Term Science and 
Technology 
Development Program'' issued by the State Council and the 
``Medium and Long-Term Science and Technology Program'' and 
``People's Republic of China Science and Technology Development 
10-Year Program and Eighth Five-Year Plan Outline'' approved by 
the State Council and issued by the State Science and Technology 
Commission are program documents to guide the development of 
science and technology in China over the next several decades, 
and they have major significance for spurring S&amp;T progress in 
China and coordinated development of our S&amp;T progress and 
society. The China Science and Technology White Paper No. 5 is 
being published in a special edition to enable leading cadres at 
all levels, S&amp;T workers, and all our people to study, adhere 
to, 
and implement, and it also provides conveniences for foreign 
readers concerned with China's S&amp;T activities. 
  The ``Program'' adopts comrade Deng Xiaoping's philosophical 
idea that S&amp;T are the first force of production, is based on 
the 
requirement of the basic line of ``one center, two basic 
points'', adheres to the strategic principle that ``economic 
construction must rely on S&amp;T, S&amp;T work must be oriented 
toward 
economic construction'', and formulates the tasks for S&amp;T 
that 
must be completed to achieve our second and third strategic 
objectives for China's economic construction, the directions and 
foci of work in all realms, and the policy measures that must be 
adopted. A prominent direction and policy aspects, observance of 
the characteristics and laws of the development of S&amp;T 
themselves, and responding to the historical tide of reform and 
opening up are the obvious characteristics of the ``Program''. 
  In the course of history in moving toward the 21st century, 
whether or not China will be able to achieve a quadrupling [of 
our gross value of industrial and agricultural output] and 
attain relative prosperity will be determined to a substantial 
degree by successful reform and S&amp;T progress and by whether 
or 
not S&amp;T truly play a first-place transforming role in our 
economic and social development. Striving to complete the tasks 
set forth in the ``Program'' is an important guarantee for 
achieving China's overall modernization and construction 
objectives through the end of this century and into the next one. 
  S&amp;T work in the 1990s must continue adhering to the 
principle 
of ``orienting and relying'' and further perfect the three-level 
deployment of orienting toward the main battlefield of economic 
construction, developing high and new technology and its 
industry, and reinforcing basic research. Every level must 
strive to scale the peaks of S&amp;T and spur the development of 
our 
economy and society. 
  We must stabilize and reinforce basic research and ``attacks 
on key problems'', high-tech research, primary social public 
welfare research, and so on which have important strategic 
importance for the sustained development of China's S&amp;T and 
economy. We must maintain a crack research force that it is 
involved in this work and adopt solid measures to provide 
guarantees in capital, equipment, materials, and other areas. In 
particular, we must give powerful support to the state's major 
basic research projects and key laboratories. 
  For other S&amp;T work, including technology development, 
social 
services, and other realms, we must boldly open up and 
invigorate, guide and encourage S&amp;T personnel engaged in this 
work to be brave in orienting toward the economy and advancing 
toward commercialization, industrialization and 
internationalization of S&amp;T achievements. All scientific 
research organs and institutions of higher education should 
separate out a substantial portion of their skilled personnel to 
become involved in converting S&amp;T achievements into practical 
forces of production, go into the domestic and foreign markets 
to give full play to their abilities, foster their intelligence 
and skills on the main battlefields of economic construction, 
and make direct contributions to modernization and construction. 
In summary, we must use solid efforts to gradually perfect 
organic integration of S&amp;T and the economy, adapt to the new 
mechanisms and new systems of the socialist market economy, and 
liberate and develop S&amp;T as the first force of production to 
the 
greatest possible extent. 
  Guided by the spirit of comrade Deng Xiaoping's important 
speeches and the CPC Central Committee Politburo conferences and 
based on the blueprint drawn in the ``Program'', China's S&amp;T 
activities must change with every passing day, majestically, 
vastly, and mightily press forward, and propel China's economic 
construction toward a new stage. 
  State Council Member and State Science and Technology 
Commission Chairman 
  Song Jian 24 June 1992 
<H5>  Notice from the State Council Regarding Its Passing Down of </H5>
the ``State Medium- and Long-Term Science and Technology 
Development Program'' 
  State Council Document No. 18 (1992) 
  To the people's governments of all provinces, autonomous 
regions, and municipalities directly under the central 
government, all ministries and commissions of the State Council, 
and all organizations under its direct jurisdiction: 
  The ``State Medium- and Long-Term Science and Technology 
Development Program'' has been considered and passed by the 94th 
meeting of Standing Committee of the State Council and is now 
being issued to you. Please implement it. 
  The ``Medium- and Long-Term Science and Technology 
Development Program'' and ``People's Republic of China Science 
and Technology Development 10-Year Program and Eighth 5-Year 
Plan Outline'' have been agreed to in principle and will be 
issued under another number by the State Science and Technology 
Commission. 
  The State Council 8 March 1992 
<H5>  State Medium and Long Term Science and Technology </H5>
Development Program 
  As human society looks forward to the new century, the world 
is undergoing enormous changes. A new scientific and 
technological revolution is developing in a surging manner, 
market competition is growing more intense every day, 
international politics is changing, and our nation and people 
are facing an urgent and serious challenge. To achieve our 
second strategic objective in the year 2000 and thereby move 
into the ranks of the moderately developed countries during the 
middle of the next century, we must adhere to the four basic 
principles, continue to reform and open up, and rely on S&amp;T 
progress to accelerate development of our economy and society. 
This is a magnificent and arduous task and concerns the future 
of our country and the fate of socialism. 
  This program was formulated in accordance with the spirit of 
decisions made by the 13th National Conference of the Communist 
Party of China and subsequent meetings of the CPC Central 
Committee. Its goal is to clarify the strategies, principles, 
policies, and development foci for the medium and long-term 
development of natural science and technology in China and to 
guide the coordinated development of China's S&amp;T, economy, 
and 
society from 2000 to 2020. 
<H5>  I. Situations and Choices </H5>
  1. Science and technology are the first force of production 
and a magnificent revolutionary force that spurs economic and 
social development. Under the superior socialist system, S&amp;T 
progress and improvement in management levels will play decisive 
roles in the course of China's modernization and construction. 
Shifting economic construction further onto the track of relying 
on S&amp;T progress and improving the quality of laborers will 
guarantee the victorious achievement of China's second strategic 
objective and lay a solid foundation for achieving our third 
strategic objective. Based on the strategic three-step 
deployment of China's economic construction and in accordance 
with the trends and currents of international S&amp;T 
development, 
making comprehensive arrangements for the development of science 
and technology for the next 10 to 30 years is an important 
historical task. 
  2. In the past 40 years, China's S&amp;T activities have 
made 
world-famous achievements. China now has 10.9 million natural 
science and technology personnel including 1.05 million who are 
involved in research and development. We have over 5,000 
independent research and development organs and there are over 
7,000 R&amp;D organs under the jurisdiction of enterprises. They 
have formed a relatively complete S&amp;T system that has made 
several world-recognized major S&amp;T achievements. China has 
relied mainly on its own forces to solve many important S&amp;T 
problems in economic construction, national defense, and social 
development. This is particularly true of the past 10-plus years 
of reform and opening up when China has readjusted its S&amp;T 
development principles and made breakthrough advances in reform 
of the S&amp;T system, organizing attacks on key S&amp;T 
problems, 
extending S&amp;T achievements, spurring S&amp;T progress in 
rural 
areas, promoting development of high and new-tech industry, 
strengthening international S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges, 
and 
other areas. 
  3. During the course of developing S&amp;T work for more 
than 40 
years, we have accumulated rich experience and many lessons. 
  Our main experiences are: One, S&amp;T work must adhere to 
leadership of the Communist Party and to the socialist road. 
Two, adhere to reform and opening up. While perfecting planned 
management, we have strengthened the role of market regulation, 
accelerated the transfer of S&amp;T achievements into production, 
and promoted the integration of S&amp;T with the economy; on the 
basis of independence and making our own decisions, we have 
actively absorbed advanced experiences and S&amp;T achievements 
from 
foreign countries and accelerated the development of S&amp;T in 
China. Three, under the unified leadership of the state, we have 
concentrated manpower and materials to organize attacks on major 
S&amp;T tasks in national economic construction and social 
development. Four, while fostering the backbone role of our 
specialized S&amp;T staff, we have been concerned with 
integrating 
specialized scientific research work and mass technical 
innovation and integrating leading cadres with S&amp;T personnel, 
workers, and peasants to jointly spur application of S&amp;T 
achievements and popularization of S&amp;T knowledge and improve 
the 
scientific and cultural quality of all nationalities. 
  Our main lessons are: One, the guiding ideology and actual 
work in economic and social development have not always put 
promotion of S&amp;T progress in an important strategic position. 
Two, economic development lacks mechanisms and internal motive 
force for relying on S&amp;T progress, S&amp;T development lacks 
vitality in orienting toward economic construction, and large 
numbers of technical achievements cannot be converted into 
forces of production, which has resulted in a certain degree of 
detachment of S&amp;T from economic and social development and an 
inability to fully foster the potential of science and 
technology. Third, in S&amp;T work, there is a lack of unified 
arrangements and a rational division of labor as well as the 
universal existence of repeated problems at low levels; the 
phenomena of detachment from our national conditions, blindly 
pushing forward and catching up, and pressing urgently for 
achievements have also occurred at times. Four, major errors 
have occurred in policies toward intellectuals that have damaged 
the initiative and creativity of S&amp;T personnel and affected 
the 
healthy growth of our S&amp;T staff. A social climate of 
respecting 
knowledge and respecting skilled personnel has not been formed. 
  4. S&amp;T work must be oriented toward modernization, 
toward the 
world, and toward the future. Today's new S&amp;T revolution 
that is 
developing in a burgeoning manner in the world has caused 
S&amp;T to 
permeate every realm of human society in an unprecedented way, 
which has spurred an enormous takeoff of the social forces of 
production and engendered profound changes in the configuration 
of the world. The degree to which economic and social 
development in each country is dependent on S&amp;T progress is 
increasing. Overlapping and intersection of basic research, 
applied research, and technology development has appeared, 
schedules for converting technical achievements into commodity 
production have continually shortened, and the relationships 
among S&amp;T, education, and production are becoming closer. 
  Looking toward the world's S&amp;T development over the 
next 10 
to 30 years, major breakthroughs will happen in several emerging 
S&amp;T fields and new production technologies and new 
understandings of natural phenomena will have profound impacts 
on the development of human society. The development of high and 
new technology will further transform the face of existing 
industry and become a major factor in world economic 
competition. The world's economic development and S&amp;T 
progress 
are now moving toward internationalization and S&amp;T 
competition 
is increasingly becoming a decisive factor in international 
economic competition. At the same time, mankind must strengthen 
international cooperation to solve global problems like 
population, the environment, resources, disasters, and so on 
that it faces in common. No country can achieve modernization in 
a closed state. 
  5. China's S&amp;T development must begin with our national 
conditions. China has a large population, a weak foundation, and 
underdeveloped social forces of production. Some 80 percent of 
our population lives in rural areas, and we will remain in the 
initial stages of socialism for a rather long period of history 
into the future. China's economic and social development is 
facing restrictions by our population, resources, environment, 
and other factors. Our population has already surpassed 1.1 
billion, and even if we strictly control its rate of growth it 
will still grow to 1.5 billion by the 2020's. Although China has 
rather abundant total amounts of most resources, they are 
relatively insufficient in terms of per capita amounts of 
resources. Compared to the world average, we have one-third the 
per capita cultivated land area, one-fourth the freshwater 
resources, one-fifth the afforested area, and only one-half the 
energy resources. Environmental pollution and ecological 
destruction already constitute serious threats to our economic 
and social development. 
  For a long time, China has been relying on the consumption 
of 
large amounts of resources to develop our economy. Technologies 
and management in most industries are backward, the quality of 
products is poor, and economic results are low. China is one of 
the world's nations having the highest amount of energy consumed 
per unit value of output, and social labor productivity is 
equivalent to only about 5 percent of advanced world levels. In 
the final analysis, these discrepancies are discrepancies in 
S&amp;T 
levels, educational levels, and management levels. If we still 
lack a sense of crisis and urgency and do not do everything we 
can to catch up, the discrepancies will not shrink, and they may 
even expand. The objectives of China's socialist modernization 
and construction will be in danger of falling through and we 
will not have the place in the world that we should have. 
  6. The key to modernizing our national economy and 
significantly raising labor productivity is modernization of 
science and technology. We must certainly foster to the greatest 
possible extent the role of S&amp;T as the first force of 
production, respect knowledge and skilled personnel, and more 
consciously shift economic construction onto the track of 
relying on S&amp;T progress and improving the quality of 
laborers. 
This important decision is an indication of an historical change 
in China's S&amp;T, economic, and social development strategies 
and 
is important for achieving our goals of struggle for the 
remainder of this century and into the next one. 
  Looking toward the future, we must have a sober 
understanding 
of the serious situation, look more toward the favorable 
factors, and confidently meet the challenge. We now have 
substantial S&amp;T forces that have gained many successful 
experiences. Even more important is that 10 years of reform and 
opening up have brought vigor and vitality to our economic and 
S&amp;T development. If we just conscientiously adhere to the 
party's basic lines, fully foster the role of S&amp;T as the 
first 
force of production, inspire enthusiasm, and unite in struggle, 
we can certainly accelerate the development of the social forces 
of production, throw off our poverty and backwardness, and 
achieve our magnificent goal of modernization to fully 
illustrate the superiority of the socialist system. 
<H5>  II. Strategies and Principles </H5>
  7. China's basic S&amp;T development strategy is to 
strengthen 
consciousness of science and technology in our entire nation, 
improve the quality of workers, mobilize and attract a large 
part of our S&amp;T forces to throw themselves into the main 
battlefields of national economic construction, focus on 
technological innovation, strive to absorb and quickly apply the 
world's advanced appropriate technology, and accelerate 
technical upgrading in every realm of our national economy. For 
a substantial period of time into the future, the main direction 
in the development of S&amp;T must be modernizing industrial 
technology and equipment for large scale production and at the 
same time developing high and new technology and its industry in 
a planned and focused manner, stably reinforcing basic research, 
and increasing scientific reserves. 
  8. The strategic objectives for China's S&amp;T development 
must 
be based on the state's economic and social development 
objectives and deployments, apply modern S&amp;T to strengthen 
our 
comprehensive national strengths and improve people's living 
standards, focus on solving programs in industrial and 
agricultural large-scale modernized commodity production, and 
effectively control and alleviate population, resource, and 
environmental pressures. In certain S&amp;T fields where China 
has 
an advantage, we must boldly innovate, sustain our development 
momentum, and continue to hold a significant status in the 
world's advanced ranks; make breakthroughs in certain key fields 
in high and new technology and basic research, attain advanced 
world levels, and form some high and new-tech industries able to 
compete internationally. By the year 2000, the main realms of 
China's industry should attain the technical levels of the 
economically developed nations of the 1970's or early 1980's and 
in 2020 they should attain the technical levels of the 
economically developed countries of the early 21st Century to 
reduce our overall lag behind advanced world levels. 
  The development of agricultural S&amp;T must deal properly 
with 
the relationship of application and extension to research and 
development. We must apply appropriate and matching advanced 
technology, make a major effort to develop a commodity economy 
service system with S&amp;T as a pillar, raise technical levels 
in 
agriculture, and promote rational readjustment of industrial 
structures, product mixes, and employment structures in rural 
areas; we must also solidly strengthen agricultural scientific 
research work, make good deployments in depth, and increase 
reserve strengths for agricultural development. We must continue 
implementing the ``Spark'', ``Bumper Harvest'', ``Setting the 
Prairie Ablaze'' and other plans whose overall goal is 
development of our rural economy. 
  The development of industrial S&amp;T should be centered on 
improving economic results and make a major effort to spur 
S&amp;T 
progress in enterprises, especially large and medium-sized 
enterprises. We should focus on applying modern S&amp;T and 
modern 
management technology, and in particular we should use 
electronic and information technology to carry out technical 
upgrading in all industrial departments and raise technical 
levels of machinery and equipment. Conserve energy resources, 
reduce consumption, improve quality, develop product varieties, 
increase labor productivity and the international 
competitiveness of products, optimize the industrial structure 
and product mix, and spur a transition in China's economy from 
high consumption and low results to low consumption and high 
results. 
  Science and technology in the area of social development 
should strengthen R&amp;D in the areas of population, medicine 
and 
public health, social services, basic public facilities, 
environmental and ecological protection, disaster monitoring and 
prevention, and other areas to create an excellent natural and 
social environment for China's people. 
  The development of high and new technology should continue 
adhering to the principle of ``limited objectives, prominent 
foci''. The state should provide focused support for research on 
high and new technologies where major breakthroughs could be 
made and which has broad applications prospects, and make a 
major effort to foster the development of high and new-tech 
industry. We must actively create the conditions and 
conscientiously manage high and new-tech industry development 
zones properly. Spur international cooperation in high and new 
technology and open up markets, expand technology import and 
export trade, take full advantage of international resources, 
and guide high and new-tech industry in taking the route of 
internationalization. Actively promote the ``Plan To Attack Key 
Problems'', ``863 Plan'', ``Torch Plan'', and other high and 
new-tech resource and industrial development plans. Strive to 
make breakthroughs in certain fields and accelerate the course 
of high and new-tech commercialization, industrialization, and 
internationalization. 
  Basic research should respect the development laws of 
science 
itself, reinforce exploration and tracking in certain 
leading-edge fields, and strive to enter advanced international 
ranks. The goal of applied basic research should be solving 
major S&amp;T problems in economic and social development. Basic 
and 
applied basic research should maintain a crack high-level staff 
and the state should give it stable support. We must fully 
foster the role of the Chinese Academy of Sciences and 
institutions of higher education and strengthen coordination and 
cooperation between the two to benefit the training of skilled 
personnel and maintain vitality. 
  The development of national defense science and technology 
should adhere to the principle of shortening battlelines, having 
prominent foci, strengthening scientific research, and echelon 
replacement. Focus R&amp;D on high technologies that play a key 
role 
in improving the performance of key conventional weapons and 
improving our future new military capabilities and on technology 
that lays a solid foundation for national defense S&amp;T 
development; continue developing incisive national defense 
technologies and maintain development momentum. Continue to 
promote the course of modernization of weapons and equipment 
technology, achieve greater development of high-tech 
conventional weapons and effectively maintain our self-defensive 
nuclear deterrent capabilities, reduce our lag behind advanced 
world levels, and attain advanced world levels in certain areas; 
make national defense S&amp;T continue to occupy a first-class 
position in the world's advanced S&amp;T fields. 
  9. Continue adhering to the basic principle that ``economic 
construction must rely on S&amp;T, S&amp;T work must be oriented 
toward 
economic construction'' and promote the coordinated development 
of S&amp;T with our economy and society. While implementing the 
basic principle, we should also be concerned with implementing 
the following guiding principles, which have long-term 
significance: 
  --Firmly adhere to the ideology that S&amp;T are the first 
force 
of production, raise the consciousness of the entire party and 
all people of the importance of science and technology, and 
create a social climate of respect for knowledge and skilled 
personnel. All levels of government should solidly strengthen 
their leadership of S&amp;T work, fully foster the role of 
S&amp;T 
personnel, raise the scientific, democratic, and systematic 
levels of decision making, and create an environment and 
conditions conducive to S&amp;T development. 
  --Adhere to reform and opening up. Science and technology 
must develop in the midst of reform and opening up. Reform of 
the S&amp;T system must be coordinated with reform of the 
economic 
system and reform of the political system. While further 
fostering the roles of competitive mechanisms and the market, we 
must also strengthen the macro regulation and control functions 
and the necessary centralized management measures of the 
government, and apply policy, legal, administrative, economic, 
and other measures to carry out intervention and regulation. 
  --Adhere to the principle of relying on our own efforts and 
integrating doing our own development with importing technology, 
make importing technology from foreign countries and digesting, 
absorbing, and innovating it an important way to accelerate the 
development of China's S&amp;T. 
  --Adhere to the principle of ``let a hundred flowers bloom, 
let a hundred schools of thought contend'', fully foster 
socialist democracy, guarantee academic freedom, and encourage 
exploration and innovation. 
  --Adhere to the principle of integrating improvement with 
popularization and while making deployments in depth for S&amp;T 
development, and make a major effort to undertake mass 
technological innovation activities, strive to popularize 
scientific knowledge, continually improve the scientific 
qualities of workers, and continue the long-term fight against 
ignorance and superstition. 
<H5>  III. Development Foci </H5>
  10. Agricultural S&amp;T. Agriculture is the foundation of 
our 
national economy, and sustained agricultural growth is the 
decisive factor in the long-term stability and coordinated 
development of our entire national economy and concerns the 
overall situation in construction, reform, and social stability. 
Because China's population increases each year and our 
cultivated land area is continually being reduced, there are 
growing shortages of agricultural resources, ecological and 
environmental degradation is continuing, and we cannot adopt 
extensive modes to develop China's agriculture. 
  Thus, we must adhere to the principle of ``using S&amp;T to 
invigorate agriculture''. We should use S&amp;T and modern 
industry 
as a powerful pillar, establish a modernized agricultural 
production technology system, substantially increase land 
utilization rates, labor productivity, and product 
commercialization rates, and shift from traditional agriculture 
to modern intensive agriculture based on modern S&amp;T. 
  The foci of agricultural S&amp;T are: 
  --Effectively protecting and fully using our existing 
cultivated land, orienting toward all our territorial resources, 
and planned upgrading of a large area of moderate and low-yield 
fields. Make a major effort to develop arid and semi-arid 
agricultural technology and water-saving irrigation technology. 
Effectively utilize hilly and mountainous regions, grasslands, 
surface water, and large beach areas with great potential, focus 
on water conservancy construction, prevent soil erosion, protect 
the ecology and environment, and establish a rational 
agriculture, forestry, animal husbandry, sideline production, 
and fishery combined ecology system. 
  --Broaden food sources, develop new protein resources and 
compound feeds. Develop diversified food product production and 
processing technology. Comprehensively utilize all types of 
animal and plant resources, improve the dietary structure of 
urban and rural residents. 
  --Utilize hybrid superiority and genetic engineering 
technology for selective breeding of high-yield, superior 
quality, multi-resistant new animal and plant varieties. Do 
extensive R&amp;D on regional comprehensive matching, mixing, and 
application of fertilizers, water-saving irrigation, and other 
agricultural production technology and breeding technology, 
substantially improve the quality and output of agricultural 
products. 
  --Use modern industrial technology to outfit agriculture and 
township and town enterprises, develop agricultural product 
storage and transportation, preservation, processing, packaging, 
and comprehensive utilization technology, raise rural 
industrialization levels and management levels, lead surplus 
agricultural labor power to move toward developing the rural 
commodity economy. 
  11. Industrial S&amp;T. Industry is the leading factor in 
the 
national economy, and the technical levels, product 
capabilities, and economic results of China's industry determine 
development of our entire economy. China has established a 
preliminary industrial system with a relatively full complement 
of categories. Overall, however, the backward situation of 
industrial technology has still not been fundamentally changed. 
This is manifested primarily in backward equipment, technology, 
and management technology, outdated designs, low mechanization 
and automation levels, and other areas, which has led to poor 
product performance and quality, high consumption of energy 
resources and materials, low economic results, and a lack of 
international competitiveness. 
  For this reason, the primary tasks in industrial S&amp;T 
development are to use modern S&amp;T, especially 
microelectronics 
technology, to carry out technical upgrading in all of China's 
main industrial realms. We must readjust and optimize our 
industrial structure, broadly adopt new technical principles and 
new design methods, replace equipment, technologies, and 
products, open up new manufacturing technology and resource 
extraction technology, raise automation and intelligence levels 
in large-scale production, and raise the levels of moving to 
complete sets of domestic manufacturing, management technology 
levels, and safe production technology levels for advanced 
technical equipment in our primary industries to improve 
economic results, increase product varieties, improve quality, 
and strengthen international competitiveness. 
  --Energy resources are a key factor in spurring development 
of the national economy. The development of energy resource 
S&amp;T 
should adopt the principle of combining development and 
conservation, substantially increase energy resource utilization 
rates, improve structures, and reduce pollution. 
  The focus of energy resource development is resolving 
problems in oil and gas pool exploration and development 
technology in desert zones and offshore areas, and technology to 
improve recovery rates in oil fields; R&amp;D on coal mining, 
utilization, safe production, and coal cleaning technologies; 
development of advanced manufacturing technology for large 
thermal power generators, technology for construction of large 
hydropower stations under complex conditions, and extra-high 
voltage power transmission and distribution technology; R&amp;D 
on 
large advanced nuclear power technology and nuclear safety 
technology; development of economical and appropriate new energy 
resource and rural energy resource technology; and major efforts 
to extend and apply advanced energy conservation technology. 
  --Communication, transportation, and communications are 
important basic facilities and vanguard departments in 
development of our national economy and society. 
  The primary direction for applying S&amp;T to spur the 
development of communication, transportation, and communications 
is: on a foundation of coordinated development of all types of 
transportation technology, substantially increase overall 
transportation efficiency and equipment utilization rates; 
develop advanced communications networks and communication 
technology. 
  The focus of communication and transportation S&amp;T 
development 
is R&amp;D on key technologies for container transportation, 
rapid 
passenger transportation, and other multi-mode integrated 
passenger and freight transportation; accelerate R&amp;D on key 
technologies for heavy load transportation on railroads and 
high-speed dedicated line passenger transportation technology 
for speeds greater than 200 km/hour; research and extend 
high-efficiency energy resource transportation technology; 
develop high-seas transportation and interior river 
transportation systems and key shipbuilding technologies; 
develop technologies for high-speed highways and grades one and 
two dedicated automobile trunk highways and manufacturing high 
efficiency vehicle transportation and key technologies for all 
types of powered vehicles; develop design, manufacturing, and 
batch production technologies for Chinese-made trunkline 
aircraft and strengthen technical research on flight safety; 
make major efforts to extend and apply electronic computers and 
automation technology, raise modernization levels of 
communication and transportation management as quickly as 
possible. 
  The focus of communications S&amp;T development is on 
preferential development of satellite communications and fiber 
optic communications technology; focus on developing digital 
microwave communications and mobile communications technology; 
do R&amp;D on digital program controlled exchange and 
communications 
network technology, and gradually develop comprehensive 
professional digital natural network technology. 
  --The materials industry is a basic industry of our national 
economy. The primary development directions of materials science 
and technology is improving quality, increasing product 
varieties, reducing costs, and alleviating contradictions 
between supply and demand. 
  The focus of materials S&amp;T is reinforcement of energy 
resource development and comprehensive utilization technology 
and doing good exploration, analysis, and comprehensive 
evaluation of mineral deposits; develop advanced mining and 
dressing technology and complete sets of equipment, and research 
on development and comprehensive utilization technologies for 
paragenetic minerals; reinforce research on ferrous and 
non-ferrous metals, organic polymers, and inorganic non-metallic 
materials, and R&amp;D on technologies for transforming the 
properties of traditional materials and new types of materials; 
develop high-grade, specialized, and superior performance 
refined chemical industry products; do R&amp;D on new coal and 
chemical industry technologies and various types of new 
renewable resource recovery and utilization technologies. 
  --Machine building and electronics is the equipment industry 
for our national economy. The performance, quality, efficiency, 
and speed of renewal of machines and electronic equipment 
determine production technology levels and economic results in 
all areas of our national economy. 
  The focus of machine-building and electronics S&amp;T is 
R&amp;D on 
basic components of machinery and key technologies for the 
design, manufacture, and testing of a new generation of 
electronic components for comprehensive improvement of the 
quality and reliability of basic products; develop design and 
manufacturing technology for large complete sets of equipment 
and systems process control technology; develop integrated 
electromechanical products that combine machine and electronics 
technology, develop computer-aided design, manufacturing, and 
testing technology, numerical control technology, and detection 
and sensing technology; and develop and extend electrical and 
electronic energy conservation technology. 
  --The consumer products industry is related to the joys and 
sorrows in the lives of all our people and is extremely 
important, but S&amp;T levels are still relatively backward and 
there is great development potential. 
  Light industry, textiles, clothing, appliances, and other 
consumer product industries should broadly adopt advanced 
electromechanical technology, gradually adopt international 
standards, increase the variety of designs and colors, improve 
product quality, and actively expand exports. 
  12. Science and technology in the area of social 
development. 
Whether or not we can control population growth, improve the 
quality of our population, rationally develop and utilize 
natural resources, and protect the ecology and environment are 
major matters that concern the future of the Chinese nation. 
Solving these problems requires us to carry out comprehensive 
improvement in all areas of government, the economy, society, 
and culture, and we must reinforce research and application of 
S&amp;T in social development. 
  The foci of social development S&amp;T are: 
  --Strengthen scientific research on population, resolutely 
and effectively control the size of our population, make major 
efforts to improve and perfect existing birth control technology 
and methods, and make them safe, convenient, economical, and 
effective. 
  --Reinforce research on the climate and research on 
earthquakes, droughts, and other natural disasters, develop 
disaster relief technology, work quickly to establish natural 
disaster monitoring, assessment, and assistance decision-making 
engineering systems. Use remote sensing technology and systems 
monitoring technology for timely monitoring, prediction, and 
evaluation of the development processes of disaster situations 
to enable measures to be adopted quickly to reduce losses. 
  --Develop all types of high efficiency complete sets of 
technology and equipment to control pollution, and pay special 
attention to solving technical problems in reducing pollution 
from burning coal and develop ecological construction projects; 
do research on the greenhouse effect, acid rain, and ozone layer 
mechanisms and their environmental and physical effects, and 
propose the corresponding countermeasures. 
  --The development of medical and public health S&amp;T 
concerns 
the development of our national economy and the people's 
livelihood and the vitality and development of our nationality. 
They occupy an important status in social development. We must 
fully utilize and develop China's valuable traditional medicines 
and abundant pharmaceutical resources and reinforce research on 
the medicines of our nation; we must strengthen research on 
common diseases, frequently-occurring diseases, and medicine for 
the elderly, and do our own work to develop all types of 
innovative medicines that are of superior quality, highly 
effective, and have few side-effects; reinforce development of 
medical treatment instruments and equipment. 
  --To improve the living environment and residential 
conditions of our people, we must raise technical levels in 
urban and village and town construction programs, structural 
planning, construction, and management; do R&amp;D on economical, 
useful, and advanced structural materials and construction 
equipment, improve the quality and useful functions of urban and 
rural residences, and raise technical levels in social public 
facilities and the service industry. 
  13. High and new technology and high and new-tech industry. 
High and new technology and development of its industry is the 
fountainhead and foundation of sustained development of the 
social forces of production. Research on high and new technology 
must be concerned from the beginning about close integration 
with traditional industry and technical upgrading, make a major 
effort to develop high and new-tech industry development zones, 
and spur commercialization, industrialization, and 
internationalization of high and new technology. Try to make 
breakthroughs in microelectronics, information, biology, new 
materials, aviation and space, automation, new energy resources, 
lasers, oceans, and other fields so that China occupies a 
significant status in the world's high and new-tech realms. 
  The foci of high and new technology development are: 
  --Microelectronics technology and computer technology are 
the 
supporting technologies for modern S&amp;T and national economic 
development. We must concentrate forces to accelerate 
construction of micrometer and sub-micrometer silicon integrated 
circuit design, manufacturing, and testing centers, and do 
research on very large scale integrated circuit production 
technology; develop the associated gallium arsenide integrated 
circuit manufacturing technology and integrated optoelectronic 
technology. We must make a major effort to develop 
general-purpose super-high performance parallel computers and 
software engineering and commercialize their production. We 
should study a new generation of computer technology and develop 
Chinese language information processing technology, man-machine 
interface technology, and artificial intelligence technology. Do 
R&amp;D on flexible manufacturing systems technology, robot 
technology, and computer integrated manufacturing systems 
technology. 
  --The development of biotechnology opens up new routes for 
mankind's industrial and agricultural production and 
development, and it will become an effective measure in the 
world to solve major problems like food, health, resources, the 
environment, and so on. We should focus on research on breeding 
new animal and plant varieties, develop new organic products, 
drugs, and bacteria, and develop microorganic conversion of 
renewable resources and their comprehensive utilization. 
  --New materials technology may lead to breakthrough advances 
in certain technical fields and cause fundamental changes. We 
should do R&amp;D on composite materials, structural and 
functional 
ceramic materials, non-crystalline materials, superconducting 
materials, optoelectronics materials, and other new materials 
and extend and apply them in a timely manner. 
  --Aerospace technology has far-reaching and major 
significance for reinforcing China's comprehensive national 
strengths and raising S&amp;T levels. We should continue to 
strengthen development and research on space motive power and 
propulsion technology and measurement and control technology, do 
research on manned space technology, and maintain China's 
international status in this field. 
  14. Basic research and applied basic research. Basic 
research 
and applied basic research are the forerunners of new technology 
and new inventions, powerful reserve strengths for S&amp;T and 
economic development, and the cradles of training for S&amp;T 
personnel, and we should give them full consideration. When 
making overall deployments in leading-edge disciplines, we 
should also focus closely on agriculture, energy resources, 
communication and transportation, information, materials, and 
other key strategic realms of national economic development and 
on major questions regarding population, medicine and public 
health, resources, ecology, the environment, natural disasters, 
national security, and so on and undertake multidisciplinary 
comprehensive research. 
  The foci of basic research and applied basic research are: 
  --Strengthen research on condensed state physics, molecular 
biology, chemistry, oceanography, ecology, information science, 
and other leading-edge basic disciplines. In particular, we must 
make breakthroughs in the physical mechanisms of high marginal 
temperature superconductivity. We must strengthen research in 
intersecting fields for physics, life science, materials 
science, energy science, and other disciplines. Reinforce 
research in non-linear mathematics, computational mathematics, 
and large-scale scientific and engineering computing theory and 
methods. 
  --Research in molecular and cellular biology should explore 
basic laws of genetics, differentiation, and development at the 
molecular and cellular levels to provide a theoretical 
foundation for the development of modern biotechnology. 
Reinforce research on chemistry related to life processes. Focus 
on exploring new materials, develop polymer, catalytic, surface, 
and rare earth chemistry; pay attention to research and tracking 
of molecular design, microscopic reaction dynamics, and so on. 
  --The Earth sciences should undertake R&amp;D on the complex 
coupling systems composed of the solid Earth, atmosphere, 
hydrosphere, and biosphere in an integral body to provide basic 
data and a theoretical foundation for solving the state's major 
problems such as resources, energy resources, the environment, 
natural disasters, and so on. Research in ecology should focus 
on establishing systematic synergetic progression and regression 
ecological system mechanisms and optimum artificial systems, and 
so on to make a contribution to improving the environment and 
spurring social development. 
  --Information science should focus on the development 
direction of intelligence, resolve problems in communications, 
computers, automatic control, and other key information 
technologies, and strive to make breakthroughs. 
  --The development of space science should reinforce research 
in basic space science and integrate closely with high 
technology. It should focus on research on physical, chemical, 
and life phenomena under microgravity and overall behavior of 
the solar-terrestrial system. 
  15. National defense science and technology. The development 
of national defense S&amp;T is an important factor in 
guaranteeing 
national security and increasing our comprehensive national 
strengths. The development of China's national defense S&amp;T 
must 
start with the realities of the initial stages of socialism, 
adapt to our strategic deployments for economic construction and 
military strategies for the new era, make overall results the 
center, and integrate traction and technological propulsion, do 
selective tracking, and focus on breakthroughs. 
  --Using advanced national defense S&amp;T to promote the 
development of weapons and equipment and spur the achievement of 
our military strategic objectives in the new era is a key task 
in national defense S&amp;T development. Based on the state's 
financial possibilities, focus on developing weapons and 
equipment systems that will play a major role in improving 
China's military war fighting capabilities and play a 
substantial promoting role in raising S&amp;T levels in our 
national 
defense S&amp;T and the country as a whole. For this reason, we 
must 
strengthen research on key technologies that play important 
roles in the development of these weapons and equipment systems. 
  --Based on the principle of integrating military and 
civilian 
uses, pay full attention to theoretical exploration, strengthen 
leading applied theoretical research, and lay a foundation for 
the sustained and stable development of national defense S&amp;T. 
<H5>  IV. Intensifying Reform, Establishing a New System Conducive </H5>
to Economic Development and S&amp;T Progress 
  16. China's S&amp;T system must be conducive to spurring 
economic 
development and China's economic system must be conducive to 
spurring S&amp;T progress. To further resolve problems of 
integrating S&amp;T and the economy, we must use our prior 
achievements and experience as a foundation and conform to the 
principle of coordination and matching up in continued intensive 
reform. 
  The overall goals in reform of China's S&amp;T system are: 
establish and perfect a new system that conforms to the 
objective laws of S&amp;T development to organically integrate 
with 
and mutually promote S&amp;T and the economy that is adapted to 
the 
socialist planned commodity economy; make S&amp;T work actively 
serve the socialist planned commodity economy, promote the shift 
of economic construction onto the track of relying on S&amp;T 
progress and improving the qualities of laborers, and fully 
foster the role of S&amp;T as the first force of production. 
  The concrete objectives for reform of the S&amp;T system 
are: 
  --Transform the functions of government, form a macro 
S&amp;T 
progress management system that organically integrates direct 
planned management with indirect management, and standardize and 
legalize it. 
  --Reform the S&amp;T personnel management system, create an 
excellent environment that allows skilled personnel to display 
their talents. Establish a socialized service system for S&amp;T 
personnel and S&amp;T activities. 
  --Establish an industrial and rural research and development 
extension and service system that organically integrates R&amp;D 
organs with enterprises and rural areas and that is rationally 
deployed. 
  --Cultivate and establish a socialist market system for 
materials, technology, labor services, information, and so on, 
and create a favorable environment of rational competition for 
S&amp;T development. 
  --Form a diversified S&amp;T investment system composed of 
government, civilian, enterprise, financial, and other areas. 
  --Form an S&amp;T organizational structure that is adapted 
to 
development of the socialist planned commodity economy. 
  Reform of the S&amp;T system should be carried out in 
phases in a 
matching manner based on the objective requirements of economic 
development and S&amp;T progress. Prior to the year 2000, form a 
basic configuration for the new system and afterwards gradually 
perfect it. 
  17. The nucleus of reform of the S&amp;T system is 
establishing 
new operational mechanisms and organically integrating 
perfection of planned management with strengthened market 
regulation, and fully fostering the combined advantages of the 
two. Bring in fair competition, rational personnel, technology, 
and information circulation, guidance by demand, and other 
market mechanisms to make S&amp;T progress become an inherent 
requirement in society's economic activities. Establish the 
corresponding operational mechanisms based on different levels 
and the characteristics of different categories of S&amp;T 
development. 
  Basic research and applied basic research and public 
welfare-type S&amp;T work should have the goals of using 
scientific 
exploration to obtain macroeconomic and social benefits, with 
the state providing sustained and stable financial support. For 
a relatively long period into the future, large comprehensive 
scientific research and important projects to attack key 
technical problems will have to depend mainly on state support 
and planned management. At the same time, the necessary 
competition mechanisms to obtain better investment results 
should be brought in. Technology development and applied 
extension work with direct economic benefits should further 
foster the role of market regulation under guidance by state 
policies. 
  18. Perfect the state's macro S&amp;T management and 
regulation 
and control systems, transfer government's functions, place the 
formulation and implementation of the principles, policies, 
programs, plans, and laws related to S&amp;T development in the 
first position in work, and comprehensively apply legal, policy, 
administrative, and economic measures to spur S&amp;T progress. 
  We must strengthen regulation and control measures, improve 
macro regulation and control capabilities, and reinforce and 
improve state directive-type plan management. At the same time, 
we must gradually expand the scope of guidance-type plans. Open 
up S&amp;T credit, risk investment, and other types of capital 
channels to support S&amp;T development. Encourage technical 
innovation and reinforce and improve S&amp;T award systems. 
Protect 
intellectual property rights, foster the role of patents, 
promote the commercialization, industrialization, and 
internationalization of technical achievements, and form an 
environment to promote S&amp;T progress. Strengthen standards, 
measurement, and quality supervision work, formulate technical 
standards, perfect the state's quality supervision and assurance 
system. 
  19. As reform of the economic system intensifies, gradually 
make industries and enterprises the primary aspect of technology 
development. We must strengthen the technology absorption and 
self-development capabilities of enterprises, and establish and 
perfect an enterprise technology development and technology 
management system. Use various arrangements to promote 
horizontal integration among enterprises and among enterprises, 
R&amp;D organizations, and institutions of higher education. 
Advocate making large and medium-sized enterprises the backbone 
and superior quality name-brand commodities the dragon's head, 
use integration of scientific research and production to form 
enterprise groups equipped with technology development, 
production, marketing, and service functions, and in particular 
support the development of S&amp;T vanguard-type or 
internationally 
competitive enterprise groups. 
  Reinforcing industrial S&amp;T work is extremely important 
for 
economic development. To conserve resources, concentrate forces, 
and provide better technical support to enterprises, we must 
selectively establish and perfect industrial technology R&amp;D 
centers to assume responsibility for research and development 
tasks for an entire industry's basic general-purpose technology, 
leading-edge technology, comprehensive sets of technology, and 
so on. The industrial technology R&amp;D centers should be 
jointly 
supported by the state, industry, and enterprises, implement 
their own management decisions, and complete tasks assigned to 
them by the state, industry, and enterprises. 
  20. Intensify reform of the rural S&amp;T system. Developing 
China's agriculture requires reliance on S&amp;T, and the state 
should continue to strengthen its support of agricultural 
scientific research and agricultural technology extension work. 
In reform of the S&amp;T system, we must ensure stable growth in 
agricultural S&amp;T spending and sustained development of 
agricultural S&amp;T staffs. We must guide and encourage 
scientific 
research organizations, institutions of higher education, and 
S&amp;T personnel at all levels to match up with local 
governments 
and jointly carry out regional economic and technical R&amp;D. 
The 
state and local areas should support and guide agricultural 
S&amp;T 
organizations at the county level and below to develop into 
independent accounting and comprehensive technology development, 
extension, service, and management entities that implement 
compensated services to reinforce the vitality of agricultural 
S&amp;T extension work. 
  To meet the development needs of the rural commodity 
economy, 
we must use leadership to develop integrated technology, 
agriculture, industry, and trade management entities under a 
variety of ownership systems that use advanced and appropriate 
industrial technology to outfit new types of rural enterprises 
and integrate with a variety of types of specialized peasant 
technical associations to implement full-process commodity 
production services. On the basis of stabilizing the household 
contractual responsibility system linked to output, use 
technical services to form a dual-layer administrative system 
that integrates unification and a division of labor with a 
significant production scale to promote the entry of their 
commodities into the domestic and foreign markets. 
  Adopt all types of flexible and effective arrangements to 
carry out regular technical education and training of peasants 
to train several new types of peasants who understand modern 
technical knowledge. 
  Guide and encourage scientific research organizations, 
institutions of higher education, and vast numbers of S&amp;T 
personnel to go to rural areas to assume contractual 
responsibility and establish township and town enterprises and 
other industries to spur the raising of rural industrial 
structures and technical levels. 
  21. Establish S&amp;T organizational structures adapted to 
development of the socialist planned commodity economy. China's 
R&amp;D organizations should have multiple levels, multiple 
functions, and a variety of ownership systems, and there should 
be ones are oriented toward the entire country as well as ones 
oriented toward industries or local areas; there should be ones 
involved in basic research and applied research as well as ones 
involved in technology development; there should be state-run 
ones as well as collectively-run ones, individually-run ones, 
and so on. The R&amp;D organs of the Chinese Academy of Sciences 
and 
of all departments, institutions of higher education, and large 
backbone enterprises are the main force in China's S&amp;T 
activities and government at all levels should provide them with 
focused support. With the precondition of the public ownership 
system being the main factor, the state should continue to 
encourage and guide the healthy development of civilian-run 
S&amp;T 
organs so they serve as an important supplement to socialist 
S&amp;T 
activities. 
  Based on the requirements of China's economic and social 
development and operational mechanisms for the development of 
S&amp;T at different levels, readjust the organizational 
structure 
of S&amp;T in China. The state provides focused support to some 
R&amp;D 
organs that assume responsibility for basic research, applied 
basic research, public welfare-type S&amp;T work, and important 
comprehensive and long-term scientific research tasks or assume 
responsibility for R&amp;D on general-purpose technology for an 
entire industry. The remaining scientific research units under 
the system of ownership by the whole people, especially the 
large number of technology development-type medium-sized and 
small scientific research organs, should gradually be divided up 
and reorganized based on their own concrete conditions under the 
guidance of state policies and in accordance with market 
regulation mechanisms. Among them, some should develop into 
S&amp;T 
vanguard-type enterprises and provide high and new-tech products 
and services to the domestic and foreign markets; some can 
integrate with enterprises to establish enterprise groups; some 
can enter enterprises and become enterprise technology 
development departments or intermediate testing base areas; some 
can orient toward medium-sized and small enterprises and rural 
areas and become regional or industrial technology development 
and service centers, and so on. 
  22. Gradually establish a socialized management system for 
S&amp;T personnel. Development of the planned commodity economy 
requires rational circulation of S&amp;T personnel within a 
reasonable scope. We must deregulate S&amp;T personnel 
administration, which means carrying out the required skilled 
personnel planned management based on the state's requirements 
and allowing the necessary personnel circulation based on market 
demand for rational combination with the other forces of 
production. Socialization of commodity production and the laws 
of skilled personnel growth require socialization of S&amp;T 
personnel administration. For this reason, we must gradually 
establish and perfect the corresponding S&amp;T personnel 
socialized 
administration system. This is the direction for reform of the 
S&amp;T personnel administration system. To achieve this 
objective, 
we must actively and stably carry out matching reform. 
  We must gradually change the state's centralized management 
model for S&amp;T personnel and open up an S&amp;T labor service 
market 
in a planned manner. Formulate laws to guarantee that S&amp;T 
personnel have some margin for selection of occupations, 
gradually establish an appointment contract system for S&amp;T 
personnel and hiring units that has free bidirectional 
selection, promote the rational circulation of skilled 
personnel, especially high-level skilled S&amp;T personnel, and 
perfect the specialized technical post recruitment system for 
S&amp;T personnel. Based on the principle of distribution 
according 
to work, form a new assignment system and stimulate S&amp;T 
personnel to dedicate themselves to working at their 
professions. Establish a social guarantee system, transfer the 
insurance industry which is currently the responsibility of the 
state to society, and provide unemployment, old-age, medical, 
and injury insurance from society for S&amp;T personnel. Reform 
systems related to household registration, housing, and so on 
and gradually adapt them to the need for personnel circulation. 
This is difficult and complicated work and we must strive to 
carry it out for a long period. 
<H5>  V. Resolutely Opening Up to the Outside World, Actively </H5>
Promoting International S&amp;T Cooperation and Exchanges 
  23. Science and technology are being increasingly recognized 
as the knowledge and wealth of all of mankind. In international 
relations, S&amp;T exchanges are often the vanguard of 
international 
contacts and one of the most stable realms of cooperation. Thus, 
actively promoting international S&amp;T cooperation and 
exchanges 
should be an important long-term principle for China's 
development of its S&amp;T activities. 
  Undertaking international S&amp;T cooperation and exchange 
must 
adhere to the principle of making one's own independent 
decisions and of equality and mutual benefit, and implement the 
policy of opening up to the outside world. Respect international 
S&amp;T cooperation laws and practices, protect intellectual 
property rights. While promoting world S&amp;T progress, 
accelerate 
the raising of China's S&amp;T levels, increase our capabilities 
for 
relying on our own efforts in China's S&amp;T work, and gradually 
form an internationally competitive scientific research and 
technology development and innovation system. 
  24. We must undertake in an omnidirectional manner 
international S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges based on China's 
needs and possibilities. While doing good intergovernmental 
S&amp;T 
cooperation, expand the scope and scale of civilian S&amp;T 
cooperation, and gradually expand the contacts with the outside 
world of enterprises, scientific research organizations, 
institutions of higher education, and civilian S&amp;T 
organizations. In international S&amp;T cooperation, we must have 
good bilateral cooperation and make full use of international 
organizations to undertake multilateral cooperation and 
exchanges. While developing S&amp;T exchanges with the developed 
countries, we should be concerned with strengthening S&amp;T 
cooperation and exchanges with the developing countries. We must 
use S&amp;T exchanges and technology trade as a vanguard to 
promote 
economic and trade cooperation between China and all countries 
of the world. 
  25. Truly doing technology importing and digestion, 
absorption, and innovation work well is a long-term strategic 
measure for accelerating the pace of China's modernization and 
construction. 
  Selection of technologies to import should use the principle 
of adapting to China's requirements and reinforcing our own 
development capabilities to conscientiously do good preparatory 
discussion work. The state must formulate laws, procedures, and 
standards for technology imports, strengthen macro control and 
management, prevent blind importing and redundant importing, and 
focus on protecting intellectual property rights. 
  Technology imports should be integrated with domestic 
attacks 
on key S&amp;T problems and technology trade, focus on importing 
software and key production technology, and be concerned with 
coordinating and matching technology, capital, equipment, 
management, skilled personnel, and the market. 
  The state should use legislation to ensure capital channels 
for digesting, absorbing, and innovating imported technology and 
guarantee that scientific research organs are involved in the 
entire process of importing technology and digesting, absorbing, 
and innovating work. Truly reinforce work to shift to domestic 
production of imported technology and equipment. 
  26. S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges with the outside world 
should be closely integrated with China's economic, social, and 
S&amp;T development plans. Actively undertake cooperative 
research, 
joint development, cooperative management, and other forms of 
international S&amp;T cooperation, select S&amp;T realms where 
China has 
urgent requirements or significant advantages, and participate 
in big international S&amp;T plans and projects. Create the 
conditions for organizations in foreign countries and 
international organizations to cooperatively manage research, 
development, design, production, information service, and other 
organizations in China or foreign countries and spur technical 
economic cooperation. 
  27. S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges with the outside world 
should spur the development of the export-oriented economy, 
provide technical support and services to promote exports of 
high added-value products and high and new-tech products, and 
increase their proportion of our total export volume. With a 
prerequisite of obtaining the optimum economic results, actively 
organize technology exports. Provide greater support to high and 
new technology development organizations and enterprises with 
export prospects in the areas of policies, capital, foreign 
affairs authority, and other areas and increase their 
administrative flexibility. We must train and create in a 
planned manner a large number of S&amp;T-type skilled 
administrative 
and management personnel who are proficient in specialized 
technology, familiar with the international environment, and 
have a good grasp of foreign languages. Try to absorb students 
who have studied in foreign countries to participate in 
export-oriented high and new-tech industry work. 
  28. Further formulate and perfect the related policies to 
spur S&amp;T personnel to have contacts with the outside world, 
scholarly exchanges, and knowledge exports. We must provide 
convenient conditions for S&amp;T personnel to participate in 
international conferences, carry out scholarly visits and do 
visiting research, and take second posts in foreign countries or 
international organizations. We should transfer downward the 
authority over examination and approval of S&amp;T personnel to 
go 
to foreign countries to participate in scholarly activities and 
simplify the procedures. We must actively create the conditions 
to attract top-quality S&amp;T personnel working in foreign 
countries to return to China and serve the country and recruit 
experts in foreign countries to come to China to participate in 
scientific research and education work, carry out guidance and 
advising for production and management activities, or assume 
responsibility for administrative duties. 
  Based on needs and possibilities, organize knowledge exports 
in a planned manner and expand foreign exchange earnings from 
technology. We should send more technical experts and management 
experts to work in foreign countries, assume contractual 
responsibility, manage technical projects, provide technical 
services, and establish scientific research and engineering 
technology service organizations in foreign countries. 
  29. Create conditions and an environment conducive to 
international S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges. Strengthen 
collection and exchanges of S&amp;T information in China and 
foreign 
countries, undertake country research and comparative research 
on the S&amp;T situation and S&amp;T policies in each country. 
Focus on 
the characteristics and advantages of each country in different 
fields to formulate strategies, tactics, and policies for 
undertaking S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges with them. Open up 
funding channels for S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges with the 
outside world, raise capital from China and foreign countries 
from many parties, and provide capital support to international 
S&amp;T cooperation and exchanges. 
<H5>  VI. Policies and Measures </H5>
  30. To ensure that S&amp;T progress is placed in a primary 
status 
in the state's development strategy, the highest leading organs 
of the state must truly reinforce leadership over S&amp;T work 
and 
carry out unified planning and guidance of major problems in 
coordinating the development of China's S&amp;T with our economy 
and 
society. Strengthen the duties of the state's S&amp;T 
administrative 
departments, strive to raise macro decision making levels, 
overcome all types of barriers and decentralistic deviations, 
use our limited resources in the most needy areas, and guarantee 
the achievement of the state's major S&amp;T tasks. 
  31. Strengthen S&amp;T investments, improve S&amp;T 
expenditure 
management. While guaranteeing stable growth in the state's 
financial allocations, we must also strengthen society's 
investments of S&amp;T expenditures, change the situation of the 
state providing all financial inputs, and form three major 
S&amp;T 
investment pillars composed of financial allocations, money 
raised by enterprises themselves, and loans from financial 
organs, while at the same time actively attracting civilian and 
foreign capital, establishing a multi-channel and multi-level 
S&amp;T investment system, and substantially increasing the 
intensity of capital inputs in S&amp;T development from all of 
society. 
  The government should make appropriate increases in S&amp;T 
investments and implement preferential policies for high and new 
technology development. Enterprises must focus on new product 
development, increase R&amp;D inputs, gradually increase 
agricultural R&amp;D inputs, and encourage township and town 
enterprise to invest in agricultural S&amp;T. 
  The banking and financial systems should both establish 
S&amp;T 
credit accounts and increase S&amp;T loans. By the year 2000, 
they 
should make a substantial increase in the amount of S&amp;T 
loans. 
  Gradually readjust the S&amp;T investment structure, make 
expenditures on basic research and applied basic research attain 
about 10 percent of total expenditures on R&amp;D. They must 
increase capital support for intermediate testing, production 
technology development, and technical achievement 
commercialization and industrialization. They should select 
focal points for high and new technology and high and new-tech 
industry, substantially increase the strength of investments, 
and gradually implement risk investments. 
  Continue to reform the S&amp;T expenditure management 
system. The 
state's S&amp;T investments should implement unified management 
and 
bring in competitive mechanisms. Based on different categories 
of scientific research projects, implement special loans, fund 
systems, contractual responsibility systems, bidding systems, or 
contract systems. For projects with economic benefits that are 
included in state plans, implement the method of the government 
and units which benefit making matching investments. Establish 
R&amp;D project evaluation systems and independent evaluation 
organs. Implement supervision and inspection of S&amp;T 
expenditure 
allocations and utilization. Perfect S&amp;T financial management 
methods, strengthen auditing work. 
  32. Apply taxation, price, credit, depreciation, and other 
economic levers to induce technical progress in industries and 
enterprises and promote the development of S&amp;T activities. 
  Provide exemptions from business taxes for S&amp;T 
consulting, 
technology transfers, technical services, technology 
development, and other technical income. Collect additional 
taxes on products and technologies that do not conform to the 
state's industrial policies and technology policies and which 
impede S&amp;T progress. 
  Provide interest subsidies or low-interest loans for 
R&amp;D, 
testing and analysis, software, and other technical investments 
by R&amp;D organs and enterprises and for commercialized 
production 
of new products as determined by the state. 
  Implement accelerated depreciation methods for basic 
facilities and high and new-tech product production equipment in 
R&amp;D organs. 
  33. Strengthen construction of the S&amp;T legal system, 
use laws 
to fix the principles and policies for spurring S&amp;T progress, 
move S&amp;T work onto the track of the legal system, and 
subject it 
to legal protections and supervision. Move quickly to formulate 
a ``Scientific and Technical Progress Law'' and other laws 
related to S&amp;T work, perfect laws related to S&amp;T 
organizations, 
labor, awards, protection of intellectual property rights, and 
other areas, and strive to form a relatively complete S&amp;T 
legal 
system by the year 2000. 
  Popularize knowledge on S&amp;T laws and regulations, 
strengthen 
S&amp;T law and regulation implementation and supervision, and 
establish technology contract arbitration organizations and 
S&amp;T 
legal system organizations at all levels and an S&amp;T law and 
regulation research, consulting, and service system. 
  34. Promote scientific, democratic, and systematic decision 
making. As a comprehensive knowledge system and tool of 
thinking, S&amp;T can help us observe and analyze constantly 
changing economic and social phenomena at the macro level and 
make differentiated, diagnostic, and scientific decisions. 
  We must focus on and reinforce decision making research and 
decision making consulting work, and establish and perfect 
democratic and scientific decision making procedures and 
implementation procedures. For issues that have a major impact 
on our national economy and the people's livelihood, we must 
carry out soft science research prior to making decisions and 
gradually form a system. Leaders at all levels must focus on 
soft science research work, actively apply soft science research 
achievements, and make correct decisions. 
  35. Develop personnel resources, fully foster the role of 
S&amp;T 
personnel. Leaders at all levels must be adept at discovering 
talented personnel, uniting with qualified personnel, and not 
sticking to one pattern in using skilled personnel. All S&amp;T 
personnel who make achievements in their work should be given 
the respect due them. They should use a variety of routes to 
accelerate the training of a new generation of S&amp;T personnel 
and 
boldly utilize young S&amp;T personnel who have both skill and 
political integrity. Focus on continuing education for S&amp;T 
personnel, actively and in a planned manner assign S&amp;T 
personnel 
to go to foreign countries for advanced study or training. Fully 
foster the backbone role of middle-aged and young S&amp;T 
personnel, 
actively provide S&amp;T personnel who are away and those who 
have 
retired with opportunities for continuing service. 
  Reinforce professional education for laborers, encourage 
them 
to engage in self-study and improve their skills. Talented 
S&amp;T 
personnel who come from among the workers and peasants should be 
given equal treatment with specialized technical personnel. 
  Reinforce ideological and political work for S&amp;T 
personnel, 
teach them to love the motherland, support the four basic 
principles, and respect the ethics and standards of S&amp;T work. 
Encourage them to strive for improvement and make more 
contributions to national modernization and construction. 
  Endeavor to improve the working and living conditions of 
S&amp;T 
personnel. Integrate with reform of the personnel system and 
assignment system, adopt the required measures immediately, and 
substantially increase the real incomes of S&amp;T personnel. 
Preferential treatment should be given to S&amp;T personnel in 
rural 
area and frontier regions and those who work in underground, 
remote, and dangerous environments. 
  36. Create a stable environment for S&amp;T development 
that is 
full of democracy and academic freedom. Different scholarly 
views should be dealt with in academic circles through 
scientific practice and discussion, and correctness should not 
be determined through administrative means. 
  Fully foster the role of the Chinese Science and Technology 
Society and other scholarly groups, and encourage all scholarly 
groups and S&amp;T personnel to participate in scholarly 
exchanges, 
decision making and deliberations, consulting services, and 
other activities. 
  Establish and perfect a socialized S&amp;T support system 
for 
scientific research equipment, S&amp;T information, printed 
materials, book and periodical publishing, and so on. 
  37. Strengthen support from society as a whole for S&amp;T 
work. 
Party and government leaders at all levels in all departments 
and all locations should increase their understanding of 
economic work and provide it with extremely great attention and 
support. Leading organs must strive to improve their own S&amp;T 
accomplishments, truly make reliance on S&amp;T a first-rate 
matter 
for invigorating China, invigorating their regions, and 
invigorating their departments, and become leaders in initiating 
S&amp;T development. 
  Planning, personnel, education, finance, banking, taxation, 
foreign trade, propaganda, and other departments as well as 
news, publishing, and artistic circles must all strengthen their 
support for S&amp;T work and jointly contribute to the 
development 
of science and technology. 
  38. Developing science and technology is an achievement of 
the Chinese nationality covering thousands of years and it 
requires struggle by our entire nationality and unremitting 
efforts by many generations of people. In history, the Chinese 
nationality has relied on its own diligence and intelligence to 
create a magnificent ancient civilization that is still 
glimmering with an immortal brilliance today. Today, under the 
leadership of the Communist Party of China and guided by the 
party's basic lines and relying on S&amp;T progress, we will 
certainly be able to achieve a new takeoff in the social forces 
of production and achieve our second and third magnificent 
strategic objectives in socialist modernization and construction. 
<H5>  China's Medium- and Long-Term Science and Technology </H5>
Development Program (Main Points) (1990-2000-2020) 
<H5>  Agriculture </H5>
  Agriculture is the foundation of our national economy. 
Sustained and stable growth in agricultural production is the 
decisive factor in long-term stable development of our entire 
national economy and concerns the overall situation of economic 
construction and reform and opening up. The agricultural problem 
is certainly not a local problem, but is instead a problem that 
concerns the overall situation. It is not a regular problem of 
economic work, but is instead a major economic and strategic 
problem as well as a political problem. Thus, we must pay full 
attention to and strive to develop agriculture. Immediately 
strengthening agricultural S&amp;T work is an extremely urgent 
task. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
  Based on the ideas for China's economic construction and 
development determined by the 13th CPC Congress and China's 
agricultural development plans, by the end of this century we 
must attain a gross value of social output in rural areas of 
1.89 trillion yuan and a per capita net annual income in rural 
areas of 800 yuan, and the people's lives should attain a 
relatively prosperous level. By the 2020's, the gross value of 
social output in rural areas will continue to grow and our per 
capita GNP will approach the levels of the moderately developed 
countries, and the dietary structure in urban and rural areas 
will change from a relatively healthy to a nutritious one. 
Agricultural production will gradually develop in the direction 
of specialization, commercialization, and modernization and form 
prosperous new socialist rural areas in a preliminary manner. 
  The basic tasks of agricultural S&amp;T work during this 
period 
are to achieve the objectives outlined above, provide feasible 
advanced S&amp;T achievements and appropriate technology, 
continually open up new domains for agricultural S&amp;T 
development, strengthen new S&amp;T reserves, and open up a new 
route for the continual development of agricultural production. 
  Agricultural S&amp;T must focus closely on the objectives 
outlined above and attain the three resolute things: resolutely 
orient toward service to production, do good deployments in 
depth for agricultural scientific research work; resolutely 
extend appropriate and matching advanced technology, actively 
apply the achievements of the new technological revolution; 
resolutely unite economic benefits, social benefits, and 
ecological benefits, implement guidance by categories and 
improvement by regions. The four integrations: implement 
integration of traditional agricultural technology with modern 
S&amp;T, gradually shift toward modern agriculture; integrate 
labor 
intensity with technological intensity, gradually shift toward 
knowledge and technological intensity; integrate manual labor 
with semi-mechanization and mechanization, gradually shift 
toward mechanization; integrate using land with nurturing land, 
gradually shift toward high output, superior quality, high 
efficiency, low consumption intensive management and scientific 
service to agriculture. 
  Based on the above requirements, the strategic objectives 
facing agricultural S&amp;T work during the 2020's are: use 
S&amp;T and 
modern industry as powerful pillars, transform traditional 
agriculture into modern sustained agriculture based on modern 
S&amp;T and modern management, gradually reduce the proportion of 
our agricultural population, substantially increase land 
utilization rates, labor productivity, and product 
commercialization rates, establish a modern agricultural 
production technology system. 
  By the year 2000, agricultural S&amp;T must serve a 
doubling of 
agricultural output, comprehensive development of the rural 
commodity economy, and attaining relative prosperity in the 
people's lives. 
  --On the basis of per capita grain of 400 to 424 kg and a 
gross output of 500 to 530 billion kg, comprehensively develop 
other cash crops and forestry, animal husbandry, and fishery, 
increase the daily amount of heat energy supplied by food per 
person per day of urban and rural residents to 2,715 kcal, 73.5 
g of protein, 56.6 g of fats, and basically satisfy normal 
physical requirements. 
  --The primary realms of agricultural S&amp;T should attain 
advanced world levels of the early 1980's. The role of 
agricultural technology in increasing agricultural output should 
increase from the present 35 percent to about 50 percent. 
Continue to maintain a world vanguard status in soil 
improvement, breeding multi-resistant crops, using hybrid 
advantages, multiple maturation cropping, high output 
cultivation, biological prevention, livestock and poultry 
epidemic disease diagnosis and prevention, freshwater 
aquaculture, and several other fields where we have advantages. 
  --Plant grass and trees, increase vegetation, reduce soil 
erosion, control degradation and desertification of cultivated 
land and grasslands, achieve a preliminary improvement in the 
agricultural ecology and environment. 
  By the year 2020, agricultural S&amp;T must serve 
comprehensive 
development of agriculture and the rural commodity economy and 
the people's lives should make a transition from relative 
prosperity to a nutritious model. 
  --On the basis of per capita grain of 500 to 525 kg and 
total 
output of 700 to 750 billion kg, achieve coordinated development 
of other cash crops and of forestry, animal husbandry, and 
fishery, increase the amount of heat energy supplied by food per 
person per day for urban and rural residents to 2,850 kcal, 85 g 
of protein, 80 g of fats, attain nutritious levels in dietary 
structures, and gradually form a dietary structure with Chinese 
characteristics. 
  --Rely on science and technology, develop the agricultural 
forces of production, increase the role of agricultural S&amp;T 
in 
increasing agricultural output to about 70 percent. Make 
significant improvements in the agricultural ecology and 
environment, begin making a transition toward benevolent cycles. 
  --Use modern industry to outfit agriculture, basically 
achieve mechanization and partial semi-automation in 
cultivation, planting, management, harvesting, and other primary 
field activities and in livestock, poultry, and aquacultural 
raising as well as in post-production cooling and storage of 
agricultural products, processing, and so on, substantially 
raise labor productivity, enable each agricultural labor to 
support 7 to 8 people. 
  --Make a major effort to develop high technology and new 
technology. Broadly apply microelectronics technology in the 
primary production and management realms of agriculture. Achieve 
major developments and new breakthroughs in biotechnology and 
apply them in animal and plant cultivation and breeding, plant 
disease and insect pest and epidemic disease prevention, 
agricultural product processing, agricultural microbiology, and 
other important realms, gradually form and develop an emerging 
industry. 
  --Further develop food source and nutrition source S&amp;T, 
exploit the increased output potential of animal and plant 
proteins, accelerate development of the food product and feed 
industries, provide highly nutritious, economically beneficial, 
and diversified food products to improve the dietary structure 
of urban and rural people. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  Starting now, and on to the end of this century and into the 
2020's, the strategic foci of China's agricultural S&amp;T 
development are: serve substantial improvements in the 
agricultural forces of production, economic benefits, and 
product quality; broadly open up food sources, improve the 
dietary structure; prevent natural disasters, protect the 
ecology and environment. While increasing the intensity of 
material inputs and improving agricultural technical equipment 
and construction of basic agricultural facilities, we must also 
make a major effort to extend and popularize agricultural 
S&amp;T, 
actively undertake applied research, and truly reinforce basic 
work and theoretical research to increase the reserve strengths 
of agricultural production and agricultural S&amp;T. 
  The key tasks for agricultural S&amp;T development are: 
<H5>  A. Rationally develop, utilize, and protect agricultural </H5>
natural resources. 
  Agricultural natural resources are an important material 
foundation for agricultural development. We must adhere to the 
principle of combining rational development and utilization with 
protection, strengthen scientific management of our existing 
cultivated land, monitor the evolutionary laws of its soil, 
water, and fertilizer, and establish dynamic monitoring systems. 
Strengthen comprehensive development and improvement in key 
regions, especially moderate and low-yield regions, improve the 
production performance of cultivated land, and establish a soil 
ecology and environment that combines utilization with nurturing 
and has high output and stable output. While fully protecting 
and utilizing cultivated land, we must also orient toward our 
entire national territory, truly reinforce monitoring of 
cultivated land, grasslands, mountains and forests, and water 
areas, produce quantitative statistics and quality assessments 
that conform to reality, propose optimized programs for rational 
development and comprehensive utilization. We must also 
strengthen protection of agricultural natural resources and 
undertake comprehensive improvement technology that is centered 
on planting grass and planting trees and focused on water and 
soil preservation, and that integrates organic measures with 
engineering measures. In addition, we must also place protection 
of the ecology and environment and utilization of climatic 
resources in a primary status, and strengthen monitoring, 
forecasting, and prevention of disastrous weather to maintain 
sustained and stable development of agriculture. 
  Prior to the year 2000, rationally develop agricultural 
natural resources and increase utilization rates, achieve 
preliminary control over destruction of agricultural natural 
resources and the agricultural ecology and environment, and 
achieve a simultaneous increase in the renewal capabilities of 
renewable resources and agricultural development requirements. 
In 2020, apply advanced S&amp;T, expand comprehensive 
development of 
natural resources, further increase utilization rates. At the 
same time, make a transition to benevolent cycles in the 
agricultural ecology and environment, lay an excellent material 
foundation for achieving agricultural modernization. 
<H5>  B. Broadly open up food sources, improve the dietary </H5>
structure of urban and rural residents. 
  Improve nutritional levels of urban and rural residents, 
select a dietary structure that conforms to China's national 
conditions. With a prerequisite of striving to increase grain 
production, orient toward our entire national territory, 
comprehensively develop all types of food resources, promote 
coordinated development of cropping and breeding. Readjust 
cropping structures and deployments, significantly develop 
legume crops; increase the protein content of grain crops; 
reform cultivation systems, make appropriate increases in the 
multiple cropping index, make a transition from a two-element 
structure (grain and cash crops) to a three-element structure 
(grain, cash crops, and feed crops). Readjust livestock and 
poultry structures and, while increasing hog slaughter rates and 
feed conversion rates, also make a major effort to develop 
grain-saving poultry and grazing animals. Accelerate development 
of aquaculture S&amp;T, orient toward interior water areas, 
obtain 
animal protein from the sea. 
  Prior to the year 2000, the amount of superior quality 
protein assimilated from animals and plants by urban and rural 
residents should be about 30 percent. Attain about 50 percent in 
2020 and achieve a transition in dietary structures from 
relative prosperity to a nutritional type. 
<H5>  C. Selectively breed new crop, livestock and poultry, and </H5>
aquaculture product varieties, establish and perfect an improved 
variety breeding system. 
  Reinforce collection, examination, preservation, and 
utilization research for all germplasm resources, establish and 
perfect modernized variety resources storehouses (gardens) and 
pure breed farms. At the same time, we must on the basis of 
different requirements cultivate new high-yield, superior 
quality, multi-resistant crop varieties (combinations), new 
livestock, poultry, and aquaculture product series that are 
fast-growing and have strong breeding capabilities, and good 
product quality, and continually replace and utilize them in 
production. Focus on utilizing the advantages of hybrids, 
undertake research on breeding theory, technology, and methods, 
further improve breeding efficiency and shorten breeding cycles. 
Establish a crop, livestock and poultry, and fish variety 
examination system, achieve regionalization of improved 
varieties; perfect the improved variety breeding system; 
implement inspection and quarantine systems, do good 
specialization and quality standardization for seed production 
and livestock (poultry) breed breeding. 
  Prior to the year 2000, replace primary grain crop varieties 
twice and achieve a matching of improved varieties and improved 
methods, increasing output by about 10 percent each time; attain 
a popularization rate of 30 percent for improved commercial 
livestock, poultry, and fish varieties. By 2020, replace primary 
crop varieties two or three times, increasing output by 10 to 15 
percent each time; attain a popularization rate of 50 percent 
for improved commercial livestock, poultry, and fish varieties. 
<H5>  D. High output, superior quality, high efficiency, low </H5>
consumption comprehensive agricultural, animal husbandry, and 
fishery output increasing technologies. 
  On the basis of selective utilization of improved varieties, 
do research on fertilizer mixing and application, water-saving 
irrigation (or dry crop technology), preventing dangers from 
plant diseases and insect pests and weeds, agricultural 
meteorological disasters, and other regionalized, standardized, 
and match optimized cultivation technologies; develop intensive 
livestock and poultry feeding and raising technologies; develop 
large water area breeding and high density aquaculture precision 
breeding technologies; strengthen deep sea fishing technology; 
do foresighted research on epidemic disease monitoring, control, 
and elimination technology for endangered animals and plants, 
protect a substantial increase in agricultural, animal 
husbandry, and fishery output. 
  Prior to the year 2000, increase the yearly nitrogen 
fertilizer utilization rate to 40 percent. Increase irrigation 
water utilization rates to more than 50 percent, and produce 0.4 
kg of grain per mm of rainfall in arid regions. Control loss 
rates from damage due to diseases and insect pests to 3 percent 
for grain and 5 percent for cotton, and do not allow loss rates 
for other cash crops to exceed 5 percent. Control death rates to 
less than 5 percent for hogs, 10 percent for poultry, and 2 
percent for livestock. Control loss rates from aquacultural 
diseases to less than 10 percent. Propose agricultural 
meteorological disaster prevention technology and broadly apply 
it in production. In 2020, as science and technology progress, 
raise nitrogen fertilizer utilization rates in that year to 60 
percent. Increase irrigation water utilization rates to 65 to 70 
percent, and produce 0.5 kg of grain per mm of rainfall. Control 
loss rates due to diseases, insect pests, and weeds to 1 percent 
for grains and 3 percent for primary cash crops. Control death 
rates at 5 percent for poultry and 4 percent for aquacultural 
diseases. Apply agricultural meteorology disaster prevention 
technology in a broad manner to obtain significant benefits. 
<H5>  E. Regional comprehensive development and improvement </H5>
technology. 
  Focus on the Huang-Huai-Hai [Huang He-Huai He-Hai He] Plain, 
Songnen-Sanjiang Plain, red (yellow and purple) soil hill region 
of southern China, Hainan Island, the loess plateau, and other 
moderate and low-yield regions and coastal beaches to determine 
the causes of low yields and the primary restricting factors, do 
research on comprehensive development and improvement 
technologies, establish regional ecology comprehensive function 
optimized technical systems, and use experimental regions, 
demonstration regions, and diffusion regions to accelerate 
technological development and provide a scientific foundation 
for the coordinated development of agriculture and construction 
of base areas for each type of commodity. 
  Prior to 2000, study and propose technical programs for 
rational agricultural structures for different regions and 
improvement of low-yield soils, further perfect commodity base 
area comprehensive matching technology for grain, cotton, 
legumes, hogs, cattle, poultry, fish, tropical crops and so on, 
use the market as a guide, strive to raise commercialization 
rates, make quality conform to international standards, 
especially for major industrial raw materials, and foster our 
competitive advantages in international markets. In 2020, study 
and propose comprehensive, matching, and systematization 
technologies for grain, cash crops, livestock and poultry, and 
aquaculture, further develop export-oriented industry. 
<H5>  F. Agricultural product storage and transportation, </H5>
processing, packaging, and comprehensive utilization technology. 
  With the goal of improving the quality of agricultural 
products, conserving raw materials and energy consumption, and 
increasing the value of output, focus on research on storage and 
transportation, preservation, processing and packaging 
technologies for grain, oils, fruits, vegetables, and other 
agricultural products and for livestock, poultry, and 
aquaculture products; do research on laws of changes in the 
quality and nutritional components of agricultural, livestock, 
and aquaculture products in the storage, transportation, and 
processing processes and on regulation and control technology to 
maintain superior quality; do research on intensive processing 
and comprehensive utilization technology for agricultural, 
livestock, and aquaculture products and for straw, sideline 
products, and leftover materials, explore new routes for 
increasing the value of products and exporting to earn foreign 
exchange. 
  Prior to 2000, propose relatively perfect and advanced 
agricultural, livestock, and aquaculture product storage and 
transportation, processing, packaging, and comprehensive 
utilization technology, increase the competitiveness of our 
superior products in the international market. In 2020, provide 
modernized production technology and technical equipment, use 
diversified and superior quality processed products to open up 
more international markets and increase our foreign exchange 
earning capability. 
<H5>  G. Agricultural mechanization technology and agricultural </H5>
engineering research. 
  Integrate with different administrative scales and 
cultivation systems, develop mechanization technology for the 
cultivation, planting, management, harvesting, and other 
production links for primary grain and cash crops and for upland 
agriculture and water-saving irrigation of farmland; do research 
on mechanization, semi-mechanization, and grassland (pasture) 
mechanization technology for intensive livestock and poultry 
raising in the suburbs of large and medium-sized cities and in 
commodity base areas; do research on mechanization of aquatic 
breeding and fishing and on mechanization of medium-sized and 
small processing; do research on agricultural and sideline 
product processing and comprehensive utilization machinery and 
tools and mechanization technology and equipment; do research on 
facility agriculture, comprehensive utilization of rural energy 
resources, and agricultural, livestock, and fishery 
environmental engineering technology and sets of equipment. 
  Prior to 2000, provide appropriate technology and equipment 
for achieving mechanization of a large portion of the activities 
in agricultural production and agricultural and sideline product 
processing, and new energy-saving technology. In 2020, provide 
post-production processing automation and semi-automation 
technology to provide advanced sets of mechanization technology, 
facility agriculture, and other environmental engineering 
technology and equipment to develop agricultural production, and 
basically achieve agricultural mechanization. 
<H5>  H. Application of biotechnology, microelectronics </H5>
technology, and other high technology and new technology in 
agriculture. 
  Use genetic engineering and cell manipulation technology to 
accelerate selective breeding of high output, high quality, and 
multi-resistant agricultural crop varieties; adopt animal gene 
transfers and embryo engineering technology to develop new 
livestock, poultry, and fish varieties that grow quickly and 
have a high feed remuneration and excellent quality; develop 
animal epidemic disease monoclonal antibody and DNA probe and 
diagnosis technology as well as safe and highly effective 
vaccines; do research on development and utilization of protein 
and cellulose resources and on biotechnology for intensive 
processing of agricultural and sideline products to 
commercialize them and increase their economic value. 
  Apply other high and new technologies focused on 
microelectronics technology such as electronic computer 
technology, remote sensing technology, isotope and radioactive 
nuclei technology, and so on to accelerate the development and 
formation of emerging industries. 
  Prior to 2000, breed several new high output, superior 
quality, and multi-resistant agricultural, livestock, and fish 
varieties and apply them directly in production; develop 
successful animal and plant epidemic disease diagnosis and 
prevention technologies and commercialize them. Apply 
microelectronics technology, remote sensing technology, and 
radioactive nuclei technology to accelerate modernization of 
research and management measures. By 2020, make important 
breakthroughs in biotechnology and broadly apply them in all 
important fields to form and develop emerging industries. 
Broadly apply microelectronics technology, remote sensing 
technology, and so on in agricultural departments and primary 
production realms and obtain significant economic and social 
benefits. 
<H5>  I. Agricultural applied basic research </H5>
  Focus on undertaking research on the genetic laws of crop, 
livestock and poultry, aquaculture, and other important economic 
properties, and in particular strengthen research on resistance 
(resistant to diseases and insect pests, resistant to reversion) 
and the genetic laws of product quality properties; conduct 
research on growth and development laws, nutrient metabolism, 
and external environment regulation and control mechanisms, and 
in particular pay attention to the most vigorous leading-edge 
fields in modern agricultural science such as photosynthesis, 
organic nitrogen fixation, multi-resistance mechanisms, 
veterinary immunology, veterinary acupuncture products, and so 
on, and strive for major advances and new breakthroughs. 
  Prior to 2000, apply all of the technologies described above 
and produce results. By 2020, make important breakthroughs in 
integrating theory and practice. 
<H5>  J. Research on modern agricultural macroeconomics and </H5>
scientific management. 
  With agricultural modernization as the goal, undertake 
research on industrial-agricultural relationships, total and 
regional agricultural development strategies, the rural economy, 
agricultural product prices and circulation systems, agriculture 
abstracts and information modernization, agricultural S&amp;T 
management, and so on, establish the corresponding information 
systems, and provide a theoretical foundation for macro decision 
making in agricultural departments. 
  Prior to 2000, propose and establish macroeconomic theory 
and 
method systems and implement overall agricultural modernization 
and construction path and step programs to gain typical 
experience. By 2020, formulate policies, laws and regulations, 
and S&amp;T management theories and methods that conform to 
realities in China to guide agricultural modernization and 
construction. 
<H5>  Forestry </H5>
  Forestry is an important part of our national economy, and 
it 
is both an industry and a public welfare activity. Forests are 
the main factor in the ecological system of continents and an 
important species genetic storehouse. Forest resources are a 
nation's basic resources and ``life resources'', and they 
determine and affect the development and growth of regular 
renewable resources, maintain the vitality and stability of 
ecological systems, and are an important prerequisite for human 
production and life. The development of forestry concerns the 
overall situation in national construction. It provides timber 
and a variety of forestry and sideline products as well as food, 
oils and fats, medicines, fiber, and other important raw 
materials, and it has a profound impact on maintaining 
ecological equilibrium, improving environmental quality, 
improving and protecting our national territory, reducing 
national disasters, spurring increased agricultural output, 
invigorating the rural economy, and protecting the conditions on 
which mankind depends for existence and development. A developed 
forestry is one indicator of a nation's wealth, the prosperity 
of a nationality, and the civilization of a society. Planting 
trees to create forests and make the motherland green is a 
fundamental national policy in China. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Industry development strategies </H5>
  Implement intensive management, reinforce protection, make 
major efforts at developing and comprehensively using forest 
resources, increase the total amount of forest products and 
reduce consumption to the greatest possible extent, reverse 
trends toward declining resources, and gradually improve the 
ecology and environment. 
<H5>  B. Industry strategies and objectives </H5>
  By the end of this century, increase the forested area by 
450 
million mu, including 100 million mu of rapid-growing abundant 
output forests, and strive to increase the forest coverage rate 
from the present 12.98 percent (based on data from a detailed 
survey during the Sixth 5-Year Plan) to 15 percent, and increase 
it to 20 percent by 2020. The amount of forest growth should 
rise from the present 320 million cubic meters to 400 million 
cubic meters, and to 550 million cubic meters by 2020. By the 
end of this century, tend 450 million mu of middle-aged and 
young trees and produce 140 to 150 million cubic meters of 
lumber for use in construction (including 95 million cubic 
meters of lumber for use within plans). Readjust the industrial 
structure, achieve a proportion of one-third of the value of 
output overall each for lumber, intensive processing and 
utilization, and economic diversification. 
<H5>  C. Science and technology strategies and objectives </H5>
  By the year 2000, deal with key technologies for reversing 
the decline in forest resources, substantially increase the 
amount of forest growth, resource utilization rates, and labor 
productivity, and serve development of the commodity economy in 
forest regions. Establish an industrial system based on forest 
cultivation, use highly efficient utilization as a vanguard and 
optimized products as a dragon's head, and build a forest 
ecology protective screen system to shift forestry onto the 
track of using modern S&amp;T and modern management as a 
foundation. 
  --Increase the quality of afforestation. Use intensive 
management and strengthened management and administration to 
increase the afforestation preservation rate. Increase the 
afforestation preservation rate from 26 percent in the early 
1980's to 70 by the year 2000 and to 90 percent by 2020, and 
provide comprehensive technology for mature forests and timber. 
  --Propose matching technologies for comprehensive protection 
of forests. Establish forest resource comprehensive information 
management and monitoring systems, increase the detailed survey 
rate for forest resources; establish a forest protection system, 
reduce the occurrence rates and damage rates to forests from 
diseases and insect pests and fires; do research from the 
perspective of territorial security and management on systems to 
integrate with agriculture, animal husbandry, and water 
conservancy, increase the effectiveness of forest resource 
protection. Use scientific protection to reduce forest resource 
losses by more than 30 percent. 
  --Rationally deploy and develop forest resources, increase 
the amount of forest growth. Do good resource deployments, 
readjust the forest variety structure and optimize forest 
resource management and utilization programs, and provide them 
with legal guarantees. Implement integration of artificial 
afforestation, upgrading secondary forests, closing off 
mountainous areas to nurture forests, and aerial seeding for 
afforestation, adapt to local conditions to expand forest 
resources. Use improved strong seedling varieties, intensive 
cultivation technology, and other measures to increase the 
amount of forest growth by about 20 percent. 
  --Scientifically utilize forest resources. First of all, we 
must control amounts being cut. Make a major effort to develop 
the lumber industry, forest product chemical industry, and 
economic diversification to develop the utilization of forest 
resources toward high efficiency, use intensive processing to 
increase product quality and utilization rates, and make their 
utilization rates equivalent to a doubling of industrial lumber 
(almost 100 million cubic meters). Raise the ratio between 
industrial timber and fuel forests (including some timber that 
has not undergone industrial processing) from the present 3:7 to 
5:5. 
  --Propose quantitative evaluation indicators for forests and 
the ecology and environment. Establish stable forest ecology 
system models, provide quantitative evaluation indices for the 
role of forests in preventing wind and stabilizing sand, water 
and soil preservation, conserving water sources, purifying the 
atmosphere and water, developing forest tourism, convalescence, 
and other areas and thereby calculate the ecological value of 
forests in improving the environment. 
  --Attain international levels of the early 1980's in 
forestry 
S&amp;T. Make substantial breakthroughs in the areas of soft 
science 
research and forestry applied basic research. Accelerate the 
transfer of S&amp;T achievements into production and attain an 
achievement conversion rate of about 70 percent. The role of 
S&amp;T 
in forestry development should increase from the present 10 
percent to about 30 percent. Attain a preliminary scale for 
scientific research systems, extension systems, and technical 
supervision systems, improve the irrational situation in the 
deployment and structure of the S&amp;T system, substantially 
improve the quality of S&amp;T personnel, and increase the 
proportion of specialized forestry personnel from 8.7 percent to 
11 percent of forestry employees. 
  By the year 2020, continue to focus on increasing forest 
resources, further improve the ecological and environmental 
benefits of forests, establish rational models for developing 
and utilizing forest resources, and comprehensively develop the 
economy in forest areas. In particular, we must make important 
breakthroughs in applying biotechnology and microelectronics 
technology, opening up new ways to increase resources, and other 
areas and establish an industrial system. Strive to attain 
advanced international levels in the main fields of forestry 
S&amp;T. Increase the role of S&amp;T in forestry development 
from 30 
percent to 60 percent. Finish building a scientific research, 
extension, and supervision system. Achieve basic rationality in 
the deployment and structure of S&amp;T personnel, significantly 
improve the quality of S&amp;T staffs, and increase the 
proportion 
of specialized personnel to 15 percent of forestry employees. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Research on existing forest resource management, </H5>
administration, and protection. 
  1. Establish a comprehensive information management and 
monitoring system for forest resources. We must gain an 
understanding of our resources to reverse the loss of control 
between resource consumption and growth. Apply remote sensing 
technology matched with the necessary ground surveys to 
establish a detailed survey system for forest resources and 
complete it using counties (forestry bureaus) as the statistical 
elements, provide national macro forest resource detailed survey 
and monitoring technology including data on all categories of 
forested area and reserve resources and the corresponding 
charts, reduce the survey schedule from the present 5-10 years 
to 3-5 years, and increase the precision of surveys; by 2020 
establish a system that totally applies computer differentiation 
and dynamic monitoring and analysis of forest resources, provide 
the state with new resource data every year. 
  2. Do research on forest protection technology. Adopt 
advanced technology to reinforce prediction and forecasting of 
forest diseases and insect pests and form a national network. By 
2000, attain a short-term prediction and forecasting rate of 80 
percent and a medium and long-term prediction and forecasting 
rate of 70 percent for primary forest diseases and insect pests. 
In addition, establish a national quarantine network. Establish 
comprehensive management system models for primary diseases and 
insect pests, reduce the disease and insect pest disaster rate 
by 30 to 40 percent and by 70 percent in 2020, and reduce timber 
losses by 30 and 60 percent, respectively. In the area of 
preventing forest fires, we must focus on prediction and 
forecasting systems that integrate aerial and ground activities 
and do research on forest fire rescue equipment. Reduce the 
forest fire occurrence rate by 30 percent by 2000 and about 50 
percent by 2020, and do research on the deployment, functions, 
and management of natural protection regions. Undertake research 
on protection, breeding, utilization, and other areas for 
endangered rare animals and plants, rescue valuable animals and 
plants threatened by extinction, and establish base areas for 
introducing and raising fine varieties. In addition, undertake 
resource on forest genetic resource preservation technologies. 
  3. Do research on tending and intermediate cutting and 
secondary forest upgrading technology for middle-aged and young 
forests. Do research on tending and intermediate cutting modes 
and intensities, improve forest growth rates and timber quality. 
Propose rational densities and deployments for forest 
passageways. Use research on secondary forest comprehensive 
cultivation technology to fully foster the production potential 
of forests, readjust standing forest structures and forest age 
structures, increase forest quality and output, and upgrade some 
secondary forests to rapid-growing abundant harvest forests. 
  4. Study and formulate rational cutting amount standards. 
Readjust the amounts being cut in our 131 forestry bureaus and 
deal with the problem of overcutting. Do research on rational 
management and administration models for enterprises whose 
resources have been exhausted. Formulate national forest cutting 
quotas and formulate forest phase diagrams. Do research on 
rational cutting modes and replacement methods, adopt a variety 
of routes to reduce waste of timber. Strengthen research on 
cutting, transportation, and forestry machinery. Gradually 
reduce the forestry deficit by the year 2000, try to prevent 
total consumption of forest resources from exceeding the total 
amount being grown. 
<H5>  B. Research on establishing short-schedule industrial timber </H5>
technology systems. 
  1. Do research on improved variety selective breeding 
technology, improve the genetic quality of forests. Establish 
and perfect short-schedule forest selective breeding and 
improved variety breeding systems. Selectively breed 
rapid-growing, superior quality, multi-resistant new varieties, 
new asexual strains, and new combinations. Do research on 
multi-resistant improved varieties and multi-generation breeding 
technology. In the area of moving quickly to measure and shorten 
breeding schedules, focus on hybrid advantages, ultra-close 
advantages, and applications of new breeding technologies. In 
artificially planted forests, increase the genetically improved 
breeding material utilization rate to 30 percent by 2000 and to 
more than 70 percent by 2020. 
  2. Do research on intensive management technologies for 
industrial forests. Formulate technical standards and methods 
for large-area appropriate areas and trees, demarcate stand 
categories and compile stand maps for all of China to make 
cultivation technologies for primary fast-growing timber trees 
scientific and systematic. Do research on scientific fertilizer 
application technologies for primary fast-growing tree 
varieties; study water-conserving irrigation technology; do 
research on scientific deployments of mixed forests and 
mixed-age forests, establish stable community structures. The 
maturation time limits or rotational cutting schedules should be 
10 to 25 years for plains regions and mountainous areas of 
southern China and 15 to 40 years for mountainous areas of north 
China; the average annual growth volume should be 0.7 to 1 cubic 
meters in southern China and 0.5 cubic meters in northern China. 
  3. Study directional cultivation technology for industrial 
forests. formulate directional cultivation technology indicators 
for papermaking materials, artificial board materials, 
construction materials, energy resource materials, and forest 
product chemical raw materials base areas, and select tree 
varieties, stands, and maturation ages according to different 
use objectives and establish different models for directional 
cultivation of superior-quality industrial forests. Do good 
rational deployment and scale management of base areas, have as 
a strategic focus the mountainous areas of Xiaoxing'anling 
Changbai Shan, hilly and mountainous areas of southern China, 
and the Zhongyuan Plain in north China to study material quality 
forecasting and cultivation techniques for existing 
rapid-growing tree varieties. By 2000, strive for directional 
cultivation of 36 million mu of base area forests among China's 
100 million mu of abundant output forests and produce about 10 
million cubic meters of superior quality industrial materials, 
and develop to 100 million mu by 2020. 
<H5>  C. Research on ecological forestry engineering. </H5>
  1. Do research on shelter forest systems in the ``three 
norths'' [northwest, north, and northeast China], along the 
coast, in the middle and upper reaches of the Chang Jiang, and 
in the Taihang Shan region. Do research on the benefits of 
shelter forest systems on the natural environment, the water 
source conservation and mud and rock flow control functions of 
water source forests in the upper reaches of the Chang Jiang, 
the protective mechanisms of marine shelter forests, and 
evaluate the public welfare benefits, replacement technologies 
for shelter forest management and afforestation, agricultural, 
forestry, and animal husbandry structures in shelter forest 
regions, and on integration of arbors, irrigation, and grasses 
and on tree variety structures and deployments. By 2000, attain 
a shelter forest area of 300 million mu and a sheltered area of 
2 billion mu to prevent continued degradation of the ecology and 
environment. Control the continued expansion of desertification 
in local regions. This can reduce the amount of wind-blown dust 
in the ``three norths'' region by 40 percent, reduce the amount 
of silt losses in the middle and upper reaches of the Chang 
Jiang and loess regions by 30 percent, and reduce wind disasters 
in coastal regions by 40 percent. By 2020, increase the shelter 
forest area to 500 million mu and the sheltered area to 3 
billion mu, obtain the optimum sheltering structure benefits and 
comprehensive benefits, improve the ecology and environment, and 
gradually move towards benevolent cycles. 
  2. Do research on forestry in plains regions. In the 
Sanjiang, Songliao, North China, Huang-Huai-Hai, Chang Jiang 
middle and lower reaches, Zhu Jiang [Pearl River] Delta, and 
other primary commodity grain base areas, do research on 
compound farmland shelter forest systems and on their management 
and afforestation technology for a variety of crop and forest 
interplanting arrangements, evaluate the ecological and economic 
benefits of shelter forests on increasing agricultural output, 
and so on, and further establish a system that integrates 
agriculture, forestry, and animal husbandry. By 2000, gradually 
complete a shelter forest system in the regions listed above, 
increase grain output by about 5 percent, and increase timber 
output by 200 to 300 million cubic meters; by 2020, attain a 
forest coverage rate of 10 to 15 percent, with shelter forests 
accounting for 50 percent, and establish a relatively stable 
agriculture, forestry, animal husbandry, and fishery compound 
ecology system and increase grain output by 10 percent. 
<H5>  D. Research on intensive processing and highly efficient </H5>
utilization of timber. 
  1. Do research on using fast-growing trees, small trees, 
waste trees, poor-quality trees, bamboo, and agricultural 
residues as raw materials and on technologies for manufacturing 
them into finished wood products, mainly artificial board. Do 
focused research on using small diameter timber, intermediate 
cutting timber, and timber processing residues as raw materials, 
develop new production technologies and new equipment for 
particle board and fiberboard for a variety of uses, and 
implement quality controls. Undertake research on the 
construction of large-scale artificial board enterprise systems 
engineering, and by the year 2000 apply this achievement to 
attain an annual output of 500,000 cubic meters of high-quality 
particle board and fiberboard to replace 1.5 million cubic 
meters of industrial timber. By 2020, achieve an annual output 
of 3 million cubic meters of superior quality lumber to replace 
9 million cubic meters of industrial lumber; in regions suitable 
for the development of medium-sized and small enterprises, 
extend technologies for using fast-growing tree varieties, 
bamboo, and agricultural residues as raw materials to produce 
artificial board and other finished products. This would include 
producing 1 million cubic meters of artificial board which along 
with other finished products could save the country 6 million 
cubic meters of industrial timber by the year 2000 and 12 
million cubic meters by 2020. Actively undertake research on 
directional cultivation fast-growing timber utilization, and by 
the year 2000 utilize fast-growing timber to produce 1 million 
cubic meters of plywood and 400,000 cubic meters of 
superior-quality plywood for use in mechanized processing and 
structures. Attain 3 million cubic meters and 1.2 million cubic 
meters, respectively, by 2020, and replace 1.5 million cubic 
meters and 4.5 million cubic meters, respectively, of raw 
lumber. Extension of the three technologies listed above could 
produce 3 million cubic meters of artificial board by 2000 and 7 
million cubic meters by 2020. 
  2. Study and extend lumber drying, decay prevention, and 
other modification technologies. Do research on lumber drying 
benchmarks, develop from the drying techniques for the 30-odd 
tree varieties we currently understand to 60 varieties by 2000, 
and be concerned with drying techniques for hard-to-dry lumber 
and especially large and thick lumber. Extend lumber decay 
prevention technology, do research on difficult infusion 
technology, and develop low-toxicity decay prevention agents. 
After lumber undergoes drying and decay prevention, its lifespan 
can be extended 3 to 5 times. By 2000, this could conserve an 
estimated 10 million cubic meters of lumber. On a foundation of 
studying and extending lumber drying and decay prevention, 
undertake research on other improvement technologies for 
fast-growing timber and form an integrated matching technology 
for sawing-drying-decay prevention-inspection with modern 
characteristics. 
  3. Do R&amp;D on technology for artificial board, primarily 
particle board, and on the use of woody materials including 
rapid-growing timber as structural materials. Based on different 
structural requirements, do research on artificial board 
performance, strength, fire resistance, structural 
architectures, and other technologies, formulate the related 
standards and structural regulations, extend complete sets of 
high-quality woody construction material houses and commercial 
components primarily for civilian residences. By the year 2000, 
strive for 700,000 cubic meters of artificial board for use as 
construction material to replace 2 million cubic meters of raw 
lumber. By 2020, consume 3 million cubic meters of structural 
artificial board and gradually achieve modernization of 
residential structures. 
<H5>  E. Research on multi-effect utilization of forest plant </H5>
resources. 
  1. Do R&amp;D on pulp and paper making technology for 
rapid-growing lumber, bamboo, forest region waste materials, 
bast fiber, and so on. Focus on research on rapid-growing 
timber, small diameter timber and branch pulp and paper making 
technology, and waste liquid recovery and processing technology, 
focus on pulp and paper making technology for bast fiber and 
other special paper, and increase the quality and fitness rates 
of paper pulp. Attain a forestry cardboard output of more than 1 
million tons by 2000 and more than 2 million tons by 2020. 
  2. Do research on new types of woody material resource 
production technology. Accelerate research and extension of 
forest energy resource processing, conversion, and utilization 
technology. Use firewood, waste material, and forest product 
industrial waste materials, dregs, and liquids in forest regions 
to develop new solid molded fuel processing technologies and 
produce commodity energy resources with a high unit volume heat 
value that are easy to transport and use, upgrade and extend new 
types of high efficiency waste-burning boilers, study timber 
gasification technology and utilization modes, and increase 
energy resource utilization rates and economic benefits. By the 
year 2000, try to provide 5 percent of the energy resources 
required by the three big forestry enterprises of artificial 
board, paper pulp, and sawn lumber, which means using 620,000 
cubic meters of waste lumber to replace 100,000 tons of standard 
coal, and provide part of the energy resources to develop the 
forest product industry in regions without coal. By 2020, try to 
provide more than 30 percent of the energy resources required by 
the three big forestry enterprises. China's vast agricultural 
and forestry regions currently burn up about 100 million cubic 
meters of timber resources. Extend high efficiency woody 
material energy resources and various types of energy-saving 
stoves to deal with 10 percent of this amount by the year 2000 
(conserving about 10 million cubic meters of burned timber a 
year) and more than 30 percent by 2020. 
  3. Study extracts from rosin and other trees and intensive 
processing technology for them, reform the product mix. 
Accelerate improvements in rosin processing technology, focus on 
improving rosin quality, and integrate with forestry pulp and 
paper making to develop floating oil rosin processing 
technology. Do research on production technology for modified 
rosins, shellacs, and other derivatives, achieve product variety 
systemization. Develop separation technology for turpentine and 
other refined oils, and increase the variety of all types of 
sizing material, perfumes, medicines, and other refined chemical 
products. Make refined rosin products comprise one third of the 
450,000 tons of total rosin output and exports account for 
one-half of the total volume of the world's rosin trade by 2000, 
and one-half total output of refined products by 2020. 
  4. Do research on developing new plant resources. Focus on 
research on perfume, medicinal, and edible forest plant 
resources. Do R&amp;D on using 5 to 10 types of new forest plant 
resources by 2000 and 30 to 50 types by 2020. 
  5. Do research on cash forest cultivation and processing and 
utilization technology. Focus on research on selective breeding 
of improved varieties and cultivation technologies for oil tea, 
tung oil, walnuts, Chinese chestnut, persimmon, jujube, desert 
sour jujube, Emblica officindlis Gaertn, Chinese tallow tree, 
raw lacquer, Chinese gall, and other cash forests and some 
fruits and berries, and on new replacement and upgrading and 
processing and utilization technologies, increase output and 
improve quality, and increase output by about 30 percent by the 
year 2000. Do research on storage, transportation, preservation, 
processing, and packaging technology for cash forest products 
and on intensive processing and comprehensive utilization 
technology for sideline products and leftovers, serve 
mountainous region development, increased product value, exports 
to earn foreign exchange, and improved results. Propose a series 
of appropriate technologies for product processing and 
comprehensive utilization by 2000. Move some superior quality 
products into the international market by 2020, increase their 
competitiveness and foreign exchange earnings capability. 
<H5>  F. Research on the application of soft science in forestry </H5>
science decision making and modernized management. 
  1. Research on forestry development strategies and policies. 
Do research on forestry development strategies and models and on 
development strategies and comprehensive programs to accelerate 
cultivation, reinforce protection, and rationally develop and 
utilize forest resources, research on directional cultivation of 
short-schedule industrial timber and processing and utilization 
technology systems, and on regional development strategies and 
strategies for developing economic diversification in forest 
regions. Do research on forestry economic policies, industrial 
policies, price policies, S&amp;T policies and input/output 
policies, and do research on forestry property systems. Propose 
comprehensive research reports on forestry development 
strategies and policies by 2000 and propose quantitative 
indicator systems by 2020. 
  2. Research on reform of the forestry system and management. 
Undertake research on dynamic analysis of reform of the forestry 
economic and S&amp;T systems and construction and reform 
development 
trends in foreign countries, and the goals, environment, and 
condition of reform, and research on forestry and forestry 
S&amp;T 
operational mechanisms. Do research on all categories of 
management (including skilled personnel, enterprises, 
administration, S&amp;T, information, economics, etc.), propose 
forestry and forestry S&amp;T system reform models by 2000. 
  3. Research on evaluation and countermeasures. Do research 
on 
forestry and forestry S&amp;T development evaluation indicator 
systems and research on comprehensive evaluation of forestry 
development, evaluating the implementation of major programs and 
policies, evaluating government decision making behavior, 
evaluating the economic results of extending and applying S&amp;T 
achievements, evaluating forestry economics and S&amp;T 
strengths, 
establishing and evaluating forestry information systems, and 
countermeasures and contingency systems for major forestry 
problems, and propose a multi-objective evaluation system by 
2000. 
<H5>  G. Forestry applied basic research. </H5>
  1. Research on the application of biotechnology in the realm 
of forestry. Lay a good foundation by 2000. Open up new tree 
breeding technologies and at least five monoploid cultivation 
technologies for use in afforestation and tree planting, 
selectively breed two to three improved varieties, and use 
sifting of somatic cell mutations to select four to five new 
varieties. Apply genetic recombination technology to make 
important breakthroughs in the areas of developing microbial 
insecticides and lignin degrading enzymes. Do research on 
technologies to supply protein feeds from forestry production 
residues such as wood chips, twigs, fiberboard production waste 
water, and so on. Use wood and plant cell suspension cultivation 
to produce saponin, organic soda, pigments, and so on. Develop 
in depth from 2000 to 2020 and make important breakthroughs in 
particular in the areas of cultivating new varieties, shortening 
tree growth schedules, producing protein feeds, and so on. 
  2. Research on forest ecology systems. Establish 20 forest 
ecology positioning stations throughout China in different 
climatic zones by 2000, develop research on the forces of 
production in forest ecology systems, research on system 
structures, functions, and comprehensive benefits, and research 
on the role of systems in maintaining dynamic equilibrium in the 
geosphere and biosphere and on the effects of human social and 
economic activity on them and countermeasures. Undertake 
research on atmosphere pollution, especially the decline of 
forests due to acid rain. By 2020, perfect ecological quotas, 
regulations, and standards to regulate the use of forest 
resources and protect the ecology and environment and on its 
harmful impacts. 
  3. Research on basic problems related to forestry. Do 
research on forestry genetics, tree growth and development 
mechanisms and control technologies, tree water content 
physiology and soil water and fertility supply and demand 
mechanisms, tree photosynthetic respiration and metabolism 
routes, paragenetic nitrogen-fixing microorganisms and 
bacteriorhizae, the material properties of lumber, fluid 
dynamics and engineering dynamics, tree chemical reaction 
mechanisms and catalysis mechanisms, and so on, enter the 
applications stage by 2000 and integrate with applied research 
by 2020 to gradually form forces of production. 
<H5>  Water Conservancy </H5>
  Water is an important material foundation on which mankind 
depends for its existence and production, one of our nation's 
main resources, and an important factor that can promote or 
restrict economic and social development. 
  China has many rivers and vast bodies of water, abundant 
hydraulic resources, great hydropower and water-borne transport 
development potential, and a long history of magnificent 
achievements in water conservancy construction and preventing 
water disasters. However, our water resources are very low in 
amounts available per capita and several cities in the north 
China region and coastal areas have increasingly serious water 
shortages and water pollution. Added to the extremely uneven 
temporal and spatial distributions of our precipitation, there 
are frequent rains and waterlogging alternating with droughts. 
The flood prevention capabilities of our rivers vary widely and 
flood disasters are still serious threats to social and economic 
development. Moreover, there is serious soil erosion in the 
upstream regions and riverbed silting in downstream regions of 
several rivers that exacerbate the dangers of flooding. For this 
reason, a high degree of attention to water conservancy 
construction is a major topic that China is facing. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development objectives for the water conservancy industry </H5>
in the year 2000. 
  1. Establish a scientific system for water resource 
management, formulate and perfect laws, regulations, policies, 
and management systems related to water, strengthen modernized 
management facilities. 
  2. Consolidate and improve flood prevention capabilities on 
our seven biggest rivers. We should adopt effective 
countermeasures in key river segments and key cities on the 
middle and lower reaches of the Chang Jiang, Huang He, Huai He, 
Hai He, Songhua Jiang, Liao He, and Zhu Jiang to raise flood 
resistant standards up to the biggest floods that have occurred 
during this century. 
  3. Achieve a preliminary lessening of water shortage 
problems 
in north China and key cities. Increase total annual water 
supplies to industry and agriculture throughout China from the 
present 470 billion cubic meters to 510 billion cubic meters 
and, in accordance with the principle of comprehensively 
reducing expenditures and appropriate broadening sources of 
income along with reinforcing conservation in water use and 
planned water use, focus on building several water source 
projects such as diverting the Huang He into Shanxi, diverting 
the Huang He into Baiyangdian, diverting the Huang He into 
Qingdao, the eastern line for diverting water from southern to 
northern China, and other multi-basin water diversion projects 
and a small number of key water impoundment projects to 
compensate for inadequate water sources in northern China while 
at the same time actively resolving the problems of rural areas 
with water source difficulties and drinking water for people and 
livestock in pastoral regions. 
  4. Strengthen farmland drought resistance and waterlogging 
elimination capabilities, newly develop an irrigated area of 80 
million mu, increase and improve a drainage area of 40 million 
mu. 
  5. Develop the hydroelectric power industry. Develop our 
hydropower installed generating capacity from the present 
30,190MW to 80,000MW, including development of small-scale 
hydropower in rural areas from 11,000MW to 22,000MW. 
  6. Develop the water-borne transportation industry. Focus on 
building shipping channels on the Chang Jiang, Zhu Jiang, 
Heilong Jiang, Huai He, Beijing-Hanzhou Canal, and other trunks, 
extend the high-grade shipping channel course for 300 to 500 ton 
and larger vessels by a factor of almost one. Use improvement of 
the mouths of the Chang Jiang and Zhu Jiang to increase water 
depths and raise the maritime freight passage grade. 
  7. Develop the aquaculture industry. Attain a reservoir 
aquaculture breeding area of 24 million mu. 
  8. Gain preliminary control of water pollution on primary 
rivers and attain an area of 750,000 square kilometers for soil 
erosion control. 
<H5>  B. Water conservancy development objectives for 2020 </H5>
  Based on the need for further development of our national 
economy, achieve a universal increase in flood prevention 
standards on large rivers that can prevent the biggest floods 
that have occurred during this century, and focus on the ability 
to prevent floods that occur at a frequency of once every 100 
years in key cities; attain 160,000MW in hydropower development 
and utilization; attain a farmland irrigation area of 900 
million mu and basically control the easily waterlogged area; 
basically control water source pollution; further control soil 
erosion; make new developments in water-borne transportation, 
aquaculture, and other industries. Coordinate water source 
development and utilization with social and economic development 
and ecological and environmental development. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  To achieve the above development objectives for the water 
conservancy industry, along with increasing material inputs and 
increasing and improving engineering equipment, fully rely on 
science and technology, use technical progress and scientific 
management as a pillar, and fully foster the benefits of 
improving resources and engineering equipment. The focus of 
water conservancy S&amp;T development is on preventing flooding, 
waterlogging, and drought disasters, developing and utilizing 
water resources, conserving water use, improving results in 
water conservancy, improving the water conservancy environment, 
and other important problems, undertaking research ranging from 
macro decision making to key technical measures, and providing a 
scientific foundation for developing water conservancy to meet 
our national economic and social development requirements. 
<H5>  A. Flood control on rivers </H5>
  1. Countermeasures and important technical problems related 
to effectively controlling normal floods and the biggest floods 
that have occurred on key river segments during this century, 
resisting huge floods, urban flood control, and so on. 
  2. Water quality and working conditions forecasting, flood 
monitoring and warning devices, rapid information processing 
facilities, and modernized flood control dispatching technology; 
precipitation forecasting technologies, especially for 
rainstorms, increased projection periods and accuracy of flood 
predictions. 
  3. Safe construction of floodwater impoundment regions, the 
question of rational utilization of land and readjustment of 
production structures. 
  4. Flood disaster control and prevention in mountainous 
regions and hilly regions and technical measures for dealing 
urban flooding from rains. 
  5. Compile national flood prevention protection region risk 
maps, flood avoidance evacuation implementation programs, and so 
on. 
  6. Tactics and measures to reduce losses from flood 
disasters. 
<H5>  B. Water resource development, utilization, and management. </H5>
  1. Water resource comprehensive development deployments and 
industrial and mining enterprise deployments, urban development 
scale optimization and coordination. 
  2. Balanced supply and demand and countermeasures for 
national water resources and water resources in primary cities 
of north China, northwest China, northeast China, and along the 
coast. 
  3. Multi-basin water diversion and key water impoundment 
project technical, economic, and environmental comprehensive 
demonstrations and their key technologies. 
  4. Rainwater, surface water, and groundwater ``three 
waters'' 
conversion laws; using underground reservoirs for regulation of 
water resources and artificial groundwater replenishment 
technologies. 
  5. Seawater utilization and desalinization technology; 
artificial rainfall enhancement technology; saltwater upgrading 
and utilization technology. 
  6. Water resource management models and optimized 
dispatching 
technology. 
  7. Urban and rural water supply technology. 
<H5>  C. Hydroelectric power generation. </H5>
  1. Hydraulic resource system planning theory; large and 
medium-sized hydropower station and cascade hydropower station 
cluster optimized development sequences and optimum parameters; 
hydropower station static and dynamic economic benefits analysis 
and key technologies in project construction; comprehensive 
development and utilization technology integrated with large and 
medium-sized hydropower stations (see the Energy Resource Medium 
and Long-Term Science and Technology Development Program for 
details). 
  2. Using new technologies in rural small-scale hydropower to 
reduce project costs and replacement and upgrading of existing 
hydropower stations. 
  3. Standardization, systemization, and model spectrum 
development for water turbine generators and electromechanical 
products. 
<H5>  D. Farmland water conservancy </H5>
  1. New irrigation technology; new electromechanical 
irrigation and drainage technology centered on energy 
conservation; wind powered, hydraulic, solar powered, and other 
new water-lifting equipment. 
  2. Technical upgrading in irrigation regions; irrigation 
silt 
treatment technology for diversion of the Huang He in the lower 
reaches of the Huang He. 
  3. Waterlogged and marshy low-output field water conservancy 
improvement technology; soil salinization-alkalinization 
prevention technology and water salinity monitoring and 
forecasting technology. 
  4. Water conservancy technology for key agricultural 
development regions, the Huang-Huai-Hai and San Jiang Plains, 
and so on; high-lift irrigation in northwest China; tropical 
crop irrigation and beach development and utilization, and so on. 
  5. Pastoral region water conservancy and drinking water 
technical measures for people and livestock in water-short 
regions. 
<H5>  E. Water conservancy environment, water source protection, </H5>
water and soil preservation. 
  1. The impact of human activity on the aquatic environment; 
the mutual effects of water conservancy project construction and 
the ecology and environment; assessment of the environmental 
impact of water projects; land water nutrient enrichment 
development laws and improvement measures; urban water 
conservancy environmental problems; regional economic 
development and water resource protection measures; 
environmental impacts following multi-basin water diversion and 
regional water resource reallocation and countermeasures. 
  2. Laws of conversion of water-borne pollutants; standards 
for controlling the total amount of pollutants and controlling 
their concentration; water quality monitoring and comprehensive 
pollution treatment technologies; rational exploitation and 
protection of groundwater resources (see the part on the 
Environment, Ecology, and Social Development Program for 
details). 
  3. Planning and comprehensive improvement of different 
categories of water and soil preservation regions and small 
river basins; technical standards for water and soil 
preservation, macro dynamic monitoring of water loss and soil 
erosion and the ecology and environment. 
<H5>  F. Water-borne transportation. </H5>
  Interior river shipping channel network programs, optimized 
deployment demonstrations, and benefits evaluation; improvement 
technologies for meandering shipping channels; the impact of 
high dams and large reservoirs on upstream and downstream 
shipping channels and improvement measures; comprehensive 
improvement countermeasures to increase shipping channel water 
depths at the mouths of the Chang Jiang, Zhu Jiang, and other 
major rivers. 
<H5>  G. Water-saving technology. </H5>
  1. Standards, models, and implementation policies for 
water-saving agriculture, water-saving industry, and 
water-saving society. 
  2. Water-saving crop irrigation systems; farmland irrigation 
technology; farmland rainfall and soil water utilization and 
preservation, new materials to inhibit evaporation of soil 
water; utilization of recovered water in irrigation regions. 
  3. Economical utilization and reutilization technology for 
industrial water; conversion of industrial polluted water to a 
resource and its recovery and utilization. 
  4. City and town water supply standards and water-saving 
facilities and measures. 
  5. Water price policies. 
<H5>  H. Hydraulic project construction. </H5>
  1. Basic characteristics of tall earth and rock dam 
structural materials and seepage stabilization and control; 
characteristics of concrete in tall concrete dams, high dam body 
types, stress, and strain and its optimization; concrete-faced 
rock-fill dams, rolled concrete dams, directional blasting for 
rock-fill dams, and other dam structure technologies; high dam 
floodwater discharge energy dissipation technology. 
  2. Analysis of the stability and deformation of high dams on 
complex bases; leakage prevention and consolidation processing 
of thick capping strata and karst regions; dam base and side 
slope destabilization and damage mechanisms and safety 
improvement technologies; grouting design theory, materials, and 
techniques. 
  3. The stability of rock surrounding large underground 
chambers; ground stress fields and the engineering geology 
characteristics of deeply buried long tunnels; rock explosion 
forecasting and prevention; interaction of underground chamber 
linings with surrounding rock, role and design of anchor sprayed 
structures; rapid excavation comprehensive construction 
technology for chambers; soft rock and soil body hole (or pipe 
passageway) formation technology. 
  4. Intersecting engineering technology in multi-basin water 
diversion; leakage prevention and collapse prevention technology 
for open water transmission canals. 
  5. Earthquake resistance technology for hydraulic structures 
in earthquake regions; anti-freezing technology for hydraulic 
structures in frozen regions; engineering and construction 
technology for marsh regions. 
  6. Mechanization of project construction. 
  7. New engineering materials. 
  8. Dealing with reservoir inundation, resettlement 
arrangements and environmental capacity, questions of 
resettlement compensation standards and developmental 
resettlement. 
<H5>  I. Hydraulic project management. </H5>
  1. Large dam and slope danger elimination consolidation 
technology, construction techniques, and equipment. 
  2. Hydraulic project detection and hydraulic structure 
safety 
monitoring technology; development of instruments and gauges and 
their systemization and standardization, slope and dam hidden 
danger detection technology. 
  3. Hydraulic project durability and anti-aging technology; 
engineering maintenance and river channel controlled guidance 
project replacement technology. 
  4. Rust prevention and corrosion prevention for metallic 
structures and their components. 
  5. Comprehensive utilization and management in reservoir 
fishery and water conservancy projects. 
<H5>  J. Huang He improvement and basin development. </H5>
  1. Huang He basin socioeconomic development trends and 
development and improvement strategies. Water conservancy 
economic development models for different types of regions; 
development prospects for downstream river channels and analysis 
and demonstration of future solutions. 
  2. Observation research on water and silt changes in the 
Huang He and laws of changes in water and soil loss in 
geological and geomorphological evolution processes, 
establishment of water current and silt digital models. 
  3. Research on flood control and icing prevention 
countermeasures in the lower reaches of the Huang He and on 
river channel silt reduction in the lower reaches. Modern flood 
control communications and dispatching command systems; flood 
control administrations and prevention countermeasures in the 
lower reaches; silt prevention and accumulation reduction 
measures. 
  4. Research on water resource utilization and water resource 
protection in the Huang He basin, research on water resource 
economic models; research on water-saving technology; runoff 
regulation and optimized dispatching in the upper, middle, and 
lower reaches; water pollution prevention countermeasures and 
water quality monitoring and forecasting. 
  5. Reach on the Huang He ecology and environment. 
  6. Rational development and utilization of loess plateau 
land 
resources and water and soil preservation and wind prevention, 
sand consolidation technology. 
  7. Research on improvement of the mouth of the Huang He and 
comprehensive development of its delta. 
<H5>  K. Chang Jiang improvement and basin development. </H5>
  1. Water and soil preservation in the upper reaches of the 
Chang Jiang and river channel improvement in the middle and 
lower reaches; lake region improvement; research on 
comprehensive development of water resources on the trunk and 
tributaries and on long-range flood control strategies. 
  2. Research on flood control on the Chang Jiang and 
improving 
the flood control benefits of the Three Gorges project. 
  3. Research on silt laws at the Three Gorges project and 
their impact on river potential in the middle and lower reaches 
of the Chang Jiang and their relationship to river and lake 
evolution. 
  4. Geological problems in the Three Gorges project reservoir 
and dam regions and environmental geology issues. 
  5. Developmental resettlement in the Three Gorges project 
and 
its impact on the ecology and environment; economic analysis of 
the Three Gorges project. 
  6. Comprehensive improvement and comprehensive development 
technology for the mouth of the Chang Jiang. 
<H5>  L. Water conservancy applied basic research. </H5>
  1. The occurrence and evolutionary characteristics and basic 
laws of flood, waterlogging, and drought disasters. 
  2. Farmland waterlogging disaster occurrence laws and water 
salt movement laws. 
  3. Water loss and soil erosion laws and soil erosion moduli. 
  4. Silt movement mechanisms and riverbed evolution and river 
mouth problems. 
  5. High speed current characteristics; non-constant flow and 
turbulent flow theory. 
  6. Soil static and dynamic state basic properties and basic 
theories. 
  7. Rock (body) basic mechanical properties and deformation 
and destruction mechanisms. 
  8. Concrete fracturing theory and strength theory. 
  9. Hydraulic machinery optimized design computation methods 
and the impact of sand-carrying flows on hydraulic machinery. 
  10. Comprehensive research on hydraulic project safety, 
benefits, and risks. 
  11. The regional ecological and environmental impact of 
hydraulic projects. 
  12. Macro decision making and demonstration methods for 
hydraulic projects. 
<H5>  M. Research on water conservancy development strategies. </H5>
  1. Water conservancy economic theory; water conservancy 
technology policies and water conservancy economic policies. 
  2. Water management systems and scientific water law and 
regulation systems matched to the ``Water Law''. 
  3. Models for coordination of water resource development and 
utilization with national economic development. 
  4. The relationships of water disasters to forests, water 
resources to forests, and basin improvement and forests. 
<H5>  Energy Resources </H5>
  Energy resources are a strategic focus of China's economic 
and social development in the present stage. China's 
industrialization is far from completed, and for a relatively 
long time the development of basic industry and communication 
and transportation, which consume large amounts of energy, will 
be a prerequisite for economic growth. For us to rely on 7 
percent of the world's cultivated land to improve food supplies 
for 22 percent of the world's population, we must invest large 
amounts of energy resources to achieve agricultural 
modernization. People's household consumption is an embodiment 
of the ultimate utilization of energy resources. In modern 
society, per capita energy consumption to attain a relatively 
prosperous life is about 1.5 tons of standard coal. For this 
reason, the prospects for China's modernization depend to a 
substantial extent on adequate supplies and effective 
utilization of energy resources. Thus, we should give them full 
attention. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies </H5>
  1. Year 2000 
  --Combine development and conservation. By 2000, strive to 
attain 1.4 billion tons of standard coal in primary energy 
resource output; attain power output of 1.2 trillion kWh; 
achieve an annual energy conservation rate of 3.5 percent in 
industrial departments. 
  --Strive to improve the energy resource structure and 
deployment. 
  --Energy development and utilization should focus on 
electric 
power, make coal the foundation, actively develop petroleum and 
natural gas, and make major efforts to develop hydraulic 
resources to develop hydropower and develop nuclear power in a 
planned manner. Rely on S&amp;T, increase energy resource 
production 
and utilization efficiency and utilization of renewable energy 
resources. 
  --Encourage energy conservation. Strengthen energy resource 
scientific management; push forward with technical upgrading to 
conserve energy. 
  --Achieve a preliminary reversal in urban atmospheric 
pollution caused by burning large amounts of coal and ecological 
vicious cycles caused by excessive consumption of energy from 
organic matter in rural areas. 
  2. Year 2020 
  --Form an energy resource system that has a more rational 
structure and deployment and higher production and utilization 
efficiency. Establish large-scale coal-power and 
coal-power-chemical industry base areas. 
  --Develop oil and gas on a large scale in western China and 
offshore and the coal resources of Shanxi, Shaanxi, Inner 
Mongolia, and other regions. 
  --Develop hydraulic resources on a large scale on the trunk 
and tributaries of the Chang Jiang, Huang He, Hongshui He, 
Lancang Jiang, and so on. 
  --Make a major effort to develop nuclear power, natural gas, 
coal-based synthetic fuels, and new energy resources. 
  --Basically solve the energy resource problems of rural 
areas, achieve rural electrification. 
<H5>  B. Science and technology strategic foci. </H5>
  The development of energy S&amp;T must begin with China's 
energy 
resource characteristics and create new forces of production to 
satisfy demand for energy resources from economic growth and 
improvements in the people's lives. The strategic foci are: 
  1. Strengthen the energy resource S&amp;T research and 
development system, improve our own R&amp;D capabilities and our 
imported technology digestion, absorption, and innovation 
capabilities, increase technical reserves; use new technology to 
upgrade the energy resource industry and high energy consumption 
industry, substantially increase energy resource production and 
utilization efficiency and economic benefits. 
  2. Make a major effort to develop new power generation, 
power 
supply, and power utilization technology, promote national 
electrification. Rationally develop and utilize coal resources, 
develop safe and high efficiency new coal mining technology and 
coal processing, combustion, and conversion technology. 
  3. Develop civilian nuclear power technology and new 
petroleum, natural gas, and hydropower exploration and 
development technology, improve the energy resource structure 
and deployment. 
  4. Develop new energy resources and rural energy resource 
technology, fully utilize local energy resources, establish a 
rural energy resource system that uses multiple types of energy 
resources for mutual supplementation. Develop economical and 
appropriate new energy resources and renewable energy resource 
technology, and form a new energy resource industry. 
  5. Develop energy resource environmental technology. The 
focus is on R&amp;D on clean coal technology, nuclear safety 
technology, and rural ecological and environmental technology. 
<H5>  C. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  1. Adopt new technologies and modern management technology 
to 
upgrade the energy resource industry. 
  Year 2000: Attain international levels of the 1980's for 
about 50 percent of the primary technical equipment in the 
energy resource industry. Basically obtain complete sets of 
equipment used in large amounts and over large areas from 
domestic sources and move some technologies and equipment into 
the international market. Increase labor productivity in the 
energy resource industry by 30 percent compared to 1980. 
  Year 2020: Attain international levels of that time for some 
technical equipment, reduce the lag of technical levels for most 
equipment to about 10 years. Be capable of doing our own 
development and manufacturing of large complete sets of 
equipment. 
  2. Promote industrial energy conservation technology. 
  Year 2000: Increase the average efficiency of primary energy 
consuming new equipment products by 3 to 5 percent, increase the 
proportion of energy-saving equipment to 20 percent. 
  Year 2020: Attain international levels at the time for the 
efficiency of some energy-consuming equipment. Complete 
technical upgrading for energy conservation in large and 
medium-sized enterprises. 
  3. Develop new coal extraction and utilization technology. 
  Year 2000: Solve technical problems of hard-to-mine coal 
seams and deep coal seams. Increase the degree of centralization 
in mine production, develop fully mechanized mining equipment at 
the 10,000 tons per day grade and the associated tunneling 
technology and equipment. Gain a basic understanding of safety 
technology to control horrible accidents in mines. Reduce the 
accidental death rate per 1 million tons to 1 in unified 
distribution coal mines, 3 in local state-run mines, and 5 in 
township and town mines. Attain a degree of mechanization in 
extraction and tunneling of 75 percent in unified distribution 
coal mines (including 42 percent in fully mechanized mining), 35 
to 40 percent in local state-run mines, and 15 to 20 percent in 
township and town mines. Develop mining technology and complete 
sets of equipment for 10 million ton grade strip mines, increase 
the proportion of output from strip mines among unified 
distribution coal mines to 12 percent. Gain an understanding of 
coal dressing technology and coal dressing plant automation 
technology at different levels, carry out mechanized processing 
for all raw coal produced in unified distribution coal mines. 
Complete coal-water slurry, circulating fluidized bed, and goal 
gasification combined cycle experimental power plants and 
demonstration plants for methanol produced from coal, shaping 
and pyrolyzation of material extracted from brown coal, combined 
refining of coal and oil, and so on, and gain an understanding 
of new technologies for coal gasification in medium-sized and 
small cities. 
  Year 2020: Begin using robots and artificial intelligence 
technology in underground coal mining, develop remote sensing 
and automation technology, complete research and experiments on 
automated coal extraction work faces and underground coal 
gasification. Wash all coal that should be dressed. Achieve 
large-scale commercial application of coal-based synthetic fuel 
technology. 
  4. Develop new oil and gas exploration and development 
technologies. 
  Year 2000: Solve problems related to improving recovery 
rates 
in late periods of development in old oil fields in eastern 
China. Form matching technologies for exploring and developing 
complex and unusual oil and gas pools and condensed oil pools. 
Gain an understanding of primary oil and gas exploration, 
development, and centralized transmission technologies for 
desert regions, shallow seas, beaches, and offshore areas. 
Approach international levels at the time for primary 
technologies in oil and gas exploration and development. 
  Year 2020: Form a technological system to increase ultimate 
recovery rates that is adapted to the characteristics of China's 
oil and gas pools. Gain an understanding of matching oil and gas 
exploration, development, and centralized transmission 
technologies for desert zones, offshore areas, and mountainous 
areas of southern China as well as internationally competitive 
oil and gas exploration and development technology. 
  5. Improve the reliability, quality, and economy of power 
supplies. 
  Year 2000: For power supply quality, attain a cycle 
deviation 
of 50 plus/minus 0.1 Hz in primary power grids. Attain the 
requirements in the ``National Power Supply and Use Program'' 
for voltage deviations for urban users, adopt high parameter and 
large capacity thermal power generators, attain the availability 
levels of similar generators in foreign countries for large 
generators placed into operation during the 1990's, reduce 
consumption of standard coal to supply power in 2000 to 380 
g/kWh at thermal power plants and reduce coal consumption to 
supply power to 330 g/kWh in the newly installed generating 
capacity in large power grids. Establish equipment and grid 
fault diagnosis and monitoring systems. Digest imported 600MW 
super-critical generators, gain an understanding of ultra-high 
voltage power transmission technology in frigid, high elevation, 
and salty and cloudy regions. 
  Year 2020: Regarding power supply reliability, attain a 
total 
annual power outage time of no more than 10 hours. For power 
supply quality, attain a cycle deviation of 50 plus/minus 0.5 Hz 
and a user voltage deviation of plus/minus 5 percent. Further 
improve generator availability rates. Reduce consumption of 
standard coal to supply power to 360 g/kWh. Gain an 
understanding of 30 MPa steam parameter GW grade super-critical 
generators and 1 GV extra-high voltage power transmission 
technology. 
  6. Develop new hydropower technology. 
  Year 2000: Gain an understanding of advanced technology for 
key hydropower stations on the upper reaches of the Huang He, 
the trunk and tributaries of the upper and middle reaches of the 
Chang Jiang, and the Wu Jiang, Hongshui He, and Lancang Jiang, 
redevelopment technology and power generation ahead of schedule, 
technology for existing hydropower stations, pumped storage 
technology, and variable frequency power generation and low 
water level power generation technology. Adopt new technologies 
to reduce construction costs, shorten construction schedules, 
and increase generator efficiency at hydropower stations. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of the technology for 
construction of large and huge hydropower stations under unique 
and complex natural conditions and large water turbine generator 
and pumped storage generator manufacturing technology. 
  7. Develop nuclear power technology. 
  Year 2000: Gain an understanding of pressurized-water 
nuclear 
power plant technology using 600MW as the primary series and 
advanced nuclear fuel cycle technology. Develop 900MW and 
1,200MW advanced pressurized-water reactors. Do research on 
inherently safe high-temperature gas-cooled reactors and 
pressurized swimming pool-type pressurized water reactors. 
Complete the low-temperature heat supply demonstration reactor. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of inherently safe 
pressurized-water reactors, gain an understanding of and extend 
low-temperature heat supply and heat and power cogeneration 
reactors, do research on and gain an understanding of commercial 
fast neutron breeder reactor and modular high-temperature 
gas-cooled reactor technology and nuclear waste storage and 
nuclear facility retirement technology. 
  8. Develop new energy resources and rural energy resource 
technology. 
  Year 2000: Popularize wood and coal-saving stoves. Increase 
the average thermal efficiency of rural household stoves to 20 
percent. Accelerate electrification. Develop wind power, solar 
power, marine power, hydrogen energy, and other new energy 
resource technologies, improve all types of scattered 
small-scale new energy resource technologies, improve the 
quality and economy of equipment and systems, form a new energy 
resource industry. 
  Year 2020: Basically resolve agricultural production, 
township and town industry, and rural resident household energy 
use problems, achieve rural electrification. Attain 
international levels for small-scale new energy resource 
technology. Gain an understanding of large-scale new energy 
resource development and utilization technology. 
  9. Develop energy resource environmental technology. 
  Year 2000: Solve problems with economical and effective coal 
desulfurization technology, low-pollution fuel technology, and 
coal burning equipment pollutant discharge control technology. 
Gain an understanding of technologies for preventing the 
environmental impact of coal mining on land, the atmosphere, 
water sources, and so on and offshore safe oil extraction 
technology, and establish a nuclear safety technology system. 
  Year 2020: Basically resolve problems related to technology 
for prevention of environmental damage from energy resource 
production and utilization. 
  10. Strengthen energy resource S&amp;T development 
capabilities. 
  Year 2000: Increase annual inputs of energy resource 
industry 
scientific research funds at a rate that exceeds growth in the 
value of output. Improve the quality of all categories of 
personnel, train several S&amp;T personnel at international 
levels. 
Complete several scientific research base areas, laboratories, 
and experimental base areas at international levels. 
  Year 2020: Enable S&amp;T development capabilities to 
satisfy 
energy resource development requirements. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Energy conservation technology. </H5>
  Do research on advanced thermal power technology; surplus 
energy recovery and utilization technology, heat pump 
technology; industrial boiler, kiln, and oven energy 
conservation technology; wind-powered generator and water pump 
system optimized and matching energy conservation upgrading 
technology and other energy conservation technology for 
general-purpose electromechanical products; petroleum and 
petrochemical enterprise system energy conservation technology; 
electrical and electronic energy conservation construction and 
AC speed regulation technology; new types of electric lighting 
sources; household appliance energy conservation technology. 
  Extend heat and power cogeneration; continuous steel casting 
and rolling, aluminum oxide integrated method production, 
outside-the-kiln cement decomposition dry method production, wet 
method chemical fiber spinning, continuous boil-off papermaking, 
and other new industrial technologies; hollow-core bricks and 
new types of wall materials; heat insulation materials; new 
energy-saving technology for vehicles and boats; coal shaping 
and high efficiency stoves. 
  Establish an energy resource management information system; 
implement enterprise energy resource balance standards and 
energy resource audits; do research on energy-saving structure 
technology; develop advanced energy resource measurement gauges 
and energy-consuming equipment automatic control devices. 
<H5>  B. Technical upgrading in existing energy resource </H5>
enterprises. 
  Solve problems with deep coal seam exploration technology in 
old mining regions of east China; improve the reliability and 
economy of existing coal mine extraction and tunneling 
equipment; optimize mine opening deployments, rationally 
centralize production; improve coal extraction technology, 
support technology, and auxiliary transportation equipment; 
perfect mine disaster prevention technology and communications 
systems; do research on extraction technologies for use 
underneath villages, underwater, and in karst water, and surface 
facility protection technology; solve problems with open-cut 
mine ventilation, transportation, and stope technology; do 
research on appropriate technology for integrated upgrading of 
township and town coal mines. 
  Do research on oil and gas distribution laws, 
three-dimensional seismic technology, and new exploratory 
drilling technology for complex fault-blocks and concealed oil 
and gas pools in old oil regions of east China; technology for 
improving ultimate recovery rates in late period of development 
in old oil fields, including: oil pool development seismic 
technology, oil pool digital simulation technology, oil field 
secondary development and readjustment technology, thin oil 
strata and thick oil strata output increasing technology, 
extraction technology for low permeability oil pools, dense oil 
pools, and unique oil and gas pools, tertiary oil extraction 
technology, horizontal drilling technology, and gas exploration 
and development technology for shallow seas with water depths 
less than 5 meters and on beaches. 
  Technology to extend lifespans, improve performance, and 
exploit potential in existing large capacity thermal power 
generators; technology for shifting from oil burning to coal 
burning; technology for upgrading, exploitation of potential, 
capacity expansion, and additional functions at hydropower 
stations; technology to upgrade urban power grids. 
<H5>  C. New coal extraction technology. </H5>
  Do research on mine pressure, rock destruction mechanisms, 
and other mining engineering sciences, overall optimization of 
mine designs and computer-aided design technology, extraction 
techniques and technical equipment for deep mines and 
hard-to-mine coal seams, computer control and automation 
technology for fully-mechanized coal mining equipment and 
systems, and mine small geological structures detection 
measures. Mine auxiliary transportation equipment series. 
Fully-mechanized mining equipment with daily outputs of 10,000 
tons, increase the lifespans and reliability of mining and 
tunnelling equipment components. Develop design and 
manufacturing technologies for large strip mine extraction 
techniques and complete sets of equipment and strip mine slope 
monitoring and handling technology. Perfect vertical shaft, rock 
passageway, and half-coal half-rock passageway tunneling 
equipment, develop new types of large diameter, large depth 
drilling rig assemblies and remote sensing counter-drilling 
drilling rigs to complete shafts greater than 70 meters. Solve 
problems with dynamic pressure, soft rock, and large chamber 
support technology as well as new steel and timber-conserving 
support technology. 
  Year 2020: Develop artificial intelligence industrial robots 
for use in mines. Establish computer monitored and controlled 
automatic mines and commercial underground coal gasification 
stations. 
<H5>  D. Coal mine safety technology. </H5>
  On a foundation of gaining an understanding of the natural 
laws of all types of disasters in mines, especially deep mines, 
establish safety protection systems. Do research on prediction 
and forecasting methods and equipment, multifunction mine 
environment monitoring and control systems and warning and 
communications systems. Do research on improving gas pumping and 
exhaust rates and single coal seam gas pumping and exhaust 
technology, and on coal and gas eruption and carbon dioxide 
eruption prevention technology. Perfect comprehensive dust 
prevention technology. Do research on effective drugs for 
pneumoconiosis pathology. Do research on comprehensive mine fire 
prevention and mining region surface coal fire control 
technology. Do research on comprehensive mine high-temperature 
prevention technology. Establish modern coal mine rescue 
systems. Develop advanced self-rescue and mine disaster rescue 
expedition technology and equipment. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of comprehensive technology 
for controlling mine accidents and advanced mine expedition and 
emergency rescue technology. 
<H5>  E. Clean coal technology. </H5>
  Do research on coal product mix optimization and the 
combustion characteristics of power coal. Develop large open-cut 
mine coal dressing, water-short mining region dry method coal 
dressing, and deep ash removal and desulfurization technology, 
increase automation levels in coal dressing plants. Do research 
on effective powdered coal and coal slurry utilization 
technology. New coal shaping technology and matching stoves, 
lignite material extraction, rapid pyrolysis, and no-bonding 
agent shaping technology. Coal-water mixture preparation, 
pipeline transmission, and combustion technology. Advanced power 
plant conventional pulverized coal boiler technology, 
fluidized-bed combustion technology, coal gasification combined 
cycle power generation technology. Two-stage coal gasification, 
pulverized coal fluidized-bed gasification, and other coal 
gasification technology. Liquid fuels produced from coal, coal 
and oil co-refining and new coal chemistry technology. 
  Year 2020: Extend and apply the above new technologies, gain 
an understanding of coal-based fuel cells and 
magnetohydrodynamic power generation technology. 
<H5>  F. Environmental protection technology in energy resource </H5>
production. 
  Do research on economical and effective coal-burning 
equipment pollutant discharge control technology and power plant 
ash and waste water, coal mine gangue and coal slurry water 
treatment and utilization technology. Mine cave-in regions and 
strip mine emptied extraction region land restoration 
technology, mine water purification technology, and technology 
for preventing pollution from hazardous elements in coal. Oil 
field contaminated water treatment and utilization technology, 
offshore oil extraction pollution prevention technology, 
typhoon-prone marine region safe oil extraction technology. 
Ultra-high voltage power transmission safety technology, 
hydropower project ecological and environmental assessment and 
prevention technology. Nuclear facility safety and environmental 
protection technology, labor protection technology in energy 
resource industry production. 
<H5>  G. Energy resource exploration and development technology </H5>
for west China. 
  Do research on advanced comprehensive exploration technology 
for western coal fields, water-short and water-rich mining 
region hydrogeology and water resource evaluation and 
exploration technology. Coal field development technology for 
regions with large amounts of wind-blown sand and arid regions. 
Seismic exploration technology for oil and gas pools in the 
central parts of the deserts of west China. Ultradeep and 
cluster-type well drilling technology and oil extraction 
technology. Condensed oil and gas field, high-pressure gas 
field, and carbonate rock oil field development technology. 
Desert zone oil and gas field surface structures and centralized 
oil and gas transmission technology. New hydraulic energy 
exploration and development technology and technology for 
transmitting power from west to east China. 
  Year 2020: Adopt new technologies for large-scale 
development 
of the energy resources of western China. 
<H5>  H. Offshore oil and gas exploration and development </H5>
technology. 
  Develop offshore petroleum geology theory for China. Do 
research on the oil and gas distribution laws of important 
petroliferous basins. Open up new realms for oil and gas 
exploration. Do research on new offshore geophysical prospecting 
technology. Comprehensively improve drilling technology, 
numerical controlled logging technology, and oil pool evaluation 
technology. Do research on offshore oil and gas pool development 
project optimization technology, develop simple, portable, 
reusable, and more economical production facilities, develop 
deepwater oil and gas field exploration and development 
technology. 
  Year 2020: Comprehensively develop new offshore oil and gas 
exploration technology, improve the efficiency of geophysical 
prospecting data collecting, processing, and interpretation. 
Gain an understanding of new deepwater oil and gas field 
exploration and development technology and high-temperature 
high-pressure drilling technology. Adopt advanced extraction 
technology. Improve economic results in offshore oil and gas 
production. 
<H5>  I. Natural gas exploration and development technology. </H5>
  Do research on gas pool formation conditions and gas field 
distribution laws, improve natural gas resource evaluation 
methods. Do research on shallow strata and deep gas pool 
seismic, drilling, logging, and gas testing technology; 
extraction technology for all types of gas pools and stable and 
increased output methods; oil field associated gas recovery and 
utilization technology; natural gas processing and centralized 
transmission technology; underground gas storage technology; 
natural gas utilization technology. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of advanced natural gas 
exploration, development, processing, liquefaction, 
transmission, storage, and comprehensive utilization technology. 
<H5>  J. Nuclear power technology. </H5>
  Gain an understanding of pressurized-water reactor nuclear 
power technology, achieve commercialization of nuclear power 
generators, especially with 600MW units as the primary series. 
Solve nuclear power safety and economy problems. Do R&amp;D on 
advanced pressurized-water reactor and inherently safe 
pressurized-water reactor technology, and on advanced nuclear 
fuel cycle technology, including: key nuclear power plant 
equipment, special materials, quality assurance, nuclear 
engineering design and operational management technology; 
advanced uranium ore surveying, prospecting, development, and 
ore dressing technology; new centrifugal method and laser method 
uranium separation and concentration technology; nuclear fuel 
assembly design and manufacturing technology; spent fuel 
reprocessing technology and nuclear waste processing technology. 
Do research on fast neutron breeder reactors, modular 
high-temperature gas-cooled reactors, and high and 
low-temperature nuclear heat supply technology; track 
international nuclear fusion technology. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of inherently safe 
pressurized-water reactor and fast neutron breeder reactor 
technology, make breakthroughs in key nuclear fusion technology. 
<H5>  K. Hydropower engineering technology. </H5>
  Do research on advanced hydropower project survey and design 
technology. Work on high dam design and construction technology 
under complex geological conditions, deep capping strata 
foundation and karst region dam construction technology, large 
underground project rapid construction technology, and 
engineering geology problems related to high dam and 
reservoir-induced earthquakes and landslides near dams in 
reservoir regions. Do research on low-head power generation 
technology and variable-frequency power generation in the 
hydropower station construction process. Do research on large 
capacity and high specific rotation speed water turbine 
generators and large capacity pumped-storage generators, new air 
corrosion-resistant and wear-resistant materials for water 
turbines, and high-head ship locks and large ship lifts. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of hugh hydropower projects 
and their associated technology. 
<H5>  L. Advanced thermal power technology. </H5>
  Achieve a shift to domestic production and improvement of 
300 
and 600MW imported generators. Do research on fuel 
characteristics and advanced fuel technologies. Do research on 
high-performance auxiliary equipment, improve coal unloading, 
coal allocation, coal transportation, ash removal, and water 
treatment technologies. Optimize cooling systems, gain an 
understanding of air cooling technology and other technology to 
reduce water consumption. Improve peak regulation operating 
supervision and on-line diagnosis technology for power 
generation equipment, and improve equipment reliability, 
generator safety monitoring and control, and automation levels. 
Develop super-critical generators and large capacity gas-fired 
turbines with inlet temperatures greater than 1,200C. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of 30 MPa GW-grade 
supercritical thermal power generator technology. 
<H5>  M. Advanced power transmission and allocation and power grid </H5>
technology. 
  Improve 500 kV power transmission and transformation 
equipment and line construction technology. Do research on 500 
kV DC power transmission technology. Do research on the adoption 
of extra-high voltage zinc oxide lightning arrestors, 
SF[.sub]6[/] gas insulators, and fully-sealed combination 
electrical devices. Improve on-line monitoring technology for 
power transmission and transformation, urban power supply 
technology, and load management technology. Perfect electric 
power system protection and safety automatic devices and on 
remote-control and dedicated communications systems, establish 
integrated power grid computer management and information 
systems, raise automation levels in grid dispatching. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of 1,000 kV power 
transmission and transformation technology and large-area 
integrated grid technology. Integrate with power grid advanced 
dispatching technology and agricultural monitoring and control 
technology. 
<H5>  N. New energy resource technology. </H5>
  Do research on fast-growing fuel forest selective breeding 
and cultivation technology, new biogas pit fermentation 
technology and matching technology, urban organic waste methane 
production technology, biomass gasification and liquefaction 
technology, and trash power generation technology; hot gas 
generator technology; high-efficiency, low-cost photocells, 
advanced solar energy utilization technology; economical and 
appropriate medium-sized and small wind-powered generators; 
advanced geothermal power generation and cascade utilization 
technology; 10MW-grade tidal energy power station technology; 
hydrogen energy development and utilization technology. 
  Year 2020: Gain an understanding of large-scale centralized 
utilization new energy resource technology. 
<H5>  O. Energy resource soft science research. </H5>
  Establish democratic and scientific decision making systems 
and mechanisms and decision making support systems, and a 
national energy resource information system. Do research on 
national energy resource model systems and databases adapted to 
the characteristics of the commodity economy. Improved energy 
resource statistical methods and indicator systems. Develop 
advanced energy resource soft science research methods. Do 
research on energy resource economics. Perfect state energy 
resource technology policies and economic policies. Do research 
on rational energy resource structures and deployments and on 
rational energy resource utilization. Do research on formulation 
of the China Electrification Program and Energy Resource Region 
Program. Formulate a national energy resource law. Do research 
on the international energy resource environment, international 
energy resource commodities, technology trade strategies and 
policies, and international comparisons of energy resource 
consumption. 
<H5>  Communication and Transportation </H5>
  China's communication and transportation industry is 
composed 
of five parts, railroads, water-borne transport, highways, civil 
aviation, and pipelines, and it has a large amount of the 
state's important basic facilities. As a unique material 
production development and public service department, the 
communication and transportation industry is the infrastructure 
of our national economy, a prerequisite for social expanded 
reproduction and development of the commodity economy, and an 
essential guarantee for normal operation of economic activities 
and the people's lives. Communication and transportation also 
play an extremely important role in strengthening international 
relationships, consolidating national defense, promoting 
national unity, emergency and disaster relief, and other areas. 
The essence and role of the communication and transportation 
industry determines its status as a vanguard sector of our 
national economy. 
  China has a vast territory and huge population, a long 
coastline, and a network of rivers that have potential for 
developing a variety of transportation modes. There are 
substantial imbalances in the geographic configuration of 
resource distributions, territorial development, industrial 
deployments, and economic development. Moreover, there has been 
flourishing development of the commodity economy, continual 
urbanization of our population, and growing tourism demand in 
the past several years. These form the basic configuration for 
the high-intensity freight flow and rapidly-growing 
multiple-bearing passenger flow from west to east and from north 
to south in China's communication and transportation. Based on 
China's natural and economic conditions, railroads will be the 
main force in transportation of large amounts of freight and in 
medium and long-distance passenger and freight transportation in 
China for a substantial period of time to come. Highways are the 
main force in short-distance passenger and freight 
transportation and will gradually play a key role in 
transporting high-grade industrial and agricultural products, 
transporting fresh and easily-spoiled freight, and 
medium-distance passenger transportation. Water-borne transport 
is the main force in foreign trade transportation and one of the 
primary modes for transportation of large amounts of bulk 
freight. Civil aviation has enormous advantages in long-distance 
passenger transportation and in transportation of valuable, 
emergency, live, and other freight. Pipelines are the primary 
transportation mode for petroleum, natural gas, and other fluid 
materials, and regions with the proper conditions are actively 
developing pipeline coal transmission. 
  The development of the communication and transportation 
industry must be based on reliance on S&amp;T progress. The next 
30 
years will be a period of sustained and arduous efforts to 
achieve major historic developments in our communication and 
transportation industry, and we must certainly strive hard to 
reinforce communication and transportation S&amp;T work, focus on 
developing advanced and appropriate technology, and form forces 
of production as quickly as possible. These are the unshirkable 
historic tasks for S&amp;T work. 
<H5>  I. Strategic Objectives </H5>
  Based on the strategic objectives for the development of 
China's national economy, the relevant areas have predicted that 
by the year 2000, there will be about 1.5-fold and 2-fold 
increases, respectively, in the amount of freight turnover in 
society as a whole and the amount of passenger turnover. By 
2020, they estimate that there will be another about 1-fold 
increase in the amount of passenger and freight turnover in 
society as a whole compared to 2000. 
<H5>  A. Strategic objectives for development of the communication </H5>
and transportation industry. 
  On a foundation of rational and coordinated development of 
all modes of transportation, gradually form a communication and 
transportation network that is complete and has a clear 
separation of layers, and make a major effort to develop 
integrated transportation and establish a communication and 
transportation industry with comprehensive transportation system 
as the primary axis to obtain greater economic and social 
benefits with fewer inputs and to establish the corresponding 
communication and transportation industry. With a prerequisite 
of investment, policy, and S&amp;T guarantees, communication and 
transportation should make a transition by the year 2000 from 
serious stagnation to basic adaptation; by 2020, try to complete 
a communication and transportation system with perfect 
facilities, advanced technical equipment, modernized management, 
freely-flowing goods, and convenient passenger movement that is 
safe, fast, comfortable, and economical. The communication and 
transportation industry will meet our national economic and 
social development requirements. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives for communication and transportation </H5>
science and technology. 
  The development of communication and transportation must 
rely 
on science and technology, and S&amp;T work must be oriented 
toward 
the development of communication and transportation. We must 
strengthen research on the interrelationship of communication 
and transportation with our national economy, the development of 
a comprehensive transportation system, and other areas, improve 
macro decision making levels, adopt advanced and appropriate 
technology, actively do good digestion, absorption, innovation, 
and improvement of imported technology, form some ``composite 
technologies'' that integrate traditional technology with high 
technology and new technology, and shift China's communication 
and transportation industry onto the track of modernized 
management methods and modernized basic facilities and equipment. 
  1. Railroads. Gradually achieve a shift to electrification 
and internal combustion in traction power, a shift to heavy 
modes in track structures, modernization of transportation 
management, automation of transportation process control, and 
mechanization of track maintenance, construction, loading and 
unloading, and locomotive repair activities. Extend heavy load 
transportation technology, place high-speed railways into 
operation, and develop suburban passenger transportation 
systems. During this century, attain an average traction weight 
of more than 2,900 tons for freight trains, a daily transit 
density of 120 pairs on busy trunklines, an average 
transportation density of 35 million ton/kilometers, and a 
maximum speed of 140 kilometers/hour on passenger trains. By 
2020, open dedicated coal haulage lines with unit trains of more 
than 10,000 tons and complete one or two high-speed passenger 
railways with a speed of 200 kilometers/hour in regions of 
particularly busy passenger transport. Complete advanced 
railways that have Chinese characteristics fused with 
international trends, developed line networks, powerful 
capacity, high efficiency, and good benefits that are safe and 
reliable and have superior-quality services. 
  2. Water-borne transport. Gradually achieve scientific 
water-borne transport decision making, equipment and management 
modernization, and mechanization of loading, unloading, and 
construction activities. Complete a technologically advanced 
open seas flotilla that is internationally competitive, focus on 
strengthening north-south maritime transportation passageways 
and develop the corresponding interior river ship transportation 
on the Chang Jiang, Zhu Jiang, Beijing-Hangzhou Canal, Huai He, 
and Heilong Jiang to gradually form primary water-borne 
transport channels along the coast and on the Chang Jiang, Zhu 
Jiang, Beijing-Hangzhou Canal, and so on. By 2000, increase the 
proportion of containerized freight shipping for mixed foreign 
trade cargo to more than 50 percent and the proportion of 
maritime large volume freight decentralized loading and 
transportation to more than 95 percent, raise the average 
tonnage of ships on interior rivers from the present 92 tons to 
200 tons, broadly apply sectional barge top propulsion 
transportation, and basically popularize rolling loading 
transportation on continental island and straits shipping lines. 
Significantly improve efficiency in ship transportation, reduce 
energy consumption by 10 to 20 percent, and reduce the 
communication accident rate by 20 to 40 percent. By 2020, finish 
building China's water-borne transportation industry into a 
transportation force with perfect facilities, advanced 
equipment, and scientific management that is safe and reliable 
and has significant benefits and that plays a major role in our 
national economy. 
  3. Highways. Establish a highway communication system with 
the technical characteristics of higher speeds, higher 
efficiency, larger vehicles, and more specialized uses, achieve 
modernization of management, design, construction, maintenance, 
and transportation services. Use increased highway routes and 
higher highway grades and service levels to gradually build a 
national trunkline highway system composed of high-speed 
highways and grade one and two dedicated automobile highways. By 
2000, form a pyramid with a primary highway framework; by 2020, 
basically complete 12 20,000- to 25,000-kilometer national 
trunklines, centralize 50 to 60 percent of the total amount of 
highway communication, improve mixed communication, and enable 
primary key communication facilities and cities larger than 1 
million in population to enter primary trunklines within 2 
hours. At the same time, establish safe, fast, convenient, and 
economical modern truck transportation systems, significantly 
increase the average shipping distance of trucks, attain maximum 
speeds of up to 120 kilometers/hour, which is approximately 
double average speeds, reduce the communication accident rate by 
more than 50 percent, reduce unit fuel consumption per 100 
ton/kilometers by 40 percent, and approximately double truck 
transport efficiency. 
  4. Civil aviation. Take aim at advanced international 
technical levels, adopt international standards, strengthen 
technology importing, digestion, and absorption; reinforce 
capital construction, improve the deployment of the factors of 
production. Approach advanced international levels in 2000 in 
airports, runways, repair facilities, transportation services, 
personnel quality, and other areas. By 2020 basically achieve 
modernization of civil aviation technical equipment, basic 
facilities, and transportation management and leap into advanced 
world ranks in safety and reliability, flight schedule normalcy, 
aircraft utilization rates, labor productivity, passenger 
service, and other primary economic and technical indicators. 
  5. Pipelines. Prior to 2000, focus on solving pipeline 
construction technology problems in regions with horrible 
natural conditions and under special circumstances and pipeline 
transmission technical problems for highly viscous and easily 
condensed crude oil. Achieve sealed transmission and optimized 
operation of most pipelines and reduce overall energy 
consumption in crude oil pipeline transmission by 10 percent. 
Use scientific research to attack problems with key technologies 
and equipment, gain a comprehensive understanding of slurry 
preparation, transmission, dehydration, and other technology for 
pipeline coal transmission and basically achieve a shift to 
domestic production of large special-purpose equipment. Prior to 
2020, expand the scope of pipeline transmission and further 
improve pipeline transmission technology and technical equipment 
levels. 
  On a foundation of promoting technical progress and 
comprehensive development in all types of transportation modes, 
overall development levels for S&amp;T in China's communication 
and 
transportation industry in 2000 should approach or attain levels 
in the developed countries of the early 1980's, and the 
technical staffs and specialized scientific research and 
extension systems at all levels should basically satisfy the 
requirements of communication and transportation development. By 
2020, strive to attain advanced international levels of the 
early 21st Century in primary scientific and technical realms 
and attain advanced international levels in certain fields to 
form a communication and transportation S&amp;T system with 
Chinese 
characteristics. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Reinforce soft science research, raise overall </H5>
transportation macro decision making levels. 
  1. Do R&amp;D on national communication and transportation 
policy 
models. Focus on research on basic communication and 
transportation facilities and equipment information management 
technology, on data collection, processing, forecasting, and 
allocation technology for large volume freight transportation, 
centralized container transportation, and passenger 
transportation flow directions and flow amounts. Based on the 
principles of systems engineering and communication and 
transportation economics, do research on the inter-feedback 
effects between communication and transportation and development 
of the national economy. In 2000, establish a communication and 
transportation policy model prototype. In 2020, provide computer 
software support systems for formulating the proportional 
relationship between socioeconomic and transportation 
development, strategies for the coordinated development of all 
types of transportation modes, multi-objective evaluation of 
program foundations, feasibility, and comprehensive 
transportation systems for major national transportation 
passageways, and other important problems. 
  2. Actively study ways for railroads to implement the 
state's 
macro coordination and control functions, railroad management 
systems, administrative models, investment mechanisms, 
enterprise economic environments, and rail network development 
scale and deployments and coordination and optimization of them 
with other transportation modes. Establish passenger and freight 
transportation volume forecasting models and unified technical 
economics indicator systems and optimized models for rational 
matching up of train weights, densities, and speeds. Provide new 
methods for railroad cost/benefit analysis, research on railroad 
construction feasibility and the impact of technical progress on 
railroad development, and so on. 
  3. Focus on research on water-borne transportation 
development strategies, establish macro decision making support 
systems. Establish basic information databases for water-borne 
transportation, develop passenger and freight transportation 
forecasting models and transportation network optimization 
simulation models. Do research on water-borne transportation 
industry policies, macro coordination and control functions, 
harbor deployments, coordination of their development with other 
transportation modes, and other questions. Strengthen basic 
research work on water transportation economic theory and 
benefits estimation methods, and so on. 
  4. Establish a highway communication program evaluation and 
decision making support system. Focus on establishing highway 
communication databases, develop research on communication macro 
decision making and control models. In 2000, establish a 
preliminary ministry and provincial two-level highway 
communication information system, and form a highway 
communication decision making science system prototype. In 2020, 
be able to do qualitative and quantitative analysis and 
evaluation of the economic benefits of highway communication 
programs, investment decision making programs, and highway 
communication construction and technology policies. 
  5. Undertake research on civil aviation market demand 
forecasting, development program decision making and evaluation, 
civil aviation airworthiness, and operational management laws, 
regulations, and economic and technical policies. In 2000, 
establish an automated management information database. 
  6. Undertake soft science research on pipeline transmission, 
establish a planning, management, and allocation information and 
decision making system, conduct research on technical economics 
policies. 
<H5>  B. R&amp;D on key technologies for integrated passenger and </H5>
freight multi-mode transportation. 
  1. Do research on key technologies and modernized equipment 
for transportation capacity balancing and key node construction 
for integrated large volume freight transportation (railroads, 
water-borne, pipeline, and highways) centered on energy 
resources. This includes centralized and decentralized 
transportation systems, transshipment systems, and storage 
systems. 
  2. In centralized container shipping (water-borne, highways, 
railroads, civil aviation), undertake development of key 
technologies and modernized equipment for transportation 
capacity balancing and key node construction. This includes: 
centralized and decentralized transportation systems, 
transshipment systems, and so on. 
  3. In rapid passenger transportation (railroads, highways, 
civil aviation, water-borne), undertake development of key 
technologies and modernized equipment for integrated 
transportation. 
  4. Do research on modernized management systems, regulations 
systems, and organizational modes for integrated transportation. 
<H5>  C. Key technologies to accelerate railroad S&amp;T </H5>
 development. 
  1. Attack key matching technology problems for heavy load 
transportation, substantially increase freight transportation 
capacity. 
  Develop 6,400 kW and larger electric locomotives, 4,500 hp 
and larger internal combustion locomotives, and large freight 
cars with axle weights of 23 to 25 tons; do research on laying 
75 kg-grade heavy track structures; do research on solving heavy 
load train optimized operations, synchronized remote control, 
high efficiency loading and unloading, and other key 
technologies. Prior to 2000, open dedicated coal haulage lines 
to 6,000 to 10,000 tons unit trains and achieve heavy load 
transportation on the Jing-Lu [Beijing-Shanghai], Jing-Guang 
[Beijing-Guangdong], Jing-Ha [Beijing-Harbin], Da-Qin 
[Datong-Qinhuangdao], and other trunk lines. Prior to 2020, open 
dedicated coal haulage lines to 10,000 tons and up unit trains, 
open 8,000 to 12,000 ton combination trains when necessary on 
busy trunk lines. 
  2. Substantially increase passenger transportation 
capacities, do research on high-speed passenger transportation 
technology. 
  Prior to 2000, develop new types of passenger electrical and 
internal combustion locomotives, double-decker passenger cars, 
and electrically controlled braking systems. Open three large 
trunklines to extra-fast passenger trains with maximum speeds of 
140 kilometers/hour; do suburban passenger transportation system 
trial point research in one or two large cities. Develop and 
apply advanced passenger transportation service facilities with 
electronic ticket sales, passenger guidance, luggage management, 
and so on. Around 2000, focus on doing research and experiments 
in rapid passenger transportation technology, passenger/freight 
distributed transportation, and other new fields. Develop 
locomotives and rail cars with maximum speeds in excess of 200 
kilometers/hour; do research on high-speed train automatic 
control technology; solve high-speed railway design, 
construction, and maintenance problems. By 2020 complete one or 
two high-speed passenger railways in regions with especially 
high passenger traffic and place suburban passenger 
transportation systems into operation in huge cities. 
  3. Do research on railroad transportation safety system 
engineering, establish safety guarantee systems. Establish train 
accident factor analysis systems and accident prevention and 
control mechanisms. 
  Develop and extend equipment technical state monitoring, 
breakdown diagnosis, and warning equipment; adopt signals to 
prevent abrupt forward movement by trains and erroneous handling 
of line entries, and other control devices; develop natural 
disaster prediction, warning, and new rescue equipment. 
  4. Broadly apply electronics technology, develop new 
communications and signalling equipment, provide technical 
measures for achieving high density and safe railroading. 
  Prior to 2000, develop fiber optic, microwave, and satellite 
digital communications. Complete a preliminary full-line 
automatic telephone network. Do R&amp;D on train radio 
communications and bidirectional, speed-differential display 
automatic closure and train automatic speed governing and 
control systems. Adopt computer-aided dispatching command 
systems for primary trunklines. In 2020, complete a 
comprehensive professional digital communications network. 
Develop train spacing automatic readjustment systems and new 
train operation automatic control systems. Develop computer 
real-time decision making and dispatching command systems. 
  5. Apply advanced technical measures to reform 
transportation 
organization and achieve modernization of transportation 
management. 
  Study and apply computer-compiled train transportation 
charts 
and all types of planning, optimized freight flow, passenger 
flow, car flow, and train flow organizational programs. Achieve 
comprehensive management automation in primary marshalling 
stations, passenger transportation stations, and freight 
transportation stations. Actively do research on new cooling 
sources and establish transportation cooling chains. Develop 
centralized loading, piggyback, and continental bridge 
transportation. By 2000, complete a real-time tracking 
management system for rapid freight trains, centralized 
container loading, locomotives, and passenger and freight cars; 
strengthen planning, forecasting, and accuracy of car flow 
organization and locomotive and car dispatching, raise 
transportation organization levels. Complete a unified 
transportation management database for transportation, finances, 
planning, statistics, and so on, attain resource sharing and 
optimized data processing, achieve modernization of 
transportation management. 
  6. Adopt new technologies, accelerate new line construction. 
  Achieve comprehensive rapid line selection. Make 
breakthroughs in key technologies for extra-long tunnels and 
underwater tunnels for single lines. Provide matching 
technologies for large span, high pier, deep base bridge 
construction. Do research on reducing the engineering costs of 
new lines. 
  7. Develop railroad operations mechanization and automation. 
  Develop and apply advanced construction, line maintenance, 
and car repair equipment and industrial production machinery. 
  8. Do research on energy conservation technology and 
environmental protection technology. 
  Strengthen research on wheel-track relationships and other 
specialized basic theory and on magnetic levitation ultra-high 
speed railroad technology. 
<H5>  D. Establish south-north maritime transportation </H5>
passageways, develop key technologies for open-sea 
transportation and interior river transportation. 
  1. Make full use of our maritime shipping advantages, 
develop 
sets of technologies for high efficiency maritime transportation 
passageways centered on energy resources. 
  Undertake research on preparatory engineering technology for 
deepwater harbor construction, structural forms and 
manufacturing technology for 10,000-ton and up open-type piers 
and new technologies and new materials for their construction; 
gain an understanding of tidal river mouth silt movement laws, 
formulate shipping channel improvement countermeasures for the 
mouths of the Chang Jiang and Zhu Jiang, create the conditions 
for the passage of 35,000-ton conventional freighters and second 
and third-generation centralized loading container ships; 
digest, absorb, and study high efficiency bulk cargo loading and 
unloading equipment and technologies, place ship unloading 
machinery with a units/hour efficiency of more than 2,000 tons 
into operation; do research on new transportation modes, develop 
coastal large tonnage energy-saving bulk freighters, shallow 
draft large ships, and self-unloading ships; develop 
high-performance diving technology and equipment. By 2000, 
complete a large preliminary coastal south-north bulk cargo 
transportation passageway which has a high transportation 
capacity, high efficiency, low costs, and good results in which 
large bulk cargo fleets are the primary force and in which there 
is an overall balance between harbor ship loading and unloading 
capacities. 
  2. Adopt modern technological equipment and management 
measures, improve the international competitiveness of the 
open-sea fleet. 
  Actively study rational structures for the open-sea fleet, 
develop large tonnage bulk freighters, develop third and 
fourth-generation centralized container loading, liquid chemical 
product, and other new types of ships; raise automation levels 
in engine room management, adopt advanced communications and 
navigation equipment; do research on new automatic breakdown 
diagnosis and handling technologies, perfect modernized 
transportation management measures. 
  3. Develop interior river transportation resources, 
strengthen research on infrastructure and equipment, 
substantially reduce transportation costs. 
  Develop and apply modernized shipping channel survey and 
design measures, do research on interior river shipping channel 
network planning and on shipping channel and ship matching 
technology and improvement technologies for shipping channels 
with large amounts of silt and those with multiple 
intersections; undertake research on categories and arrangements 
for high dam and large reservoir ship passage structures and 
their impact on upstream and downstream ship transportation, 
make breakthroughs in key technologies for ship lifts; make a 
major effort to extend segmented top propulsion transportation 
and develop all sorts of new high efficiency energy-saving types 
of ships. By 2000, increase the average load per horsepower of 
thrust by 30 to 40 percent, reduce transportation costs by 
one-half, increase 300 ton and above grade shipping channels 
almost one-fold. 
  4. Do research on water safety facilities, establish water 
safety guarantee systems, reduce communication accident rates. 
  Use importing and doing our own research to gradually 
establish a ship communication management system that conforms 
to China's national conditions, a future global maritime 
accident risk search and rescue and safety system, and a 
comprehensive maritime ship assistance system, and undertake 
research on water pollution prevention monitoring, forecasting, 
and emergency response handling technology. By 2000, attain 
rapid discovery and timely rescues for communication accidents 
and a significant reduction in water pollution. 
  5. Actively apply advanced and technology and scientific 
methods to modernize transportation management. 
  Make a major effort to extend and apply electronic computers 
and office automation technology, develop ship automatic 
tracking and dispatching command systems and international 
centralized container loading and harbor operations dispatching 
management information systems. By 2000, complete a three-level 
water-borne transportation management information network 
centered on the ministry, achieve automation of information 
collection, transmission, and processing and optimization of 
freight transportation organization, transportation capacity 
arrangements, production dispatching, and operational planning, 
achieve modernization of water-borne transportation management. 
  6. Prepare good technical reserves, meet new challenges from 
water-borne transportation technology in the early part of the 
next century. 
  Actively create the conditions to undertake applied research 
on integrated coast-ship technology, highly reliable artificial 
intelligence ships, magnetohydrodynamic and superconduction ship 
propulsion, ship harbor entry and exit automatic control 
technology, coal-based fuels for use on ships, and so on, and 
reduce the lag of China's water-borne transportation industry 
behind the developed countries in the area of high technology 
applications. 
<H5>  E. Improve highway grades and vehicle transportation </H5>
capacity, establish key technologies for highway trunkline roads 
and high efficiency vehicle transportation systems. 
  1. Develop new technologies for high-speed highway and 
dedicated automobile highway construction, meet the needs for 
high-speed (80 to 120 km/hour) and heavy load (total unit 
vehicle weights of 30 to 40 tons) traffic. 
  Develop and extend applications of aerial photography 
measurement and highway and bridge computer-aided design, 
achieve modernization of highway survey and design. Do research 
on countermeasures for comprehensive improvement of mixed 
communication, propose rational geometric standards for 
high-speed highway and dedicated automobile highway planar and 
vertical and horizontal cross-sections. Actively develop roadway 
asphalt and mixed materials made of it, roadway cement and 
concrete materials, base materials, and new types of roadway 
engineering materials, and form series of standards for China's 
high-grade road surface engineering materials. Establish 
high-strength, long-lasting, smooth, slip-resistant, and 
economical high-grade road surface structure systems. Develop 
high-grade highway construction machinery and maintenance 
machinery with a large production capacity, and make it into 
complete sets and systematize it. Develop construction quality 
detection and control and highway communication environmental 
protection and public hazard prevention technology. By 2000, 
basically achieve automation of trunkline highway and bridge 
design and map-making, achieve mechanization of high-grade 
highway construction and maintenance, make high-grade road 
surface indicators satisfy applications requirements, and reduce 
overall engineering costs by 10 percent and greatly improve the 
situation of interference in the vertical and horizontal 
directions for trunkline highways. All of China's major ports 
should be opened to traffic to the interior via high-speed 
highways. By 2020, basically improve mixed communication of 
trunkline highways, attain an average highway network density in 
the economically developed regions of east China of 0.5 
kilometers/square kilometer. 
  2. Research on roadway modernization management technology 
and equipment development. 
  Develop highway communication applied function basic data 
collection equipment and form a batch production and system 
detection capability. By 2000, establish a national roadway and 
bridge detection and evaluation center and province-level 
detection stations. Do R&amp;D on roadway and bridge management 
systems and by 2000, attain an initial scale and apply them in 
province-level roadway and bridge maintenance plan decision 
making. Do R&amp;D on key equipment and its system software for 
traffic monitoring and control, traffic information and fee 
collection systems, dedicated communications systems, and 
traffic engineering facilities, and establish a trunkline 
highway traffic accident database. By 2000 establish an initial 
relatively perfect traffic management facilities and safety 
guarantee system for trunkline highways. 
  3. Develop sets of highway rapid direct vehicle 
transportation technologies. 
  Rationally readjust the structure of vehicles, accelerate 
the 
development of highway passenger transportation, centralized 
loading container transportation, and special-purpose vehicle 
transportation; develop large highway diesel passenger vehicles, 
special-purpose vehicles, and semi-hitch vehicles, as well as 
matching facilities and service and management systems for 
passenger and freight transfer stations. Do R&amp;D on large and 
medium-sized vehicle transportation enterprise computer 
comprehensive management and production dispatching systems; 
establish scientific and rational vehicle detection and 
maintenance systems, develop vehicle detection and diagnosis 
technology. By 2000, approach a ratio of 1.5:3.0:5.5 in the 
structure of large, medium-sized, and small tonnage trucks, with 
the total tonnage of large tonnage diesel freight trucks 
accounting for 50 percent, approach a ratio of 1:1 between 
semi-hitched trucks and fully-hitched trucks, attain 
international levels for similar products for highway passenger 
car primary technology performance indices; increase the 
utilization rate for truck routes in large and medium-sized 
truck transportation enterprises by 5 to 10 percent, attain a 
completion rate of 90 percent in large passenger and freight 
vehicle technology, reduce maintenance and repair expenditures 
by about 30 percent. 
  4. Make breakthroughs in key technologies for highway 
bridges 
with very large spans (over 500 meters). 
  Focus on research on construction technology and the 
corresponding construction equipment for very large-span 
bridges; do R&amp;D on construction control computer programs and 
methods; do R&amp;D on large tonnage supports, large tonnage 
pre-stressing systems and large tonnage expansion and 
contraction joints; do research on applications of new types of 
structures, reliability theory, structural stability, and 
non-linear analysis. By 2000, integrate with engineering 
practice to gain an understanding of complete sets of 
construction and design technology for 500-meter and larger span 
bridges. 
  5. Research and extension of vehicle gas-saving technology. 
  Focus on research on using energy-saving technology in 
vehicles, do research on liquified natural gas, alcohol, and 
other substitute vehicle fuels, develop applications of new 
vehicle fuels and new types of powered vehicles. By 2000, reduce 
gas consumption in vehicles by more than 5 percent, extend and 
apply natural gas and alcohol substitute fuels in vehicles in 
local regions in China. 
  6. Do R&amp;D on artificial intelligence applications 
technology. 
  Establish highway and bridge design expert systems, achieve 
self-adapting control of planning and decision making systems; 
conduct research on transportation system engineering, 
ergonomics, and other basic issues related to highway 
communication. 
<H5>  F. Guarantee flight safety, increase aircraft utilization </H5>
rates and key technologies for administration and management 
modernization. 
  1. Technology development and application for civil aviation 
safety guarantee systems. 
  Focus on R&amp;D on six large regional group networks for 
flight 
management radar, flight planning and processing system group 
networks, and special-purpose applications software and network 
technology for integrated voice and data service communications 
networks for civil aviation; develop comprehensive monitoring 
and control, and early breakdown diagnosis and warning systems 
for civil aircraft; do R&amp;D on new technologies and new 
equipment 
for airport safety inspections, hijack prevention, and aircraft 
landing guidance. By 2000, reduce flight accident rates in 
China's civil aviation by 60 percent from the present base, and 
reduce the flight abnormality rate due to air communication 
management by 80 percent. 
  2. R&amp;D on key technologies for improving civil aviation 
utilization rates. 
  Do R&amp;D on advanced aircraft maintenance technologies and 
techniques, including: sets of technology and equipment for 
repairing imported large aircraft body structures and their 
engines and components; develop automatic testing equipment 
software; do research on repair technology for large flow rate 
passenger cabin pressurization equipment and repair technology 
for composite materials; fuel regulator experiment console 
software development, engine testing console demarcation, and so 
on. Develop large aircraft hanger moving work platforms and 
dock-type work platforms. Do R&amp;D on aviation company 
transportation capacity dispatching and airport real-time 
dynamic aircraft management systems. By 2000, attain average 
advanced international levels of the early 1990's for aircraft 
utilization rates on international flights and attain average 
advanced international levels of the early 1980's for domestic 
trunkline aircraft utilization rates; increase our own 
maintenance of aviation engine models by 50 percent and attain a 
self-maintenance rate of 30 percent for components to 
substantially conserve foreign exchange. 
  3. Operational management system, transportation service, 
and 
other ground equipment technology development. 
  Do R&amp;D on international and domestic flight booking 
ticketing, departure registration, aircraft loading, air freight 
transportation, and other passenger and freight service computer 
real-time control systems; establish a digital communications 
network and database linked to networks in world aviation cities 
and all of China's large and medium-sized cities; establish 
flight dynamic monitoring and control and information 
transmission systems, develop aviation materials information 
management systems, achieve modernization of civil aviation 
planning statistics and finances computations, operational 
management, and decision making. Develop airport automatic 
baggage sorting systems, achieve automatic baggage sorting; 
develop special types of airport ground-based vehicles and 
equipment. By 2000, apply computerized seat bookings for 90 
percent of ticket sales points in all regions of China, achieve 
computer handled passenger boarding measures and flight dynamic 
monitoring and control, and the primary technical indices of all 
types of special equipment and vehicles developed for civil 
aviation should attain the levels of similar products in foreign 
countries and be installed at large and medium-sized airports. 
<H5>  G. Key technologies for increasing oil and gas pipeline </H5>
transmission capacity and developing pipeline coal transmission. 
  1. Research on oil and gas pipeline transmission technology. 
  Do basic research on oil transmission technology and update 
oil transmission technology to meet the special requirements of 
different oil properties and different oil transmission 
conditions. Strengthen research on normal temperature oil 
transmission technology and on a variety of physical and 
chemical prepared transmission methods for highly viscous and 
condensation-prone crude oil, undertake research on orderly 
transmission of different refined oil products and different 
types of crude oil and on water transmission, implement 
transmission, wall processing, crude oil modification, and other 
exploratory pipeline transmission technology. By 2000, achieve 
closed transmission and optimized operation in over 80 percent 
of China's oil transmission pipelines. 
  2. Research on coal slurry pipeline transmission technology. 
  Do experimental research on common coal slurry and highly 
concentrated coal-water mixture pipeline transmission technology 
and parameters, propose rational slurry production and 
dehydration technology processes and transmission equipment; do 
research on optimized pipeline transmission technology that 
integrates common coal slurry and highly-concentrated coal-water 
mixture, do systematic experimental research on the coal 
varieties in mining regions that could adopt pipeline 
transmission, establish slurry production, pipeline 
transmission, and dehydration parameter databases. 
  3. Develop special-purpose equipment for pipeline 
transmission. 
  To improve efficiency and resolve open-cut operation 
problems, develop heating ovens, pumps, compressors, and all 
types of special-purpose valves for oil and gas transmission, 
develop main pumps, large dehydrators, and trunkline valves for 
pipeline coal transmission trunklines. By 2000, achieve a shift 
to domestic production and systemization and match up special 
equipment for gas transmission and offshore pipelines. 
  4. Develop pipelines and construction technology. 
  Do research on improving pipe material properties, pipeline 
crack prevention, earthquake resistance, welding, corrosion 
prevention, insulation, pipe cleaning, fault diagnosis, repair 
and restoration, and other technologies, undertake research on 
construction technologies for desert and offshore regions and on 
various types of power sources. 
  5. Undertake research on pipeline transmission detection, 
monitoring and control, and automation technology and equipment. 
  From 2000 to 2020, besides continuing to intensify research 
work in the three main areas outlined above, there should be 
innovations and breakthroughs on the basis of tracking research 
and application of high technology and new technology to form a 
``composite technology'' cluster for communication and 
transportation that has Chinese characteristics, and continue to 
provide key technologies for a takeoff in communication and 
transportation. 
<H5>  Machine-Building and Electronics </H5>
  The machine-building and electronics industry is the 
outfitting department for our national economy. Progress in 
production technology and the amount of economic benefits in all 
sectors of the national economy are fundamentally determined by 
the performance, quality, efficiency, and speed of replacement 
of the machinery and electronic equipment that they utilize. The 
machine-building and electronics industry must also provide 
advanced military outfitting for national defense modernization 
and provide durable consumer goods for the ever-growing material 
and culture life needs of the people. 
  The technical levels and scale of the machine-building and 
electronics industry are important indicators for assessing a 
nation's S&amp;T levels and economic strengths. Scientific and 
technical achievements must generally be materialized into the 
form of equipment to be converted into forces of production, and 
machine-building and electronics S&amp;T are the foundation for 
development of the machine-building and electronics industry. 
Looking at the history of S&amp;T development, machine-building 
S&amp;T 
have always been the most acute and most broad-ranging field for 
absorbing new S&amp;T achievements in all realms; electronics 
S&amp;T is 
the most rapidly developing and most vigorous high-tech realm of 
the present era. The mutual integration and permeation of 
machine-building, electronics, and information technology have 
caused changes of essence to occur in the functions of 
traditional machinery and electronics products and turned the 
machine-building and electronics industry into a 
technology-intensive modernized industry with rapid replacement 
of products, high added value, and large foreign exchange 
earnings from exports. 
  S&amp;T levels in China's machine-building and electronics 
industry lag considerably behind the developed countries. We 
must strengthen our sense of urgency and sense of 
responsibility, take full advantage of the favorable situation 
of reform and opening up, adopt resolute measures, and make 
major efforts to invigorate the machine-building and electronics 
industry a strategic principle in China's economic construction. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies. </H5>
  Use the domestic and foreign markets as a guide, use 
microelectronics and computer technology as a vanguard, make 
development of important sets of technologies and equipment for 
agriculture, energy resources, communication and transportation, 
communications, the raw materials industry and other urgent 
requirements in our national economy; make the ``four basic 
things'' of basic technology and techniques, basic components 
(general-purpose machinery components and electronic and 
instrument components), basic materials, and basic machinery the 
foundation for establishing a multi-level technology development 
system where emerging technology is the main factor and where 
traditional technology, emerging technology, and high technology 
coexist. We must have the ``one focus and three promotions'', 
meaning focus on the foundation, promote improvements in our own 
development capabilities, promote integration of 
machine-building technology and electronics technology, promote 
commercialization and industrialization of new technology and 
scientific research achievements. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  Year 2000 
  Make the direction of the main attack improving our own 
development and manufacturing capabilities for machinery and 
electronics products (especially major technical equipment and 
basic components) and continually reinforcing the 
competitiveness of machinery and electronics products in the 
domestic and foreign markets, reinforce close integration of 
scientific research with production and technology with the 
economy, accelerate digestion and absorption of imported 
technology, strengthen technical reserves, and accelerate the 
commercialization and industrialization of S&amp;T achievements. 
  1. Gain a basic understanding of key technologies in the 
design and manufacture of important technical equipment and 
engineering systems. The focus is: large thermal power, 
hydropower, and nuclear power transmission and transformation 
equipment, large iron and steel and non-ferrous metals smelting 
and rolling equipment, large coal and mine extraction equipment, 
petroleum drilling and extraction (including that used in ocean, 
desert, and other unusual environments) and intensive petroleum 
processing equipment, large coal chemical industry, chemical 
fertilizer, and petrochemical equipment, large harbor hoisting 
and transportation equipment, large sets of cement equipment, 
large batch vehicle production technical equipment, civil 
passenger aircraft technical equipment, agricultural machinery, 
engineering and construction machinery, light industry and 
textile machinery, printing machinery, packaging machinery, 
automatic industrial production control systems, marine, land, 
and air communication management systems and monitoring and 
control systems, environmental protection and monitoring 
equipment, and so on. 
  2. Gain a basic understanding of key electronic technologies 
developed during the 1980's. Focus on gaining an understanding 
of 1 to 2 micron silicon microelectronics technology and gallium 
arsenide integrated circuit development technology; develop chip 
components and surface mounting and microassembly technology; 
electric power electronics technology; sensing components and 
transducer technology; micrometer wave technology; flat display 
technology; special-purpose electronics equipment and new 
testing technology; key fourth-generation computer technology; 
computer software technology and computer-aided engineering and 
automatic detection technology; applied technology for 
industrial control machinery and microcomputers; digital and 
optical fiber communications technology; new generation consumer 
electronics technology and key digital sound and image 
technology; key technologies in medical treatment electronics 
equipment design and manufacturing. 
  3. Use the development and application of advanced design 
technology, advanced manufacturing technology, reliability and 
quality control technology, and environmental protection 
technology and modern management technology to make 5 percent of 
our primary machinery and electronics products attain advanced 
world levels of the period and about 40 percent of our primary 
machinery and electronics products attain levels of the late 
1980's and early 1990's, and improve the average efficiency of 
high energy-consuming machinery products produced in large 
amounts that cover broad areas by 3 to 5 percent; make 
electromechanically integrated products account for about 15 
percent of the total number of product varieties of machinery 
and electronics products. 
  4. Extend computer-aided management in key enterprises in 
the 
machine-building and electronics industry and gradually meet the 
needs of medium-sized and small enterprises. 
  5. In machine-building and electronics enterprises, complete 
2 to 3 preliminary computer-integrated manufacturing system 
(CIMS) trial points. 
  6. Begin with key basic components, basically solve the 
problems of key technologies in the design, manufacturing, and 
materials areas of basic machinery and electronics components, 
and comprehensively improve their quality and reliability. 
Develop several new types of basic components now in short 
supply in China. 
  7. Actively do R&amp;D on high and new-tech products, 
achieve 
commercialization and industrialization of about 100 types of 
leading high and new-tech products, and export a portion of them. 
  8. Actively study, formulate, and adopt standards at 
international levels, coordinate standards and levels with the 
standards of the primary industrially developed nations, meet 
China's commodity economy development and increased product 
export requirements. Establish and perfect special purpose 
measurement standards for the machine-building and electronics 
industry. 
  Year 2020 
  Make high technology the foundation, establish scientific 
research, design, manufacturing, and testing work in the 
machine-building and electronics industry on a foundation of 
China's own R&amp;D capabilities and conditions, attain or 
approach 
international levels for similar products for the quality, 
performance, price, appearance, and so on of machine-building 
and electronics products. In addition, lay a scientific and 
technical foundation for China to basically achieve 
modernization and attain a per capita GNP level of a moderately 
developed country by the mid-21st Century. 
  1. Gain an understanding of important technical equipment, 
engineering systems, and high and new-tech product design and 
manufacturing technology, basically satisfy market demand and 
participate in international competition. 
  2. Achieve computer-aided management of key enterprises in 
the machine-building and electronics industry. 
  3. Gain an understanding of modern design theory and 
methods, 
universally adopt advanced manufacturing technology, achieve 
computer-integrated manufacturing systems in 100 key enterprises 
in the machine-building and electronics industry. 
  4. Attain advanced world levels of the period for 20 percent 
of primary electromechanical products, become more competitive 
in the international market. Attain levels of the year 2010 for 
80 percent of primary electromechanical products. 
  5. Further improve standards and levels to adapt to the 
needs 
of China's high-tech development and broadly undertaking 
international economic and technological exchanges. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  To achieve the development strategies and objectives 
outlined 
above, we must select 14 items from among product technologies 
and production technologies as a technical cluster to play an 
important leading role in invigorating the machine-building and 
electronics industry and provide focused support and 
preferential development. 
<H5>  A. Important technical equipment and engineering system </H5>
technology. 
  The research focus is on applications of systems 
engineering, 
gaining an understanding of systems design technology, and 
raising system completion levels. Do research on the key design 
and manufacturing technologies and on the process automation and 
control technologies and reliability technologies for key 
equipment in the systems. 
  Year 2000 
  --Do research on the related materials, technologies, and 
structural problems of supercritical parameter thermal power 
generators, automatic control technologies and cooling and peak 
regulation technologies for large thermal power generators, 
low-head power generation technology for hydropower generators, 
variable frequency power generation technology, nuclear power 
generator nuclear fuel cycle technology, high voltage and 
extra-high voltage power transmission and transformation 
equipment extra-high voltage control and insulation tolerance 
levels and loss reduction technology. 
  --Do research on automatic working condition monitoring and 
control technology for sets of equipment at large open-cut 
mines, frigid zone power intensity, centralized grease 
lubrication, and other systems and vibration reduction 
technology. 
  --Do research on the related automation, monitoring and 
control, energy conservation, speed regulation, and other 
technical problems for blast furnace, sintering, coking, 
smelting, rolling, and other key equipment needed in integrated 
iron and steel enterprises. Develop the equipment required for 
high-performance steel varieties and non-ferrous metal smelting 
equipment. 
  --Do research on the key equipment, instruments and gauges, 
and control systems appropriate for modern petroleum extraction 
and petrochemical, coal chemical, and new technology flow 
processes. Gain an understanding of key technologies for high 
pressures, high speeds, high degrees of sealing, high 
efficiency, corrosion resistance, low temperature resistance, 
energy consumption reduction, and so on that result from a move 
to larger sizes and high parameters. Do research on the 
reliability, adaptability, mechanization, automation, and other 
key technologies for desert oil field and marine oil field 
drilling and extraction equipment. 
  --Do R&amp;D on key technologies for new technical 
equipment for 
new types of dry method outside-the-kiln cement decomposition 
production technical equipment and flotation method glass 
production technical equipment. 
  --Do research on high efficiency, precision, automatic, and 
flexible manufacturing technology and equipment for vehicle 
production. 
  --Do research on key technologies for improving the 
performance, lifespan, reliability, automation, and so on of 
large harbor loading and unloading equipment. 
  --Do R&amp;D on communication electronic engineering systems 
technology; air traffic management automation, monopulse/S mode 
secondary radar technology, whole phase parameter solid state 
primary radar technology, and microwave landing technology; 
harbor ship traffic management automation and high resolution 
harbor radar technology; railroad operations management 
modernization, high-speed highway electronic monitoring and 
control, and urban communication management technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on electronic engineering systems technology in 
public activities; major disaster electronic monitoring, 
forecasting, and rescue command systems technology; electric 
power load control systems technology; public structure 
electronic systems technology; safety and public health 
electronics technology, and so on. 
  --Do research on fault diagnosis and warning devices for use 
in major technical equipment and engineering systems. 
  Year 2020 
  Focus on dealing with the key technologies for developing 
toward larger sizes, special purposes, high efficiency, energy 
conservation, and automation and the related technologies for 
the equipment and systems required for high and new technology 
development. 
<H5>  B. Electromechanical integration technology. </H5>
  Closely integrating machine technology, electronics 
technology, and information technology to raise product 
performance and manufacturing technology to new levels in 
possible automatic optimized control will inevitably produce 
enormous economic and social benefits. The common key 
technologies in electromechanical integration are mainly 
detection and sensing technology, information processing 
technology, automatic control technology, systems integration 
technology, precision machine-building technology, servo and 
drive technology, and so on. Strive to make several 
breakthroughs. 
  Year 2000 
  --Do research on precision rapid position control and rapid 
response in servo drive technology. 
  --Do research on numerical control technology. In machine 
tools, the rate of a shift to numerical control should reach 50 
to 60 percent of value of output and the rate of a shift to 
numerical control should reach 20 percent of product varieties. 
  --Develop electric power electronics technology. Make a 
major 
effort to develop a new generation of electric power electronic 
components. Focus on developing self-turnoff components 
represented by crystal gate turn-off devices (GTO) and 
high-power transistors (GTR), and field control components 
represented by power field effect devices (MOSFET), static 
induction crystal gate devices (SITH), field control crystal 
gate devices (FCTH), and so on. Develop AC variable frequency 
speed regulation systems. 
  --Do research on expanded applications of microelectronics 
technology, reinforce R&amp;D on special-purpose electronic 
equipment. 
  Attain an intelligence rate of 15 to 20 percent for 
instruments and gauges. Focus: intelligent regulation and 
control instruments used in important technical equipment, 
microcomputer-controlled materials testing equipment, component 
analysis and surface analysis instruments, large precision 
testing and scientific experiment instruments, and electronic 
diagnosis, treatment, and other medical instruments. 
  In the area of vehicles, make conserving gas, reducing 
pollution, and guaranteeing safe operation the primary 
objective, achieve electronic control of ignition timing, 
air-fuel ratios, anti-lock braking, and gasoline injection. 
Further expand applications of electronic control technology in 
high-power medium-speed and low-speed diesel engines, ship 
diesel engines, electric-powered cars, and internal combustion 
electric motors. 
  The focus for agricultural machinery is on integration with 
raising grades and replacement and extending applications of 
microelectronics technology in all types of combined grain 
harvesters, large and moderate horsepower tractors, and 
livestock and feed processing machinery. 
  Do research on the use of electronics technology to replace 
and upgrade light industrial machinery, textile machinery, 
medical treatment equipment, and food packaging and printing 
machinery. Develop electromechanically integrated consumer 
products (such as household appliances, office machinery, 
cameras, etc.). 
  Year 2020 
  --Approach world levels of the period for primary 
Chinese-made electromechanically integrated products. 
  --Base 70 to 80 percent of the electromechanically 
integrated 
products required by all sectors of our national economy on 
domestic sources. 
  --Make exports of electromechanically integrated products 
account for 40 to 50 percent of total exports of machinery and 
electronic products. 
  --Do research on new types of electric power electronic 
circuit electromagnetic process and simulation technology. 
<H5>  C. Microelectronics technology. </H5>
  Microelectronics technology is the technical foundation of 
the modern electronics and information industries. The focus is: 
use the domestic market as a support, make breakthroughs in 
design technology and applications, achieve product replacement 
and scale production. In the near term, do R&amp;D on and apply 
application-specific integrated circuit technology to spur 
development of general-purpose ICs. 
  Year 2000 
  --Develop silicon IC technology, accelerate development of 
chemical compound semiconductor technology. 
  --Focus on application-specific ICs in doing research on 1 
micrometer very large scale ICs [VLSI] and gallium arsenide 
large scale ICs, microwave single chip ICs, and 
three-dimensional ICs; do batch production of 2 micrometer VLSI 
circuits; apply medium and small scale gallium arsenide and 
microwave single chip ICs; complete and perfect 3 micrometer IC 
technology systems and quality monitoring and control systems, 
gain an understanding of and extend scale production technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on sets of circuits for household appliances, 
single-board computers and control computer circuits, IC 
technology for use in communications, gain an understanding of 
product design, production, and, management technology for scale 
production. 
  Year 2020 
  --Continue fostering the role of silicon IC technology, 
gradually raise technical levels and application levels of 
gallium arsenide ICs. 
  --Undertake additional research on new materials, new 
components, new equipment, and new assembly technology. 
  --Do targeted tracking and research on new trends in other 
microelectronics technologies and their applications. 
  --Do research on sub-micrometer (0.8 micrometer grade) VLSI 
circuit technology. 
  --Gain an understanding of and extend the application of 1 
micrometer VLSI circuit scale production technology, form a 
trial production capability for sub-micrometer VLSI circuits, 
comprehensively develop application-specific circuit product 
varieties in integration with main units, carry out systematic 
integration R&amp;D, move toward the highest international 
levels. 
<H5>  D. Optoelectronics technology. </H5>
  Optoelectronics technology mainly includes semiconductor 
optoelectronics, lasers, infrared, photography and displaying, 
information processing, and other technology. Its foundation is 
optoelectronic components, mainly various types of laser 
components, infrared components, detection components, 
photographic and display components, and optoelectronic 
integrated and optical integrated circuits, fiber optic cable 
and optical passive components, and so on. The core of 
optoelectronic technology is the application of complete 
optoelectronic units (systems). 
  Year 2000 
  --Gain an understanding of key optoelectronic component 
design and production technology, including optical 
communications, optical storage, laser processing, and other 
necessary components to basically meet our national economic 
development requirements. Focus on making breakthroughs in 
metallic oxide gaseous phase precipitation technology, molecular 
beam epitaxy technology, electron beam and ion beam etching 
technology, optical fiber coupling and sealing technology, 
superior quality large dimension laser crystal growth 
technology, high-strength optical thin film evaporation coating 
technology, and so on. Gradually achieve a shift to domestic 
production of technical equipment. 
  --Actively undertake research on optoelectronics technology 
complete applications units and systems, including applications 
in monitoring, control, and processing, office automation, 
communications and information processing, communication 
monitoring and control, medical treatment, agriculture and 
forestry, and other realms, form several broad-area 
optoelectronic complete units and systems. 
  --Do R&amp;D on vacuum and solid photography, flat displays, 
high-quality color imaging, high-function terminal display, and 
other technology. 
  --Develop long wavelength and ultra-long wavelength low-loss 
optical fiber and optical cable, optoelectronic components, and 
wave division multiplexing technology; coherent optical 
communications technology; and optical communications processing 
technology and optical integration technology. 
  --Develop high-power laser design and manufacturing 
technology, do research on expanding the application of lasers 
in processing, detection, assembly, and other areas, and develop 
the corresponding new generation of lasers. 
  Year 2020 
  Focus on making breakthroughs in optoelectronic and optical 
integrated circuits, ultra-long wavelength and multiple 
wavelength optical fiber and optical cable, and the 
corresponding optical passive components and receiver and 
emitter manufacturing and applications technology. 
<H5>  E. Computer and software technology. </H5>
  Computer and software technology can permeate nearly every 
realm of human activity and become a basic intelligent tool in 
S&amp;T and economic work. They have been integrated with many 
disciplines and have generated many new intersecting disciplines. 
  Year 2000 
  --Focus on developing fourth-generation computer technology, 
including systems architecture, hardware, and peripherals design 
and scale economic manufacturing technology. 
  --Focus on developing system software technology where we 
have our own copyrights, including operating systems, database 
management systems, and all types of language systems. 
  --Develop fourth generation computer applications 
technology, 
including industrial control technology, graphic, image, and 
voice processing technology, communication communications 
technology, network and interface technology, artificial 
intelligence technology, Chinese information processing 
technology, and computer-aided software engineering technology. 
  --Do research on public support software technology, 
man-machine interface technology, software engineering 
technology, and software integration, software intelligence, 
software solidification, and software production automation 
technology. 
  --Track the new generation of computer and software 
technology. (For example: (Feifeng Nuoyiman) computers, fuzzy 
computers, non-binary computers, optoelectronic computers, 
biocomputers, superconducting computers, etc.). 
  Year 2020 
  On the foundation of the fourth generation of computers, 
develop and establish a new generation computer industry and 
software industry. 
<H5>  F. Communications technology and broadcast and television </H5>
technology. 
  Communications is the infrastructure of modern society and a 
strategic focus of our national economic development. 
Broadcasting and television are the most effective propaganda 
and educational tools for establishing the ``two types of 
civilization [material and spiritual]''. 
  Digital communications technology and high-quality, 
multifunction, intelligent broadcasting and television 
technology are the primary development direction of the future. 
  Year 2000 
  --Focus on solving problems with scale production technology 
for optical fiber communications below DS 5, digital microwave 
communications below DS 4, high-capacity C band and Ku band 
satellite communications, and a new generation of mobile 
communications and other systems equipment and their key 
components. 
  --Gain an understanding of the software and hardware 
technology digital program controlled exchanges and the design 
and production technology for their application-specific ICs. 
  --Develop electric cable and optical cable bidirectional 
television transmission technology, digital television and flat 
television technology, high-fidelity audio technology, digital 
video recording and sound recording technology, and 
multi-function intelligent broadcast television terminal 
technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on Ku band direct broadcast television 
satellite 
technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on medium-wave amplitude modulation stereo 
broadcast 
technology, single sideband shortwave broadcast technology, and 
high-clarity television technology, develop energy-saving radio 
and television products. 
  Year 2020 
  --Focus on developing high-capacity, high-speed fiber optic 
communications system technology and integrated services digital 
satellite communications system technology, study and extend 
general-purpose integrated services digital network (ISDN) 
technology. 
  --Develop high-precision magnetic recording technology and 
erasable magneto-optical recording technology. 
<H5>  G. Design technology. </H5>
  Design technology is the primary link in the conversion of 
scientific research achievements into commodities. The one-time 
success rate for product designs in foreign countries has now 
risen from 30 or 40 percent to 90 percent. Because modern 
electromechanical products are developing toward large models, 
complete sets, precision, efficiency, high operation, and other 
high parameters, and because product replacement occurs quickly, 
the lifespan of one generation of products is becoming 
increasingly shorter, so to satisfy market demand and increase 
the competitiveness of products, we must continually improve 
design quality and efficiency. The focus is on extension and 
application of modern design theory and design technology. 
  Year 2000 
  --Focus on collecting and accumulating the load spectra of 
power generation equipment, metallurgical equipment, engineering 
machinery, vehicles, tractors, and so on and integrate with 
random fatigue and product strengthened lifespan experiments, 
friction science experiments, and stress and corrosion 
experiments to revise and perfect design regulations, 
principles, and standards and provide a foundation for designing. 
  --Do research on all types of general-purpose database and 
program database establishment technology. Strengthen technical 
data experimentation, collection, and accumulation work, 
gradually establish various types of special-purpose and 
general-purpose databases (such as materials physical 
performance, fatigue, friction and wear, corrosion, and other 
data) and graphics bases. 
  --Strengthen extension and application of modern design 
methods, including reliability design, optimization design, 
finite element design, fatigue design, limited lifespan design, 
man-machine engineering design, and other methods, extend 
modularized design and product mold-making design. 
  --Extend and develop computer-aided design (CAD) technology, 
do research on intersecting graphics systems, three-dimensional 
entity model modeling technology, dynamic duplication 
technology, and engineering pattern automatic input technology. 
  --Do research on electronics product stability design 
applications and special-purpose IC design and standard IC 
structural design technology. 
  --Do research on establishing reliability technology systems 
and guarantee systems. Strengthen analytical research on the 
failure of machinery and electronics products and basic 
components. 
  Year 2020 
  --Do research on multi-objective, multiple variable, 
multiple 
restraint complex systems optimized design methods, do research 
on large non-linear power computing programs and on 
special-purpose design programs targeted at products. 
  --Gain an understanding of and universally apply advanced 
design methods, use fatigue design methods to design products 
that receive variable loads, use computers to conduct true load 
duplication simulation, use fracture dynamics for estimations to 
analyze defective components in large bands; damage capacity 
designs based on fracture mechanics; use dynamics analysis 
software to conduct systematic dynamic analysis of machinery 
structures; carry out dynamic optimization analysis, systems 
analysis, machine-machine engineering analysis, all types of 
reliability analysis, and so on. 
  --Establish failure atlases and case databases for all 
categories of products. Develop probability designs and 
maintenance designs for electromechanical products 
environmental-tolerant designs for all types of special 
environments. 
  --Establish complete and appropriate databases and new 
design 
regulations. Achieve computer-aided design (CAD) for more than 
90 percent of machinery and electronics product atlases. 
  --Do research on expert systems applications and establish 
the corresponding knowledge bases and experience bases. 
<H5>  H. Advanced manufacturing technology. </H5>
  Manufacturing technology is the basis for achieving 
high-performance product design and the key technology for 
improving quality, improving productivity, reducing consumption, 
lowering costs, improving labor conditions, and reducing and 
even eliminating environmental pollution. With the development 
and gradual industrialization of new technologies and high 
technologies, market competition will become ever more intense 
and the importance of developing advanced manufacturing 
technologies will become increasingly prominent. The development 
directions for manufacturing technology are toward high 
engineering, superior quality, precision, and automation. 
  Year 2000 
  --Improve the quality and manufacturing levels for the large 
key cast, forged, welded, and heat treated components in power 
generation, metallurgical, chemical industry, and other major 
sets of equipment. Raise our self-sufficiency rate for large 
cast and forged components to 70 percent. 
  --Do systematic research on cold and hot processing 
technique 
regulations, unify standards, establish regulations databases 
and expert systems for cutting, grinding, casting, forging, 
welding, heat treatment, and other technologies. Lay a 
foundation for achieving computer-aided manufacturing (CAM). 
  --Raise conventional technology levels such as high-speed 
cutting, ultra-precise cutting, minor and no-cutting, gas 
protection welding, oxide-free heating, surface protection 
technology, wear-resistant and corrosion-resistant metallic hot 
spray surface plating and buttering, and other technologies. 
Study and extend applications of cold-temperature compression, 
precision forging, roller forging, oblique rolling, rotary 
compression forming, super-plastic forming, and other shaping 
technologies for axles, blades, bearings, standard components, 
and all other types of components used in large amounts over 
broad areas. Study and extend precision impact cutting shaping 
and processing. 
  --Do research on high precision (0.1 micrometer and above) 
and large component cutting and processing technology, thin-wall 
and small-margin casting technology, new high-density energy 
welding, cutting, heat treatment, and surface protection 
technology (such as applications of lasers, electron beams, ion 
beams, and so on). 
  --Do R&amp;D on electronic product scale production and new 
rear-end packaging technology, focus on making breakthroughs in 
assembly, non-metallic materials processing, precision mold 
processing, thin film formation, surface decoration, and other 
technologies. 
  --Do research on ceramic powder, electron pulp, and 
high-performance base plate manufacturing technology and chip 
component carrier component manufacturing technology. 
  --Systematically develop technical equipment, auxiliary 
equipment, and technical materials adapted to traditional 
technology and new technological developments, gradually form 
production capacities and series, attain a fulfillment rate of 
80 to 85 percent. 
  --Do R&amp;D on microfine processing (1 to 2 micrometers), 
analysis, testing, and quality control technology. 
  Year 2020 
  Attain self-sufficiency rates of 95 percent for large and 
medium-sized cast and forged components for power generation, 
metallurgical, chemical industry, and other important sets of 
equipment. 
  --Gain a fundamental understanding of precision and 
ultra-precision processing technology and large component 
processing and special type processing technology to meet the 
requirements for development of the space, aviation, nuclear 
power, electronics, and instruments industries. In special 
processing realms, broadly apply laser, electron beam, ion beam, 
and other technologies. 
  --Attain a fulfillment rate of 95 percent for the technical 
equipment, auxiliary equipment, and technical materials adapted 
to complete set production and new technologies. 
  --Gain a fundamental understanding of electronic product 
scale production technology, broadly apply thin film formation, 
surface decoration, and other technologies. 
<H5>  I. Testing and sensing technology. </H5>
  Modern testing technology relies primarily on transducers 
and 
all types of information measurement devices, information about 
the absolute values of the physical quantities, chemical 
quantities, and state quantities generated by the object being 
tested and changes in them, and has response and conversion 
functions. Sensing technology is also an assembly of optical, 
electronic, audio, information, bionic, and various other new 
technologies. The primary tasks that testing technology will 
face in the future are continually resolving the measurement 
content proposed by the development of new technologies and 
their precision, speed, reliability, and other problems, and it 
is an indispensable part of modern automation technology. 
  Year 2000 
  --Do research on testing technologies for the external 
loads, 
stresses, and strains of electromechanical products under all 
types of unusual working conditions, and non-destructive testing 
technology for especially thick components and rough surfaces. 
  --Integrate with product characteristics in undertaking 
research on emission, potential method, and other crack 
detection technologies, diagnosis methods, and information 
processing technologies. 
  --Do research on rapid strengthening simulation testing and 
dynamic simulation testing technology. 
  --Do research on automatic testing technology for 
large-batch 
production and on automatic testing systems used in scientific 
experiments, raise the precision of testing and the scope of 
testing by one to two numerical grades. Meet the speed and 
reliability requirements of automatic measurement. 
  --Do research on new types of detecting technologies (laser, 
superconduction, sound wave, infrared, etc.) and sensing 
mechanisms. 
  --Undertake research on advanced information testing 
technologies and on digital and intelligent electronic 
measurement instruments. 
  --Do research on detecting sensing components for all types 
of detection uses and on sensing and transducing component 
manufacturing technology and equipment. 
  --Develop digital and analog transducers and contact and 
non-contact type transducers. 
  --Do research on integrated and intelligent sensing 
technology. 
  Year 2020 
  --Do research on dynamic detection technology for 
electromechanical products, complete units and systems 
simulation and rapid strengthening technology, and do research 
on testing technology for complex stress and strain problems. 
  --Accelerate research on transducer solidification, 
miniaturization, integration and shifting to intelligence, 
graphics, multiple functions, and optics. 
  --Broadly apply dynamic testing technology, do research on 
systemization of testing technology, meaning form and complete a 
system from information collection, transmission, and processing 
to display, and raise the precision of testing by one to two 
numerical grades compared to the year 2000. 
<H5>  J. Computer-integrated manufacturing technology (CIM). </H5>
  Computer-integrated manufacturing technology (CIM) mainly 
resolves problems in the automation of discrete production 
processes and is a necessary transformation for development of 
the machine-building and electronics industry. CIM uses 
computers and their software to organically integrate the 
various types of scattered automation systems required by the 
manufacturing and administrative activities of manufacturing 
plants to achieve automation of the entire process from market 
forecasting, design, and processing to after-sales services. 
  Year 2000 
  --Undertake R&amp;D on key technologies for 
computer-integrated 
manufacturing systems: digital control and the related 
technologies, industrial robot technology, materials storage, 
transportation, and identification technology, flexible 
manufacturing systems technology, and information integration 
and systems analysis technology, quality assurance and diagnosis 
monitoring and control systems technology, management and 
administration and production control technology, artificial 
intelligence technology, and so on. 
  --Gain a fundamental understanding of industrial robot 
design 
and manufacturing technology, and achieve commercialization and 
partial industrialization; develop new varieties of industrial 
robots such as economical robots, flat joint assembly robots, 
large robots for use in casting and forging production, and 
partially intelligent assembly robots; do research on the third 
generation of robots. 
  --Do research on layered and distributed database 
technology, 
establish a small number of CIM system general-purpose databases 
such as integrated storage and retrieval data, tables, and 
various other information databases, materials databases, tools 
databases, common technology databases, and so on. 
  --Do R&amp;D on CIM integrated software systems and network 
interface technology. 
  --Establish several expert systems, such as cutting tools, 
complex cavity mold (including injection mold) design, 
manufacturing, and machinery equipment fault diagnosis systems, 
and so on. 
  --Do research on real-time on-line fault information 
collection technology, fault self-diagnosis systems, an so on. 
  Year 2020 
  --Do research on overall deployments for achieving a shift 
to 
CIM in China's machine-building and electronics industry during 
the 21st Century and gradually implement the measures. 
  --Do research on a third generation of robots with sight, 
hearing, and natural speech capabilities and form an industry. 
  --Do research on the expert systems and establishment of 
knowledge databases associated with integrated manufacturing 
technology. 
  --Do research on intelligent computer-integrated 
manufacturing technology based on the fifth generation and 
possibly on a sixth generation of computers. 
<H5>  K. Basic components integrated technology. </H5>
  Basic components technology for machinery and electronics 
play a decisive role to a substantial extend in equipment and 
systems levels and in quality and reliability. The focus of 
basic components technology is research on key technologies to 
improve their quality, performance and reliability and 
continuing to actively develop high-performance, miniaturized, 
modularized, intelligent, specialized, highly reliable, and 
other new types of basic components. 
  Year 2000 
  --Concentrate forces to study and resolve problems in key 
technologies for the maintenance of precision, high transmission 
speeds, low noise, and high performance in general-purpose 
components. Do R&amp;D on new types of products appropriate for 
the 
requirements of various working conditions. 
  --Improve the efficiency, control performance, reliability, 
and quality stability of hydraulic components and system. 
Develop high-pressure flow rate hydraulic components and 
functional compound components, do research on hydraulic system 
contamination control technology. 
  --Do research to improve the lifespan, reliability, and 
other 
technical levels of pneumatic components and systems. Develop 
low power consumption, electrical-pneumatic-hydraulic integrated 
air source purification, and other new technologies. 
  --Develop high-speed, high temperature, high-pressure, and 
corrosion-resistant sealing components. 
  --Improve the technical performance, reliability, and 
quality 
stability of low-voltage electrical components. Develop 
standardized, general purpose, adaptable, and highly safe 
low-voltage electrical components, do research on electronic 
multifunction and other types of new low-voltage electrical 
components. 
  --Do research to resolve problems with key technologies for 
high quality, high reliability, rapid adaptation, and so on for 
tractor and internal combustion engine fittings and vehicle and 
ship components. 
  --Do research to improve the quality and reliability of 
instrument components, develop multifunction instrument 
components. 
  --Do R&amp;D on design technology and manufacturing 
technology 
for a variety of chip components, form scale production. 
  --Do R&amp;D on new types of high-resolution display tubes 
and 
their electronic and vacuum components and microwave and 
millimeter wave components. 
  --Do research to improve the quality and reliability of 
small 
and special electric machines, switches, relays, and connectors. 
  --Do R&amp;D on new types of miniature audio components, 
piezo-electric crystal components, and magnetic, audio, and 
optical storage and recording component technology. 
  --Do R&amp;D on high-performance, highly reliable, 
low-cost, and 
miniature physical and chemical power sources. 
  --Develop high efficiency, precision, complex, and long 
lifespan mold design, manufacturing, and assembly technology 
(including impact molding, injection molding, forged molding, 
etc.) and the associated technical equipment. 
  Do research on heat current channel formation technology and 
mold temperature control technology, develop heat current 
channel components and temperature control components, develop 
and apply various types of rapid and convenient mold-making 
technologies and rapid mold replacement technologies. 
  Year 2020 
  --Do R&amp;D on various types of miniature, huge, new 
principles, 
new media, special environment, and compound integration 
hydraulic and pneumatic components, make their lifespans and 
reliability basically attain or approximate level of similar 
products internationally at that time, and make product variety 
specifications and quantities basically meet product development 
requirements. 
  --Do research on and produce sealing components for use in 
high speed, high temperature, high pressure, corrosion 
resistant, and other special working conditions. 
  --Attain standardization, general use, adaptability, and 
safety in the product structures of hydraulic and pneumatic 
components, electronic components, electrical devices, and 
instrument components. Satisfy product development requirements 
for multi-function electrical components, basically satisfy 
market demand for development and production of 
application-specific ICs. 
  --Broadly apply microelectronic and computer technology in 
the basic components industry and widely use laser, fiber optic, 
biochemical, imaging, and other new technologies based on 
requirements. 
  --Do research on ultra-precision (0.1 micrometer) and 
multiple operating position (over 50 operating positions) grade 
molding entry advanced structures and large and precision 
component mold manufacturing technology and broadly extend and 
apply them. 
<H5>  L. Special-purpose materials development and materials </H5>
application technology. 
  R&amp;D work on special-purpose materials in the 
machine-building 
and electronics industry is relatively weak and we lag far 
behind foreign countries in materials application technology, 
which is manifested primarily in: many shortages and few product 
varieties for high-performance materials, low materials use 
levels, and low materials utilization rates; common materials 
with low overall performance account for the largest portion and 
they have poor quality and incomplete product variety 
specifications, which affect product quality. Materials 
strengthening and surface protection technologies are not widely 
applied. 
  Year 2000 
  --Do research on key technologies for high parameter energy 
resource equipment, ultra-high precision instrument materials, 
highly sensitive materials, and permanent magnet materials. 
  --Do research on and expand applications of high-strength 
steels, nodular cast iron, powder metallurgy, and diamond, boron 
nitride, and other ultrahard cutting tools. 
  --Do research on new types of high-performance engineering 
plastics, new types of composite materials, and fine ceramics 
and on their applications technology. 
  --Develop large diameter perfect silicon crystals for use in 
microelectronics technology products and electronic components, 
new types of semiconducting materials and high-purity metallic 
and metallic-chemical compounds with unique physical properties, 
materials used in chip components and mixed ICs, and so on. 
  --Develop new types of photoelectric semiconducting 
materials, photoelectric conversion materials, and photoelectric 
transmission materials. 
  --Develop auxiliary materials for the machine-building and 
electronics industry such as lubricants, rust prevention 
materials, sealing materials, bonding agents, and so on. 
  --Undertake research on materials consumption technology; 
increase the proportion of economical materials applications. 
  Year 2020 
  Besides the need for conventional materials to adapt to high 
parameter developments, the foci are: 
  --Do research on regular temperature superconducting 
materials and applications technology for high-tech ceramics in 
the machine-building and electronics industry. Do research on 
applications of carbon fiber reinforced plastics, 
microcrystalline and non-crystalline state alloy materials, and 
high-density energy storage materials in machinery components 
and electronic products and on their applications technology. 
  --Do research on special types of corrosion-resistant 
materials and surface technology such as laser surface corrosion 
resistant alloying, functional metallic surface passive films, 
light metallic base composite materials, and so on. 
  --Undertake research on computer-aided materials selection 
systems. 
  --Undertake research on materials application technology and 
testing technology. 
<H5>  M. Energy conservation technology. </H5>
  Energy resource consumption per unit of industrial value of 
output in China is several times higher than in the industrially 
developed countries, and over one half is consumed in 
electromechanical products. This shows that there is substantial 
potential for energy conservation in China's electromechanical 
products. The routes to energy conservation can be divided into 
three main areas: energy transmission, energy conversion, and 
systematic energy conservation. The energy conservation 
potential of the latter is greater than that of the two former 
areas. 
  Year 2000 
  --Strengthen research on improving product energy conversion 
efficiency and the related drive science, friction science, 
electrical engineering, engineering fluid dynamics, 
aerodynamics, and engineering thermophysics, lay a foundation 
for product renewal and replacement. 
  --Do research on modern large-scale electric power systems, 
large capacity generation high-performance insulation 
technology, loss reduction, iron core structures, and other 
technology, and boiler and industrial oven and kiln combustion 
technology. 
  --Do research on applications of ternary flow theory to 
upgrade the structures of centrifugal compressors, blowers, 
steam turbine blades, and turbines, apply two-phase flow theory 
to upgrade solid and flow mixed media pump structures and 
improve pump efficiency. 
  --Extend and apply electric power electronics technology, 
reduce energy consumption in blowers, water pumps, electric 
welders, and other energy consuming products used over broad 
areas. 
  --Do research on the adoption of AC-AC variable frequency 
drive systems for use in electric drive equipment and on 
electric motor rotation speed regulation systems, improve their 
efficiency. 
  --Develop flow meters, combustion analyzers, intelligent 
energy management and controllers that have microcomputers, 
achieve systematic energy conservation for enterprises that 
consume large amounts of energy. 
  --Do additional research on heat and power cogeneration, 
coal-fired/gas-fired--steam combined cycle power generation 
technology, increase overall efficiency. 
  --Do research on pressurization technology for internal 
combustion engines, increase the efficiency of vehicles, 
tractors, engineering machinery, and so on. 
  --Do research on surplus heat and surplus pressure recover 
thermal devices, low heat value and low potential energy 
comprehensive utilization technology, and various types of new 
high-efficiency heat transfer components and devices. 
  --Adapt to local conditions in developing and utilizing new 
energy resources, such as: 10MW-grade tidal energy power 
generation technology and solar energy and hydrogen energy 
utilization technology, develop a new generation of chemical and 
physical power sources, achieve an appropriate degree of scale 
production. 
  --Do research on substitute fuels and develop energy 
conservation software. 
  Year 2020 
  Guided by modern theory, do further research on improving 
machinery product drive, friction, combustion, insulation, and 
other new technologies, make the energy consumption indices of 
machinery products attain or approximate advanced international 
levels. 
  --Do research on the use of variable speed drives in blowers 
and pumps with relatively large load variations; do research on 
3MW and up large generators with intense load variations in 
conjunction with the use of dynamic passive power compensation 
and high sub-harmonic absorption devices, adopt sound frequency 
control systems for industrial boilers. 
  --Do applied research on magnetohydrodynamic power 
generation, magnetic levitation technology, magnetic ion 
technology, and new energy resources. 
<H5>  N. Modern management technology. </H5>
  The essence of management is the optimized deployment and 
operation of all types of resources, and advanced technology 
often cannot foster its role except through advanced management. 
Thus, the adoption of modern management technology in 
decision-making, program formulation, planning, administration, 
production, marketing, and other realms is extremely important 
for improving management levels, labor productivity, and 
economic results. 
  Year 2000 
  --Broadly study and apply operational research, forecasting, 
evaluation technology, decision-making science, control theory, 
systems theory, information theory, and other modern theories in 
macro management of the machine-building and electronics 
industry. 
  --Broadly study and apply industrial engineering, management 
economics, man-machine engineering, behavioral science, and 
statistics in enterprise management. 
  --Study and formulate according to industry advanced work 
time quota standards, universally adopt value engineering, group 
formation technology, reliability management, and enterprise 
diagnosis, establish several standard time work system 
demonstration points in key enterprises in all industries. Use 
reinforced work technique management in medium-sized and small 
enterprises as a foundation for intensive implementation of 
comprehensive quality management to improve the quality of 
enterprises. 
  --Do research on management information systems and 
technology. This includes: enterprise management commercial 
software packages, management model software bases, enterprise 
decision-making support systems, distributed network information 
systems, data collection systems, and industry and enterprise 
office automation systems (OA), and gradually apply them in 
enterprises. 
  Year 2020 
  --Comprehensively achieve computer-aided management in 80 
percent of enterprises in the machine-building and electronics 
industry. 
  --Implement production standard time work systems in 60 
percent of enterprises to substantially increase labor 
productivity and reduce production costs. 
  --Do research on modern management methods and the 
management 
technologies associated with computer-integrated production 
systems. 
  --Achieve office and marketing automation in 50 to 60 
percent 
of key enterprises in the machine-building and electronics 
industry. 
<H5>  Information and Communications </H5>
  The concept of information and communications technology in 
the ``Program'' refers to microelectronics technology, 
telecommunications and posts technology, computer systems and 
their peripherals and software technology, computer-aided 
technology, and information systems and office management 
technology. Among these, computer-aided technology refers 
primarily to computer-aided design (CAD), computer-aided 
manufacturing (CAM), computer-aided testing (CAT), and 
computer-integrated manufacturing systems (CIM) technology. 
Information systems refer to information collection, storage, 
processing, transmission, and utilization systems based on 
computers and modern telecommunications technology. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies </H5>
  To deal with the reality that China's lag behind the 
developed nations in the information and communications fields 
is still growing, formulating a correct development strategy for 
the information and communications technology field is extremely 
important. Based on analysis and research concerning the present 
international and domestic environment and conditions, the basic 
development strategy for this realm can be summarized as: 
  --Information and communications S&amp;T work must be 
oriented 
toward and lead development of our national economy and make its 
driving force meeting the needs that national economy places on 
the information and communications industry. Rationally and 
comprehensively arranging developmental research, applied 
research, and basic research to make the three form a deployment 
in depth mainly requires that our primary forces be concentrated 
on the present requirements of our national economic development 
and that we appropriately organize crack forces to orient toward 
the 21st Century and track new international technologies. 
  We must begin with China's current situation and 
characteristics, closely integrated scientific research, 
education, production, and utilization units, spur integration 
between scientific research and enterprises, shorten scientific 
research and production schedules, and spur the rapid conversion 
of scientific research achievements into forces of production. 
  --Adhere to the principle of ``importing, digesting, 
developing, innovating'' and integrating technology with trade, 
combine importing advanced technology from foreign countries 
with reinforcement of our own development and research, closely 
integrate imported technologies with domestic S&amp;T work so 
that 
each promotes the other, and raise domestic technology levels. 
  --Make full use of the macro control and decision-making 
roles of soft science. Research on communications network 
systems and standards must be the vanguard for communications 
equipment development and communications construction, and 
ensure that network technology plays a guidance, promotional, 
and restricting role for the three technologies of conversion, 
transmission, and terminals to gain the optimum economic results 
in construction of communications networks. 
  --The development of information and communications S&amp;T 
must 
have prominent foci. Among them, the focus of telecommunications 
technology is on program controlled conversion, fiber optic 
communications, mobile communications, satellite communications, 
digital microwave, and ISDN network technology for use in all 
types of telecommunications networks. The focus of technology in 
the postal administration is on reducing physical labor and 
raising mail processing rates, improving the working 
environment, and establishing a rational postal administration 
network system. The focus for microelectronics technology 
development is on complete sets of techniques and technology and 
technology quality monitoring and control system technology for 
commercialized production of sub-micrometer very-large scale 
integrated circuits. The development focus for computer 
technology is making comprehensive breakthroughs in production 
technology for fourth generation computer systems and gaining an 
understanding of the key technologies for a new generation of 
computer systems. 
  The overall strategic direction for this realm is rapidly 
reversing the passive situation of China's still-expanding lag 
behind the developed countries and the new emerging 
industrializing countries and regions. Information and 
communications technology should be made into a tractive force 
that spurs China's social and economic development. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives </H5>
  Strategic objectives for communications S&amp;T development: 
  Prior to 2000, the development of communications S&amp;T 
should 
serve the achievement of a six-fold increase in posts and 
telecommunications capacity, the basic achievement of 
self-sufficiency in telecommunications and postal and 
communications network upgrading and construction and in primary 
equipment, technology, and techniques (basic self-sufficiency 
refers to the next value of imports after offsetting imports and 
exports not exceeding the gross value of industrial output), and 
strive to attain international levels of the late 1980's in 
S&amp;T 
levels for certain important realms. 
  By 2020, communications S&amp;T development must serve 
accelerated development of our posts and telecommunications 
capacity, serve the continued perfection and development of 
postal and telecommunications networks, and use S&amp;T as a 
pillar 
for establishing a complete communications industrial colony. 
Basically achieve a shift to domestic production for the 
technology, techniques, and communications equipment required 
for communications network construction. Further shorten our lag 
in scientific research levels behind the developed nations in 
the communications S&amp;T realm and strive to catch up with 
advanced international levels for scientific research levels in 
certain specializations. 
  The strategic objectives for development of microelectronics 
and computer S&amp;T: 
  By 2000, microelectronics and computer S&amp;T development 
levels 
should attain the levels of the early and mid-1980's in the 
developed countries, meaning they will lag 15 to 20 years behind 
the developed countries. 
  By 2020, China's microelectronics and computer S&amp;T 
development levels should attain levels of 2005 to 2015 in the 
developed nations, meaning they will lag 10 to 15 years behind. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Communications technology. </H5>
  1. Network technology: work on problems concerning network 
digital mode compatibility technology; gradually gain an 
understanding of network synchronization technology; develop 
network management systems; do research on technical system 
standardization for integrated services digital networks (ISDN); 
establish an ISDN experimental base area, gradually develop 
integrated services digital networks. After 2000, complete 
inspection and certification of broadband integrated services 
digital network (B-ISDN) technical systems, standardization, and 
experimental networks. 
  2. Telephone switching technology: Gain a comprehensive 
understanding of moderate and large capacity digital stored 
program controlled (SPC) switching systems equipment production 
and develop the various related technologies; conduct research 
on SPC digital switches appropriate for ISDN; do research on 
broadband switching and on-board satellite switching technology; 
form a SPC digital switching equipment industry on a substantial 
scale. After 2000, continue to do research on broadband 
switching technology (including optical switching) and on-board 
satellite switching technology and gradually put it into use. 
  3. Transmission technology: Give preference to the 
development of digital transmission technology, make major 
efforts to develop fiber optic communications, satellite 
communications, digital microwave communications, and other new 
technologies, actively do R&amp;D on circuit multiplexing 
technology 
and capacity expansion technology, focus on developing mobile 
communications; undertake research and application of production 
technology, form a scale production capability for all major 
types of transmission measures equipment systems. After 2000, 
gain an understanding of Gb/s high-speed optical transmission 
system technology, do research on urban broadband network 
optical transmission technology, large-capacity extra-long 
lifespan satellite communications technology, technology for 
using new microwave bands, and so on. 
  4. Data communications technology: Develop all types of data 
terminal equipment, switching and transmission equipment, 
network control center equipment, and so on; rely primarily on 
our own developments to gradually establish public packet data 
communications networks; after 2000, continue to do research on 
high-speed packet switching technology for voice, data, and 
other integrated services and put them into use. 
  5. Fax and telegraph communications technology. 
  6. Secure communications technology: do research on 
encryption theory and detection standards, do research on public 
packet switching network encryption technology, develop data, 
fax, voice communications, and other types of encryption 
equipment. 
  7. Communications instruments technology. 
  8. Postal administration technology: Further scientifically 
organize and optimize central bureau system postal 
communications networks. Do R&amp;D on postal administration 
network 
scientific management, monitoring and control, and postal 
service digital integration systems, postal administration 
network technology for advanced applications, and complete sets 
of postal administration equipment. 
<H5>  B. Microelectronics and computer technology. </H5>
  See the Medium and Long-Term S&amp;T Development Program for 
Machine-Building and Electronics for details of industrial 
technology development for microelectronics and computer 
technology. 
  To develop the information and communications industry, the 
microelectronics and computer industries must: 
  1. Make major efforts to develop application specific 
integrated circuits (ASIC), fuse development of microelectronics 
and systems development together, try to make substantial 
improvements in information and communications product 
performance and reliability, reduce costs, reduce volumes, 
increase competitiveness. 
  To accomplish this, we must concentrate forces to establish 
one to three technically stable and nationally oriented 
processing centers (foundries), popularize large-scale 
integrated circuit CAD technology, and establish several 10 or 
over 100 design centers. We should also strive to stabilize the 
technology for the 3 to 5 micrometer imported production lines, 
open up processing services to all of society, and strive to use 
the development of ASIC to fully foster the potential of 
existing equipment. 
  2. Reverse the abnormal situation of only have software 
research and basically having no industry. Focus on developing a 
large software capacity, try to provide the program controlled 
switch software, information management system software, CIMS 
software, and other large software required for the development 
of China's information systems as quickly as possible. 
  3. Make major efforts to develop Chinese input computer 
technology, lay a foundation for having information systems 
permeate all aspects of our national economy and society. 
  4. Develop China's own systems design forces, try to form a 
large information system design capability as quickly as 
possible. 
<H5>  Metallic Materials </H5>
  Metallic materials are important raw materials required in 
the energy, communications, machine-building, electronics, 
chemical, light and textiles, and other industries. S&amp;T work 
in 
the metallic materials industry must resolutely serve enterprise 
technical upgrading, production, and construction, actively 
digest, absorb, and innovate imported technology, make major 
efforts to organize attacks on key S&amp;T problems and develop 
technology to make several important achievements in new 
technologies, new equipment, and network materials, and make the 
necessary contribution to economic construction, social 
development, and national defense modernization. 
  At present, the main problems facing the metallic materials 
industry are: 1) Product quality and variety that do not meet 
the needs of China's readjustment of the industrial structure 
and technical progress; 2) A low self-sufficiency rate and an 
acute contradiction between supply and demand; 3) A lack of 
fundamental changes in the situation within the industry of 
uneven development, a lack of proper matchups, and backward 
techniques, technologies, and equipment. The basic solution is 
reform, reliance on S&amp;T progress, and reliance on scientific 
management to achieve even greater development of the forces of 
production in the metallic materials industry and move overall 
S&amp;T levels near to advanced world levels more quickly. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies. </H5>
  From now until the end of this century, the metallic 
materials industry must resolutely and unwaveringly adhere to 
the 13th CPC Central Committee's strategy of ``focusing on 
results, improved quality, coordinated development, stable 
growth''. Focusing on S&amp;T progress and economic results 
involves 
fundamental work to make greater changes in the face of the 
metallic materials industry. 
  The iron and steel industry must make product variety and 
quality its strategic focus, and its goal for the year 2000 is: 
with a prerequisite of continually improving product quality, 
expanding product variety, improving economic results, 
conserving energy and reducing consumption, and improving the 
environment, attain a steel output of 80 to 90 million tons. In 
the steel product structure, increase sheet and pipe from 36 
percent in 1986 to about 45 percent; produce 60 percent of steel 
which attains international standards and advanced standards in 
foreign countries; substantially alleviate shortages of key 
product varieties for about 100 types of products needed by all 
sectors of the national economy. 
  The non-ferrous metals industry must make increasing output, 
expanding product variety, and improving quality its strategic 
focus. By 2000, strive for output of 4 to 4.5 million tons of 10 
types of non-ferrous metals, increase the comprehensive 
utilization rate of paragenetic non-ferrous metals in key 
smelting enterprises from 50 percent to 70 to 80 percent, reduce 
DC electricity consumption per ton of aluminum in key aluminum 
mills from 14,800 kWh to 13,000 to 13,200 kWh, increase the 
finished product rate for copper sheet and band from 50 to 60 
percent up to 70 to 80 percent, and for primary products 
excluding copper and nickel, strive to achieve self-sufficiency 
in quantity, continually expand the product variety of 
non-ferrous metals, rare metals, and new materials, and improve 
quality. 
  By 2020, make the basic configuration, enterprise structure, 
technology structure, product variety structure, product 
quality, and staff quality in the metallic materials industry 
more scientific and rational and establish a preliminary 
industrial system with Chinese characteristics that is 
internationally competitive that basically meets our national 
industrialization and modernization requirements. 
  To achieve this arduous task, we must use new technology to 
upgrade traditional techniques and equipment to shift the 
metallic materials industry onto the track of modern S&amp;T and 
modern scientific management. For this purpose, we must 
formulate an S&amp;T development strategy that is appropriate for 
our step-by-step achievement of our development objectives, and 
its guiding ideology and basic principles are: 
  1. S&amp;T in the iron and steel industrial must make 
expanding 
product variety and improving quality its fundamental principle. 
It must resolutely adhere to the technical principle of fine 
material, fining, precision rolling, and finishing and strive to 
improve product quality. It must focus on developing low-alloy 
steel and alloy steel, reinforce scientific research and 
production for special steels, and form a leading-edge technical 
base area as quickly as possible to service industrial 
development and new technology industry. S&amp;T work in the 
non-ferrous metals industry must make increasing output, 
expanding product variety, and improving quality its fundamental 
principle. It must give preference to developing aluminum, 
actively developing lead, zinc, gold, and silver, create the 
conditions for developing copper, and selectively develop other 
non-ferrous metals to meet the development needs of our national 
economy. 
  2. Continually reform techniques and equipment and develop 
new technologies to change the situation of high consumption of 
raw materials, energy, and labor per unit of product and severe 
pollution. 
  3. Weak mines and insufficient resources are an acute 
contradiction in development of the metallic materials industry. 
While using the ore resources of foreign countries, we must 
place our standpoint on rapid development of domestic mines. We 
must accelerate exploration and development of resources in 
serious shortage, improve extraction rates and the extent of 
utilization, and protect resources and the ecology and 
environment. 
  We must rationally utilize mineral resources and renewable 
resources, focus on comprehensive utilization of resources, and 
strive to raise utilization levels for valuable elements and 
useful materials. 
  4. Pay full attention to basic research work, make 
comprehensive arrangements for development research, applied 
research, basic research, and soft science research. 
  5. We must focus on digesting, transplanting, extending, and 
innovating imported technology as a strategic issue. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  Year 2000 
  1. Organize attacks on key problems targeted on the key 
product varieties required by departments of the national and 
the national defense industry and the new types of materials 
required for high-tech development, provide several important 
achievements, and apply them in production and construction. 
Attain the levels of developed countries of the early 1980's in 
most realms of new materials S&amp;T and attain advanced levels 
of 
the period for some of them. 
  2. Provide new technologies and new equipment to improve 
production technology and raise equipment levels in existing 
enterprises. Attain levels of the late 1970's or early 1980's 
for the primary techniques and production technologies in large 
enterprises. 
  3. Make major efforts to improve product quality, readjust 
the product mix. Actively implement international standards, 
develop measurement, testing, information bases, and other basic 
technical work, form integral metallic materials industry 
standards. 
  4. Undertake technology development centered on conserving 
energy and reducing consumption, use technical upgrading in an 
effort to attain total energy consumption of 1.4 tons of 
standard per ton of steel and total energy consumption of 8.5 
tons of standard coal per ton of aluminum in key enterprises. 
  5. Accelerate the conversion of S&amp;T constructions into 
forces 
of production. Attain a conversion rate of about 60 percent for 
moving technology development achievements into production. 
  Year 2020 
  Development and application of information technology, 
automation technology, new energy resource technology, new 
materials technology, and other key high-tech fields in the 
metallic materials industry will develop rapidly. Make 
breakthroughs in new materials technology realms where we have 
advantages, spur the development of related S&amp;T, and for an 
emerging industry with a high added value. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  In 2000, the focal tasks and key technologies for S&amp;T 
development are: 
<H5>  A. Geological surveying. </H5>
  1. Do research on the formational categories and mineral 
exploration directions of easily extracted and easily dressed 
iron ore, do forecasting of the mineralization of manganese-rich 
ores and superior quality manganese ore and chromium ore, 
further expand available mineral reserves. 
  2. Give preference to solving shortages of copper, gold, and 
silver ores, accelerate exploration for aluminum, lead, zinc, 
tin, antimony, and rare metal resources, undertake geological 
prospecting research for a second round of searching for 
minerals surrounding existing producing mines to extend the 
service lives of mines. Explore for minerals in strategic 
regions and zones, do research on the geological environment of 
mineralization, establish mineralization models, search for 
large non-ferrous metal ore beds. For copper, the middle and 
lower reaches of the Chang Jiang and the northeast region of 
Jiangxi are the main areas for doing focused research to locate 
large concealed ore deposits; for aluminum, we should do 
research on the formational conditions and ore exploration 
directions for bauxite in Guangxi, Guangdong, Fujian, Yunnan, 
and other regions and search for superior quality gibbsite and 
other types of bauxite. 
  3. Undertake research on new technologies, new methods, and 
new theories for locating all types of blind ore and concealed 
ore; increase rich ore reserves as quickly as possible, focus on 
developing high-precision prospecting technology and equipment 
and on computer ore exploration expert systems. In the early 
21st Century, develop geophysical chromatographic phase 
formation (CT) mineral prospecting technology, do deep-crust 
mineral prospecting and ocean geological surveys. 
<H5>  B. Dressing technology. </H5>
  In open-cut mines, develop gradient-assisted extraction 
techniques, improve large-region multiple-removal 
microdifferential blasting technology, increase the height of 
terraces, and increase the intensity of mineral extraction. 
Large deep-depression open-cut mines should accelerate their 
development of intermittent-continuous ore and rock 
transportation and high terrace soil removal techniques. 
Strengthen research on slope stability and monitoring and 
control, and under conditions where large high efficiency 
equipment is utilized, attain an annual downward movement rate 
of 10 to 12 meters in large open-cut mines. 
  Make major efforts to develop underground mine extraction 
techniques and technology, perfect and improve mine block 
collapse methods, mechanical filling mining methods, and large 
diameter deep hole mining method techniques and equipment, 
increase recovery rates. Strive to achieve mechanization and 
partial automation prior to 2000 in primary mines for tunneling, 
extraction, loading, and ore removal, achieve continuous mining 
and continuous ore removal. Moreover, we must strengthen 
research on deep mineral body extraction techniques and the 
associated equipment, rock dynamics, and ground pressure 
movement laws. 
  In the area of ore dressing technology, on a foundation of 
systematic research and summarization of process mineralogy for 
all primary ore resources, do research on differentiation of 
microfine particle embedded ore, weakly magnetic ore, 
polymetallic paragenetic compound ore, low-quality magnetite and 
high arsenic content and highly oxidized hard-to-dress ore, and 
manganese-poor ore and the related high efficiency, non-toxic, 
inexpensive new preparations and new equipment. Do research on 
rational comprehensive utilization of refined ore quality ore 
tailings. Do good environmental protection and improvement. 
<H5>  C. Comprehensive utilization of resources. </H5>
  For comprehensive utilization of Panzhihua Mine resources, 
we 
must do research on improving technical levels in titanium 
dressing and intensive processing technology for titanium and 
form a production capacity of 200 tons of crude titanium ore 
refining and titanium dregs, powdered titanium white, and spongy 
titanium plants on a substantial scale. Perfect and improve 
existing flow process vanadium extraction techniques and 
technology, increase vanadium recovery rates; do research on 
comprehensive utilization routes for blast furnace slag and 
techniques and technologies for extracting gallium and scandium. 
Continue studying new flow processes for iron and steel smelting. 
  For comprehensive utilization of Baotou Mine resources, we 
must undertake research and industrial experiments on economical 
and rational new flow processes for comprehensive recovery of 
iron, rare earths, and niobium and increase the extent of 
comprehensive utilization of primary ores. We must develop 
single rare earth separation technologies for Baotou rare earths 
and the ion-type rare earths of southern China and open up new 
routes for their application. Pioneer new technologies and new 
techniques for separation and extraction of highly pure (greater 
than 99.99) single rare earth oxides and single rare earth 
metals and strengthen applications of rare earths in metallurgy, 
agriculture and animal husbandry, high technology, and other 
realms. 
  For comprehensive utilization of Jinchuan Mine resources, we 
must do R&amp;D on highly efficient large-diameter borehole 
mineral 
extraction technology, increase output of rich ore, and meet the 
needs of doubling production. In addition, we must do R&amp;D on 
high-strength, non-polluting, low energy consumption production 
technologies and raise comprehensive utilization levels for 
copper, cobalt, and platinum family metals and other paragenetic 
elements. 
  For comprehensive utilization of Dachang resources, we must 
do research on high efficiency ore extraction technology, 
improve tunneling and ore removal capabilities, study and 
perfect ore dressing technologies, formulate rational product 
programs, develop high efficiency ground ore grading and 
separate dressing, concentration, and dehydration equipment, and 
increase recovery rates for tin, zinc, lead, antimony, silver, 
indium, and other dressed ores. Do research to solve problems in 
rational smelting technologies and equipment for comprehensive 
utilization of refined jamesonite and dimorphite resources. 
  Do research on dressing and smelting technology and 
comprehensive utilization for Buzhuyuan polymetallic ore, Hainan 
beach sand ore, and Liaoning ludwigite. 
<H5>  D. Iron smelting, steel smelting, and steel rolling </H5>
technology. 
  1. Integrated iron smelting technology. 
  Blast furnace iron smelting technology should be focused on 
high output, superior quality, low consumption, and long 
lifespans, strive to improve the quality of raw material, expand 
the proportion of pellets, readjust the furnace charge mix. Make 
major efforts to develop and apply high oxygen-content large 
coal spray technology, use coal as a substitute for coke, and 
use less coke. Develop and apply high-pressure, high wind 
temperature, low-silicon smelting and other new technologies and 
blast furnace coal gas dry method dust removal technology. Adopt 
effective measures to make the lifespans of large blast furnaces 
that undergo major overhauls or are rebuilt during the 1990's to 
more than 8 years without intermediate repairs and a utilization 
coefficient of more than 2.0. Actively create the conditions to 
development non-blast furnace smelted iron production, explore 
molten reduction techniques and new full-oxygen iron smelting 
technologies. 
  2. Steel smelting technology. 
  The focus in rotating furnace steel smelting to solving 
problems with reblowing techniques and technology and equipment 
as well as the associated matching technologies, basic theory, 
and other problems. Do research based on raw materials 
conditions and product quality to improve and extend molten iron 
desiliconization, dephosphorization, and desulfurization as well 
as limited slag steel smelting and outside-the-furnace fining 
technology. Large and medium-sized rotating furnaces require 
research on perfection and detection, automatic control 
technology, and static electricity dust removal technology. The 
objective for the imported molten iron pretreatment-steel 
smelting-fining-continuous casting production lines at the 
Baoshan Iron and Steel Complex and Wuhan Iron and Steel Complex 
should be on the production variety and quality of ultra-deep 
steel stamping, silicon steel, tin-plated steel, and other 
superior cold sheet rolling, organize systematic S&amp;T research 
and development work, and strive to attain international levels 
of the time. 
  The development direction for electric furnace steel 
smelting 
technical processes should be integration with high-power or 
ultra-high power electric furnaces and outside-the-furnace 
fining and the matching continuous casting to achieve energy 
conservation and reduced consumption, stable components, and 
pure quality steel. Undertake experimental research on DC 
electric arc steel smelting, plasma steel smelting, and other 
new technologies. Develop the corresponding special smelting and 
outside-the-furnace treatment technologies based on production 
variety requirements. 
  The focus in development of continuous casting technology is 
on research to gain an understanding of modernized plate slab 
continuous casting, circular blank continuous casting and alloy 
steel continuous casting suitable for steel pipe, and plants 
having the proper conditions should develop as appropriate 
horizontal continuous casting and odd-shaped blank continuous 
casting; pay attention to research on the technologies 
associated with continuous casting, improve production 
management systems, strengthen production operation technology 
for existing casting machines, link up prior and subsequent work 
procedures, strive to attain a design capability as quickly as 
possible. Continually expand the types of continuous casted 
steel, improve the quality of cast blanks. Focus on solving 
problems with shipbuilding plate, container plate, deeply 
stamped plate, common alloy structural steel, high-strength 
structural steel, spring steel, stainless steel, and other 
continuous casting technologies, achieve hot loading and hot 
transportation or direct rolling of continuous casting blanks in 
some plants. Import and digest thin sheet blank continuous 
casting and rolling technology. Attain a national rate of more 
than 50 percent for continuous casting and a proportion of more 
than 20 percent for continuous casting of alloy steel. 
  3. Steel rolling technology. 
  In the area of sheet material, medium thickness sheet 
production must do research on and apply large cross-section 
high rigidity rolling mills, adopt controlled rolling, plane 
sheet shape control, and other technologies to produce wide and 
thick plate. Hot and cold broad-band steel rolling production 
should do R&amp;D on hot transportation, hot loading, and direct 
rolling production technologies, and study and apply high-speed 
high-power large coil re-rolling mills, plate shape control 
technology with hydraulic micro-adjustments, hydraulic curved 
rollers, and controllable roller shapes as well as no-acid 
dephosphorization technology. In product development, we must 
further develop surface plating technology and intensive 
processing technology. 
  In the area of steel pipe, seamless pipe production should 
strengthen a production division of labor and develop toward 
specialization. We must develop continuous rolling pipe mills, 
three-high rolling mills, and compression mill production 
technology and do rational selection based on the scale of 
production and production variety characteristics to adopt 
optimum mill types. Develop welded petroleum pipes, boiler 
pipes, and other new welded pipes. 
  Shaped steel production should do R&amp;D on universal 
rolling 
mills. Extend and adopt short stress and pre-stressed mill 
frameworks, periodic cross-section and unusual shape precision 
rolling technology, and develop high efficiency rolling mills 
with techniques that are matched up with continuous casting. In 
wire production, we must digest high-speed twist-free rolling 
mills. Further develop intensive processing technology for 
finished metal products and so on. 
  Enterprises having the proper conditions should gradually 
develop on-line detection, rapid roller replacement, continuous 
annealing, cutting and packaging, and other precision adjustment 
equipment automatic continuous operation technology in the 
rolled steel production process and achieve partial computer 
control. 
  Steel smelting and steel rolling should make major efforts 
to 
extend all types of new technology to increase finished blank 
rates and finished material rates. 
<H5>  E. Copper and aluminum smelting and processing technology. </H5>
  For copper, lead, and zinc smelting, extend oxygen-rich 
smelting and flash smelting technology; do R&amp;D on new 
continuous 
smelting techniques and equipment and simplified technical flow 
processes; undertake zinc sulfide refined ore oxygen pressure 
acid immersion and other experiments and equipment development; 
radical-controlled arsenic and sulfur contamination; reduce 
energy consumption in smelting. Strive to increase the capacity 
of different smelting equipment by 10 to 15 percent and reduce 
energy consumption by 10 to 50 percent by the end of this 
century. 
  The focus of research on copper processing is on research on 
unidirectional flow replaceable inductor smelting furnaces, high 
precision rolling, continuous casting, oxide-free compression, 
disk and pipe stretching, bright heat annealing, and other new 
techniques and new equipment. In addition, we must expand 
product varieties and strengthen research on wire drawing frame 
materials, high softening point water tank bands, 
high-performance elastic materials, high precision waveguide 
tubes, and other processing technologies. 
  The aluminum smelting industry must focus on energy 
conservation technology. Aluminum oxide must integrate with the 
characteristics of China's ores and use digestion and 
development of the key technology and equipment of indirect 
heating reinforced dissolving to do further research on 
high-efficiency energy-saving new aluminum oxide production 
techniques and equipment to reduce total energy consumption per 
unit of aluminum oxide to 4.5 million kilocalories using the 
Baeyer method and less than 7 million kilocalories using the 
integrated method; aluminum electrolysis should do R&amp;D on 
complete sets of large electrolysis trough technologies and 
equipment, complete industrial research on 280 kA intermediate 
loading electrolysis tanks and extend and apply them in actual 
production to increase the current efficiency in electrolytic 
aluminum production to 93 to 95 percent, and actively do 
research on high-efficiency energy-saving new types of 
electrolysis troughs and techniques. In the early 21st Century, 
we will be doing R&amp;D on single water hard aluminum ore 
production aluminum oxide evaporation-free and dregs-free 
technologies and develop large technologies and equipment for 
producing aluminum oxide from nepheline. We will also strengthen 
research on chlorination-electrolysis techniques for smelting 
magnesium from magnesite. 
  Aluminum processing should develop new types of low energy 
consumption smelting equipment and electromagnetic casting, 
electromagnetic purification, and other techniques, do further 
development of aluminum alloy fining agents, and will be 
required to be capable of casting 20 ton and larger high-quality 
cast ingots. Develop multiple mill framework hot precision 
rolling technology and equipment to meet the product variety and 
quality requirements represented by can material, and develop 
water-based lubricants for use in high-speed cold rolling and 
use them in production. In addition, do R&amp;D on polyester band 
composites with aluminum foil added, aluminum band insulating 
fiber composites, insulated aluminum windows and composite 
shaped materials, functional film aluminum foil bands, and other 
intensively processed products. 
<H5>  F. Tungsten, antimony, and hard alloy intensive processing. </H5>
  Do R&amp;D on techniques and technologies for direct 
production 
of tungsten carbide from refined tungsten ore, liquid film 
separation technologies, ultrafine tungsten carbide powder 
production technologies, and so on; do research on hard alloy 
material structures and surface processing technology, increase 
the overall performance of hard alloys. In the early part of the 
21st Century, do research on non-abrasive optimum forming and 
sintering technologies. Undertake research on laser coating, 
diamond-plated layers, and other new technologies, strive to 
make China's hard alloy intensive processing technology enter 
advanced world levels. 
  Actively antimony-bearing, gold-bearing, antimony salt, and 
other antimony series products, focus on doing research on 
intensive processing technology for concentrated diantimony 
trioxide particle material, antimony-bearing flame retardant 
parent particle material, antimony based composite flame 
retardant agents, and other series of products, make China's 
antimony product overall quality indices attain advanced 
international levels, and strive to enable China's primary 
antimony products to enter the international market by the year 
2000. 
<H5>  G. Development and utilization of gold and silver resources. </H5>
  Focus on strengthening research on the mineralization laws 
of 
new categories of ore beds and ore prospecting methods to 
provide prospective regions and target regions for locating 
large gold deposits, increase the resources available for mine 
construction, and undertake research on ore prospecting in areas 
surrounding old mines. Do research on technologies to enable 
extraction of thin ore veins with different preservation 
conditions and altered rock fractured mineral beds; make 
breakthroughs in extraction technologies for placer gold ore 
beds in frozen soil zones; focus on solving problems in smelting 
technologies for arsenic-bearing, carbon-bearing, microfine 
impregnated, and low-grade gold ores. Accelerate research on 
techniques for dressing ore from gold and silver in polymetallic 
ores and platinum family metals and on new techniques for 
comprehensive extraction of the gold, silver, and platinum 
family metals in smelting intermediate products; raise 
utilization rates for precious metal resources. Propose 
technologies having practical value for extracting gold from 
seawater and technologies for recovering platinum family metals 
from nuclear power plant wastes in 2020. 
<H5>  H. New types of materials. </H5>
  1. High-performance conventional materials. Focus on 
developing super-high strength steels, high strength and 
super-high strength highly malleable steel, casing steel, 
low-temperature steel, non-rusting heat resistant steel, wear 
resistant steel; aluminum-lithium alloys, magnesium-lithium 
alloys, high strength, highly malleable aluminum alloys, 
corrosion resistant alloys, high temperature resistant titanium 
alloys, and copper, nickel, beryllium, zirconium, hafnium, and 
other special alloy materials. Attain levels of the developed 
countries of the late 1980's or early 1990's for product quality 
and basically satisfy demand. 
  2. Functional materials. We must achieve systematic 
production of Nd-Fe-B permanent magnet materials and we must 
enter the international market in rare earth permanent magnetic 
materials. Undertake development of new types of rare earth 
functional materials. Develop non-crystalline materials and 
apply them; iron-based non-crystalline magnetic materials must 
attain an industrial scale. Develop fast-hardening 
microcrystalline materials with unique properties. Develop 
silicon materials for use in integrated circuit wiring 
sub-micrometer technology and silicon materials for use in high 
voltage high power electronic components, _P_ 100 mm gallium 
arsenide and other chemical compound semiconductor materials and 
their ultra-thin layer epitaxy technology, and semiconductor 
materials manufacturing technology for use in solar cells. Do 
research on precious metals materials for use in 
high-performance precision instruments, develop pulp, metal 
filaments, and precious metals composites for use in the 
economics industry. Develop low-temperature superconducting 
material applications technology, do research on 
high-temperature superconducting materials. Do research on 
damping materials and shape-recalling alloys and hydrogen 
storage materials. 
  3. New types of structural materials. Do research on 
ultra-pure, ultra-micrograined, microcrystalline, and 
non-crystalline powder preparation techniques. Do R&amp;D on 
oxide 
dispersed reinforced alloys, monocrystalline leaf materials, 
powdered high temperature alloys, engineering ceramics, special 
fire-resistant materials, and other new types of high 
temperature materials. Do R&amp;D on high strength high modulus 
hydrocarbon fiber and boron fiber, and their composites, develop 
steel-steel, steel-nonmetallic, aluminum, magnesium, copper, 
titanium, and other metal-based composites. For those materials 
among them which have high requirements, involve considerable 
difficulty, and whose development is still in the initial 
stages, moving toward applications should be the main direction 
of attack, with selected breakthroughs in several types of 
products. Do research to gain an understanding of ion injection, 
plasma spray coating, physicochemical gaseous phase deposition, 
laser processing, and other surface modification technologies. 
<H5>  I. Energy conservation technology. </H5>
  Develop and utilize systems energy conservation technology, 
establish key enterprises, production workshops, and energy 
consuming equipment energy use optimization models, set 
production energy use parameters and rational energy consumption 
quotas, comprehensively optimize energy resource systems. 
Establish energy resource models for China's metallic materials 
industry, formulate rational structures for industrial system 
energy resources and technology systems for effective 
utilization of energy and resources. 
  Do research on technology for using weakly bonded coal for 
coking, explore new combustion technologies, improve combustion 
efficiency. Gain an understanding of the use of microelectronics 
technology for upgrading ovens and kilns that consume large 
amounts of energy and have outdated equipment. Do R&amp;D on 
energy-saving industrial ovens and kilns, implement 
microcomputer control. Focus on developing sensible heat 
utilization technology for high temperature materials and high 
temperature gases, do research to improve utilization rates for 
the sulfur in non-ferrous metallic ores, comprehensively raise 
residual heat and residual energy recovery and utilization 
levels. 
<H5>  J. Computer applications and automation technology. </H5>
  1. Rapidly improve the reliability and precision of existing 
smelting instrument and gauges, develop special instruments and 
gauges urgently needed in production, develop detection 
technology, analytical technology, and interface technology 
including transducers, extend and apply hydraulic drive and 
electrical drive equipment, increase the extent of 
mechanization, prepare the required conditions for computer 
applications. 
  2. Carry out structural analysis and design for automation 
systems at all levels based on enterprise scales and equipment 
capabilities, apply system integration theory and computer 
technology, do research on computer fully automated systems 
engineering. 
  3. Apply computer modelling and simulation technology, 
computer-aided design, and engineering automation technology, 
raise the scientific levels and working efficiency of 
self-control systems design. Do research on mathematical 
modelling for production technology and enterprise 
administration and management, establish knowledge databases, 
and utilize artificial intelligence technology to develop expert 
systems. 
<H5>  K. Soft science research. </H5>
  Strengthen soft science research, achieve science and 
democracy in decision making, establish soft science research 
funds. Give prominence to research on development strategies and 
policy research such as metallic materials systems deployments, 
technical economics indicator systems, optimized matching of 
work procedure factors, and other problems, organize experts to 
conduct research demonstrations in all areas of S&amp;T, the 
economy, and society to provide a scientific foundation for 
making important decisions. 
<H5>  L. Applied research and basic research. </H5>
  The objectives for basic research and applied research in 
the 
metallic materials industry up to the end of this century and 
into the early part of the next century are to concentrate on 
the strategic foci in development of the metallic materials 
industry and explore new technological development routes; to do 
research on effective ways to improve the quality of key 
products and the development directions for new materials, and 
to provide a scientific basis and technical foundation for 
solving problems in theory and applications. At the same time, 
track developments in modern materials science, try to make 
important breakthroughs in certain fields where we have a 
relatively good foundation, and attain advanced international 
levels. 
  Research foci: continuous smelting, vacuum metallurgy, 
plasma 
metallurgy, molten reduction, ultrapure steel smelting, and 
other new technologies and methods, as well as development and 
utilization of compound paragenetic mineral resources. Do 
research on the related thermodynamics problems and macro 
kinetics problems, carry out systematic basic data measurement 
and accumulation. Do research on microalloyization and the 
behavior of minute amounts of contaminants in the deformation 
and phase transformation processes, strengthening and increased 
flexibility mechanisms, and materials fatigue, corrosion, 
fracturing, wear, and other loss principles. Do research to 
explore the microstructures, surfaces, and boundaries of 
materials and the relationship of contaminants and defects to 
performance, do research on the mechanisms of the materials 
phase transformation and phase formation processes under the 
effects of external fields, metastable phase phase formation 
laws and phase structure characteristics. Establish materials 
science and technology databases and expert systems to design 
new materials as well as metallurgical system mathematical and 
physical models, and so on. Pay attention to research on rock 
dynamics, metals pressure processing, dynamic metallurgy, 
thermodynamics theory, surface science, and other S&amp;T. 
<H5>  Chemical Industry </H5>
  The chemical industry is an important industrial sector that 
uses coal, petroleum, natural gas, natural minerals, and organic 
matter as raw materials to produce chemical fertilizer, organic 
and inorganic basic raw materials, synthetic materials, fine 
chemical products, and other things. As a basic industry, it has 
obvious characteristics like many varieties of products, a broad 
area of service, powerful matching up, and so on, and it 
provides development of our national economy with many important 
raw materials and adds an abundant variety of consumption 
commodities needed in the people's lives. It supports 
agriculture and industry, bears the glorious mission of 
achieving agricultural modernization, and wholeheartedly 
supports agricultural development. Many of the economically 
developed nations have invariably adopted strategies that give 
preference to its development, preferential investments, and 
preferential growth to place the chemical industry in the 
leading ranks of their national economies. In the world of the 
future, the chemical industry will be an important part in 
improving the material and spiritual lives of the Earth's 
population of 6 to 7 billion people and in new energy resource 
development, materials science, biochemical engineering, and 
environmental protection projects in high-tech realms and its 
role cannot be neglected. It can be predicted that during the 
next century the chemical industry will still serve as one of 
the primary industries and will occupy an extremely important 
status in the economic development of all countries. 
  The 21st Century will be an era of rapid development of 
science and technology and a high degree of integration of 
S&amp;T, 
the economy, and society. The globalization of S&amp;T will move 
China's chemical industry S&amp;T into development on a world 
scale 
and it will face intense challenges. Every chemical industry 
S&amp;T 
worker must feel a heavy sense of duty, and the next 10 years or 
even the next several decades will be an era in which there is 
much for them to do. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Industry development strategies and objectives. </H5>
  By the end of this century, the chemical industry will face 
the two important tasks of propelling a revolution in 
traditional industry and catching up with the world's new 
technological revolution. For this reason, the chemical industry 
must choose the route of relying on S&amp;T, improving economic 
results, satisfying social demand, and coordinated and stable 
development, establish a benefits, quality, and intensive 
development strategy, and move the chemical industry from 
extensive administration onto the track of intensive 
administration. Development and construction of the chemical 
industry must be organically integrated with economic results 
and the requirements of national economic development and use a 
minimum of inputs to obtain the optimum outputs. Concretely 
speaking, this means that existing enterprises must serve as the 
foundation and S&amp;T must serve as the vanguard in making 
breakthroughs in digesting, absorbing, and innovating new 
imported technology and accelerating development of the 
petrochemical industry, use technical upgrading as the means to 
optimize the industrial structure, orient toward the 
international and domestic markets, and make major efforts to 
develop agricultural chemical products, basic chemical raw 
materials, and synthetic materials while at the same time 
actively opening new realms in the refined chemical industry. 
  By the year 2000, the primary chemical products of the 
chemical industry should basically satisfy the requirements in 
quantity, product variety, quality, and other areas for 
development of all sectors of our national economy and 
improvement in the people's living standards, and the production 
technology and equipment of primary chemical industry products 
should attain advanced international levels of the 1970's and 
1980's. The value of output in the chemical industry will rise 
from 62.23 billion yuan in 1980 to 280 billion yuan in 2000, 4.5 
times the 1980 amount. Actual profits will increase from 10.86 
billion yuan in 1980 to 55 billion yuan in 2000, 5.1 times the 
1980 amount. Full-staff labor productivity in the chemical 
industry will increase from 15,800 yuan/man-year in 1980 to 
30,000 yuan/man-year in 2000. Energy consumption per value of 
output in the chemical industry will drop from 19 tons of 
standard coal/10,000 yuan in 1980 to 10 tons of standard 
coal/10,000 yuan in 2000. 
<H5>  B. S&amp;T development strategies and objectives. </H5>
  Year 2000 
  Starting now and up to the year 2000, S&amp;T progress in 
the 
chemical industry will implement an S&amp;T development strategy 
of 
developing production technology in the traditional chemical 
industry as the main factor with development of emerging 
chemical industry technology as the auxiliary factor. The 
primary content is: giving primacy to the development of the 
production technology that is important, advanced, and suitable 
for industrialization to develop large-scale production and 
basically establishing the technology and equipment required for 
the construction of large production facilities that are 
representative of the primary industry on domestic sources; 
making the formation of industries the objective for limited 
selection of emerging technological realms in the chemical 
industry, achieving technical breakthroughs, and laying a 
technical foundation for emerging industries; resolutely having 
high starting points in technology development with a 
appropriate degree of leading, increasing the span of technology 
and time, striving to achieve leap forward-type development, and 
reducing our lag behind advanced international levels; being 
concerned with the technology and economic benefits of 
scientific research, providing advanced and appropriate S&amp;T 
achievements. 
  The development objectives for S&amp;T in the chemical 
industry 
that are established on the basis of the S&amp;T development 
strategy outlined above are: 
  1. Basically achieve a shift to domestic production for the 
industry's primary advanced technology and equipment. 
  We must concentrate forces and focus on attacking key 
problems concerning complete sets of production technology and 
equipment. On the basis of digesting and absorbing imported 
technology, do good innovation, integrate technology and 
results, and work simultaneously on technology and equipment. We 
must adapt to the realities of China's resource conditions and 
technical structure, ensure that complete sets of technology and 
equipment are advanced, integral, and appropriate, attain 
advanced levels of the 1970's and 1980's for the industry's 
primary newly-built and upgraded production facilities, and 
achieve a self-sufficiency rate of 80 percent calculated on the 
basis of investments. 
  2. Make major efforts to develop new products and improve 
product quality, rationalize the chemical industry product mix. 
  The development direction for new products is to develop 
high, precision, incisive, and specialized product varieties, 
work quickly to resolve serious shortages and fill in blank 
spaces, export to earn foreign exchange, have production 
technology to replace imported products, and accelerate product 
renewal and replacement. Strengthen intensive processing and 
precision processing, increase the added value of products. 
Adhere to the principle of quality first, actively improve 
product quality. Complete the development of and place into 
production over 300 new national-grade chemical industry 
products each year. By the end of this century, 70 percent of 
China's 1,200 primary chemical industry products should adopt 
international standards or advanced standards from foreign 
countries, and the rate of a shift to refined products for 
chemical industry products should reach 40 percent. 
  3. Lay a preliminary technical foundation for focusing on 
emerging technical realms in the chemical industry. 
  Development of chemical industry emerging technology should 
adopt the principle of ``limited objectives'', with the focus 
being placed on new materials in the chemical industry, modern 
biochemical products, the modern coal-formed synthetic gas 
chemical industry, computer applications technology, and other 
emerging technological industries in the chemical industry, with 
the value of output from their directly produced chemical 
industry products reaching about 10 percent of the gross value 
of output in the chemical industry. 
  4. Complete a highly effective chemical industry S&amp;T 
development system. 
  Further strengthen and perfect the chemical industry's 
S&amp;T 
development organizations, achieve a rational deployment and 
coordinated configuration of industry technology development 
centers, enterprise research organizations, and regional 
scientific research units, and reinforce close cooperation with 
institutions of higher education, the Chinese Academy of 
Sciences, and other scientific research forces. On a foundation 
of consolidating existing specialized research directions, make 
good readjustments in research realms, open up and extend new 
disciplines and specialized fields; continue strengthening 
chemical industry S&amp;T staff construction, achieve 100,000 
S&amp;T 
personnel involved in chemical industry S&amp;T development by 
the 
end of the century, and pay close attention to training 
top-notch S&amp;T personnel to have several high-level discipline 
leaders in primary chemical industry specializations and 
technical fields; further perfect S&amp;T development conditions, 
adopt advanced instruments and equipment, upgrade existing 
experimental facilities, establish several R&amp;D base areas, 
and 
complete a unique chemical industry S&amp;T information system. 
By 
the year 2000, China's chemical industry S&amp;T forces and 
technological innovation forces will attain relatively advanced 
levels and be capable of competing with the world's developed 
countries in technology development in several chemical industry 
realms. 
  Year 2020 
  During the early part of the next century, on the basis of 
completing modernization of traditional production, China's 
chemical industry S&amp;T will move toward achieving a 
transition to 
comprehensive development of emerging technology industry, and 
S&amp;T development in the chemical industry will mainly involve 
creation and competition with the economically developed 
countries. Its S&amp;T development strategies and objectives are: 
  1. Accelerate the application of modern S&amp;T 
achievements to 
upgrade the traditional chemical industry and establish emerging 
chemical industry clusters. 
  Make full use of the state's high-tech development 
conditions, propel the development of chemical industry emerging 
technology and products, occupy our rightful status in refined 
materials, space materials, biological preparations, marine 
technology, and other emerging industry clusters. Broadly apply 
microelectronics technology, greatly improve scientific 
research, design, and production levels and efficiency, improve 
product quality; accelerate the development of uses for coal and 
its organic matter, attain advanced levels in the petrochemical 
industry in primary technical economics indices, and achieve a 
development in the structure of chemical industry raw materials 
toward diversification and multiple uses; develop new closed 
cycle non-polluting technologies, reform production technologies 
that endanger safety, replace highly toxic products, achieve 
environmental protection and safe production. 
  2. Meet the needs of the state's high-tech development in 
the 
new century, provide vanguard new products and new materials. 
  Coordinate with the development foci for China's S&amp;T 
during 
the early part of the 21st Century, create and provide 
systematic and specialized new chemical industry materials and 
chemical products, mainly including polymer synthetic materials 
with superior performance; ultra-pure and highly pure refined 
chemical products; specialized chemical products, solvents, coal 
media, and high-energy fuels for unique uses; new types of 
functional materials and structural materials, materials with 
environmental diagnosis and self-restoration functions, targeted 
materials to satisfy special requirements, and so on. 
  3. Form the ability to do our own development and 
manufacturing of modern advanced, highly efficient, and 
large-scale equipment. 
  With the objective of achieving systemization, 
standardization, general purpose usage, and intelligence in 
chemical industry machinery, equipment, and instruments, raise 
levels and self-sufficiency rates for sets of equipment in the 
chemical industry as a whole, and place some products into a 
world vanguard status. Complete fully-automated workshops and 
plants that approach modern advanced levels, safe, convenient, 
highly efficient, and very flexible production facilities and 
intelligent self-moving reaction equipment, and so on. 
  4. Undertake guidance-type basic research, achieve new 
breakthroughs in chemical industry S&amp;T development. 
  In development of new technology in the chemical industry, 
apply new achievements in chemistry, physics, biology, 
materials, information, and other sciences to accelerate 
development of synthesis technology, catalysis technology, 
separation technology, processing technology, and comprehensive 
utilization technology, spur reform in chemical industry 
production processes, develop new production technologies, 
achieve design and production of new chemical industry products 
based on the required properties, attain maximum utilization of 
resources. 
  5. Further strengthen construction of the chemical industry 
S&amp;T development system. 
  On the foundation of basically completing construction of a 
highly efficient chemical industry S&amp;T development system, we 
must continue to readjust and extend S&amp;T development realms, 
strengthen S&amp;T forces and development capabilities, reinforce 
multidisciplinary and multidepartment research, focus on the 
development of highly efficient and flexible information 
systems, strengthen absorption of advanced technology, increase 
the proportion of technology outputs, and achieve a balance with 
technology imports. At that time, China's chemical industry 
S&amp;T 
in certain realms will be in a vanguard status in the world. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
  Each sector within the chemical industry has its own 
technological characteristics as well as many common aspects 
that form an integral chemical industry technology development 
system that is mutually promoting and mutually restricting in 
which each is both independent and closely related. To fully 
display the two aspects of the unique technologies and common 
technologies in each sector within the chemical industry, this 
program divides the two aspects of the S&amp;T tasks and 
preferential development for the key technologies in the major 
sectors to compile the key tasks for chemical industry S&amp;T 
development for the next 10-plus years. 
<H5>  S&amp;T Tasks in Key Sectors </H5>
  Based on product service targets, product performance 
characteristics, technological category, and so on, the S&amp;T 
development tasks are divided into six areas. 
<H5>  A. Agricultural chemical products. </H5>
  Production of agricultural chemical products is the most 
important task of the chemical industry. The primary tasks for 
S&amp;T development are to develop the complete sets of 
production 
technologies and equipment for large production facilities, 
develop new product varieties, and make the internal structure 
and proportion of all categories of products tend toward 
rationality. 
  1. Chemical fertilizer. On a foundation of digesting and 
absorbing imported technology and equipment, develop, design, 
manufacture, and construct all scales of production facilities 
based on domestic sources. Nitrogen fertilizer must further 
improve gasification technology for all types of raw materials, 
do research on a variety of high efficiency catalysts, develop 
highly efficient and low energy consumption purification 
technologies, develop gasification furnaces, synthesis towers, 
and other new types of equipment to make equipment with a yearly 
output of 300,000 tons of synthetic ammonia using natural gas, 
heavy oil, and coal as a raw material, and reduce energy 
consumption per ton of ammonia to, respectively, 29.3 million 
kilocalories, 37.6 million kilocalories, and 41.8 to 46.0 
million kilocalories. Use upgrading of medium-sized and small 
synthetic ammonia facilities to reduce energy consumption per 
ton of ammonia using coal as the raw material to, respectively, 
54.3 million kilocalories and less than 58.5 million 
kilocalories. Phosphorous fertilizer must be based on China's 
resource characteristics, focus on construction of production 
facilities for ammonium phosphate, heavy calcium, and so on with 
a yearly output of 120,000 tons of phosphorous dioxide and 
gypsum phosphate acid making facilities on a matching scale, 
upgrade wet method phosphoric acid production technologies, 
strengthen development of new types of extraction reactors, 
develop large filters, heat exchangers, and other key equipment, 
achieve a diphosphorous pentoxide recovery rate of greater than 
94 percent for production facilities, and improve production 
technologies for yellow phosphorous and hot method phosphorous 
fertilizer. Focus on standardization of basic fertilizer 
products and research on long-acting fertilizers, trace element 
fertilizers, and microogranic fertilizers. Continue 
strengthening research on scientific fertilizer application, 
gradually establish a perfect processing and application 
production technology system based on soils, climate, and crop 
mixes. Gradually make key production technologies for China's 
chemical fertilizers approach advanced levels in foreign 
countries. Make substantial readjustments in the proportions of 
the primary nutrients, make high nutrients and compound 
fertilizers account for more than 50 percent of total chemical 
fertilizer output. 
  2. Chemical minerals. Target resource characteristics and 
chemical fertilizer development requirements to undertake 
construction of large-scale chemical mines, focus on 
phosphorous, sulfur, and potassium and gradually expand other 
types of minerals, reinforce research on mineral prospecting 
theory and new mineral prospecting technologies to guide 
exploration for minerals in an effort to discover soluble 
sylvite mineral beds and expand north China's phosphorous and 
sulfur resources and boron ore resources. Further perfect ore 
extraction methods for inclined phosphorous ore, gently inclined 
moderately thick ore bodies, and coal system iron sulfide ore 
with complex extraction conditions, solve problems with natural 
soda and mirabilite water solution method underground extraction 
technology. While continuing to focus on research on flotation 
method agents and ore dressing technologies, improve collophane 
flotation equipment, reduce refined mineral costs, and achieve 
refined phosphorous mineral output that is greater than 50 
percent of total phosphorous mineral output by the end of this 
century. Continue doing research on development technology for 
Qinghai's Qarhan Salt Lake, provide complete sets of 
technologies and equipment for large-scale long-term stable 
extraction from brine extraction to processing. 
  3. Agricultural chemicals. Continuing strengthening 
development of highly effective, safe, and economical new 
products, study and create 20 to 30 new product varieties, focus 
on developing herbicides, increase germicides, readjust 
pesticide product varieties, strive to develop organic 
agricultural chemicals. Focusing on developing matching 
intermediates and improve the quality and production technology 
for intermediates. Develop new agriculture chemical preparations 
and new types of agents as well as processing and packaging 
equipment. Open up applications of agricultural chemicals in 
public health, storage, parks, communication, and other fields. 
We must solve problems in control technology for the ``three 
wastes [waste gas, waste liquid, and industrial residues]'' from 
the production of agricultural chemicals, strengthen safety 
assessments, and enable the agricultural chemical industry to 
have better economic benefits, social benefits, and ecological 
benefits. By the end of this century, we must make agricultural 
chemicals basically satisfy China's requirements in agricultural 
disease and pest prevention, weeds, and other areas in terms of 
quality, product varieties, and structures, and S&amp;T in the 
agricultural chemical industry must approach advanced world 
levels. 
<H5>  B. Basic organic and inorganic chemical industry raw </H5>
materials. 
  Basic chemical industry raw material production is an 
important sector in the chemical industry. Development of the 
petrochemical industry will further establish the organic 
chemical industry raw materials industry in a key status in the 
chemical industry. The primary tasks of S&amp;T development are 
to 
focus on larger sized equipment, make major efforts to do 
research on new technologies, develop highly efficient and 
energy conserving new equipment, and base ourselves on our own 
technology and equipment to build large scale complete sets of 
facilities and upgrade existing enterprises. 
  1. Organic chemical industry raw materials. For olefines, 
mainly ethylene and propylene, on a foundation of digesting and 
absorbing imported technology, make major efforts to develop 
production technologies and equipment centered on energy 
conservation. Strive to develop tube-type oven fragmentation 
technology, undertake research on heavy oil processing into 
olefines. Strengthen development of catalytic fragmentation 
technology, reduce reaction temperatures, increase product 
selectivity and recovery rates. Pay attention to research on 
low-carbon olefine catalytic dehydrogenization and expand 
sources of raw materials for olefine production. We must also 
strengthen research on olefine conversion and improve product 
flexibility. By the end of this century, be capable of 
independently designing and building large-scale olefine 
production facilities at advanced levels of the 1980's. 
  For aromatic hydrocarbons, we must strengthen digestion and 
absorption of imported technology, improve catalytic reforming 
production technology, and reduce energy consumption in aromatic 
hydrocarbon separation; strengthen technology development for 
fragmentation gasoline aromatization. Explore production 
technologies for synthesizing aromatic hydrocarbons from 
low-carbon olefines, separation of ethyl benzene and dimethyl 
benzene using chromatography, separation of ethyl benzene from 
octoethyl carbon and separation of phenylethylene from 
fragmentation gasoline and pyrolytic gasoline. 
  For amines, alcohol, acids, ketone, aldehyde, and other 
organic products, we must strengthen research on existing 
synthetic catalysts and improved new catalysts, do good 
development of matching purification catalysts, further improve 
selectivity, extend useful lifespans, do matching development of 
reactors and key equipment, and raise self-sufficiency rates for 
complete sets of production technology and equipment. We must 
continue reinforcing intensive processing of raw materials, make 
major efforts to develop all types of superior quality 
intermediates used in the production of refined chemical 
products, and rapidly throw off the passive situation of large 
amounts of imports. We also must further improve production 
technology levels for the production of organic chemical 
industry raw materials from coal, organic matter, and other raw 
materials. 
  2. Inorganic chemical industry raw materials. The sulfuric 
acid industry must mainly focus on the construction of 200,000 
ton and 500,000 ton production facilities that use pyrite as a 
raw material and create complete sets of technical facilities 
that have Chinese characteristics. Develop purification flow 
processes and acid contaminant processing technologies 
appropriate for our national conditions; make full use of heat 
sources, especially low-value heat energy, improve thermal 
efficiency in acid plants; adopt highly efficient high-strength 
towers and equipment; extend the utilization of new types of 
alloy materials and non-metallic corrosion-resistant materials 
and move toward domestic production of them; achieve 
comprehensive utilization of ore dregs. By the end of this 
century, base newly-constructed facilities on domestic sources, 
attain advanced levels of foreign countries in primary technical 
economic indices. 
  In the soda ash industry, on a foundation of gaining a basic 
understanding of larger-scale production technology and 
equipment, carry out digestion, absorption, and innovation for 
imported energy-saving technology and key equipment. Continue 
developing large-scale highly-efficient equipment, raise 
technical levels in production control; solve problems with 
technologies for making waste water and waste dregs innocuous, 
expand the scope of comprehensive utilization; develop ammonium 
chloride particle manufacturing technology and ammonium chloride 
series compound fertilizers; develop utilization technology for 
the abundant soda-making resources of the interior of China. By 
the end of this century, the production technology and equipment 
in China's soda ash industry must leap into the world's advanced 
ranks. 
  The focus in the caustic soda industry is digestion and 
absorption of imported ion membrane method production technology 
and equipment, overcoming technical problems with ion membrane 
manufacturing technology, and achieving a comprehensive shift to 
domestic production in ion membrane method caustic soda 
production. Continue perfecting diaphragm method metallic anode 
electrolysis tanks, improve evaporation technology, further 
perfect the associated techniques and equipment, and improve 
automatic control levels. Make major efforts to develop chlorine 
products, achieve a good balance between soda and chlorine. 
Develop new types of highly efficient electricity-saving tanks. 
Develop various types of new soda-resistant and 
chlorine-resistant materials. By the end of this century, we 
must reduce total energy consumption for diaphragm method 
caustic soda to 1.3 tons of standard per ton. 
  In the inorganic salt industry, we must focus on titanium 
white, chrome salt, and silicides, which are in short supply 
domestically, and on exports of barium salt, manganese salt, 
phosphates, carbonates, mirabilite, alkaline sulfides, and so 
on, and further reinforcement of China's abundant mineral 
resource development, utilization, and comprehensive processing; 
make major efforts to adopt new technologies including 
fluidized-beds, plasma, ion exchange, solvent extraction, 
electrodialysis, surface processing, granularity grading, and so 
on; develop high-strength energy-saving reactors and equipment 
required for primary industry processes, comprehensively improve 
equipment levels in the inorganic salt industry; make major 
efforts to develop new product varieties and develop product 
series, and pay particular attention to the development of new 
materials-type and functional-type inorganic salt products and 
do good readjustment of the industry structure. 
<H5>  C. Synthetic materials and processing. </H5>
  Synthetic materials and processing are usually called the 
polymer materials industry by people in the chemical industry, 
and they are a key industry that has grown rapidly in the past 
several years. The primary task of their S&amp;T development is 
to 
focus on primary synthetic materials product varieties, do 
research on new techniques, develop new catalysts and reactors, 
strengthen development of new types of shaping techniques, and 
strive to increase all new types of finished products. 
  For plastics, we must focus closely on the development of 
general-purpose resin and thermosetting resin technologies 
represented by polyvinyl, polypropylene, polyvinyl-chloride, 
polystyrene, and polyamino resin, digest and absorb imported 
technology and equipment, achieve a shift to domestic production 
of the associated raw materials, assistants, and catalysts, do 
good development of large-scale reactors and other important 
equipment, and basically achieve reliance on our own technology 
and equipment to construct large-scale production facilities and 
upgrade existing enterprises. We certainly must solve problems 
with larger-scale production technology and equipment for 
carbonic esters, polyoxymethylene, polyamides, thermoplastic 
polyesters, polyphenylether, and other engineering plastics and 
build 1,000 ton-grade and 10,000 ton-grade production facilities 
based on requirements. We must continue strengthening research 
work on polyimides, polyphenylylenethio-ether, and other special 
resins, resolve technical problems related to project 
enlargement, and meet the need to construct production 
facilities on a substantial scale. 
  In plastics processing, we must further perfect and improve 
injection molding, reaction injection motion, laminar resin mold 
shaping, large-scale blow molding shaping, thermosetting mold 
pressing shaping, and other new types of technologies and 
equipment, strengthen research on high-efficiency, high-speed, 
low energy consumption processing machinery and on equipment to 
meet special molding requirements, undertake research on 
computer applications in machine head and mold design and 
processing control, raise overall levels in plastic processing 
equipment, and do the associated development of all types of 
special-purpose resins and all types of assistants used in 
processing to satisfy processing technology and finished product 
development requirements; further improve production 
technologies for agricultural film, do research on technologies 
for recovery and utilization of waste plastic, pay attention to 
basic theoretical research in plastics processing, provide a 
foundation for developing new materials and new processing 
methods. 
  In synthetic rubber, we must further improve the production 
technology and equipment for cis-butyl rubber, styrene butadiene 
rubber, and neoprene, and use our own resources as a foundation 
for construction of large-scale production facilities at 
advanced world levels of the period. Focus on technology 
development for amyl rubber, ethylene-propylene rubber, butyl 
rubber, and acrylic ester rubber and achieve industrialized 
production. Strive to do research on new thermoplastic elastic 
bodies, low cis-polybutadiene, sol polybutyl, and synthetic 
latex product varieties. 
  In rubber processing, we must focus on product grade raising 
and replacement, move toward diversified and combination raw 
materials, strengthen technology development and digestion and 
absorption of imported technology and equipment, rapidly raise 
product design and technology levels, adopt highly efficient and 
energy-saving advanced equipment with a high degree of 
automation, raise equipment levels, substantially increase 
product specifications and product varieties, and improve 
product quality and production efficiency. We must accelerate 
the development of radial tire product series and attain a rate 
of shifting to radials of 30 percent for load-bearing tires and 
50 percent for passenger tires. Accelerate attacks on key 
problems related to huge engineering tires and make the 
corresponding developments for tubeless tires, flattened tires, 
and civil aviation tires. For belt and pipe products, we must 
further improve technical levels and product quality for new 
types of skeleton material conveyor belts and non-flammable 
conveyor belts, continually perfect rubber-plastic type and 
resin type high and moderate-pressure rubber tubing and braided 
rubber tubing production technologies. The colors and product 
varieties for rubber boots must be capable of meeting 
ever-growing export demand. Make major efforts at development of 
new types of rubber components for the automobile, structure, 
mining, electronic, space, maritime, and other realms and 
achieve intensive scale production. At the same time, actively 
promote the development of new types of skeleton materials, 
carbon black, new types of assistants, and other related 
industries. 
  In synthetic fibers, we must make major efforts to develop 
production technology and equipment for dacron, (mianlun) 
acrylic, polyvinyl alcohol fiber, polypropylene fiber, and other 
key product varieties, do research on new techniques and 
high-efficiency equipment, do research on new types of catalysts 
and matching assistants, and make the production technology in 
China's primary synthetic fiber products attain levels of the 
1980's in foreign countries by the end of this century. We must 
continue to strengthen development of new varieties of synthetic 
fiber products, achieve systemization and differentiation, and 
meet the development requirements of the textile industry. We 
must strive to expand applications based on the multi-functional 
properties of synthetic fibers in biological, chemical, 
physical, and other industrial departments. 
<H5>  D. Refined chemical products. </H5>
  Refined chemical products include roughly 30-plus 
categories, 
some of which have already developed into independent industries 
such as dyes, photosensitive materials, paints, chemical 
reagents, adhesives, and so on. Some are still in the process of 
growing, and are known as refined chemical products in new 
realms. The primary tasks of S&amp;T development are to develop 
high-grade, refined, special-purpose, and functionally distinct 
new products to meet the development requirements of all sectors 
of our national economy and the people's ever-rising living 
needs. 
  1. In the dye industry, to satisfy the development 
requirements of light and textile industry, we must continue 
focusing on doing research on new pure, high-strength dyes, 
high-grade organic pigments, and dye-fixing assistant products, 
develop commercialized technology, strengthen building 
technologies, and further improve product quality. By the end of 
this century we must develop 250 new dye or organic pigment 
product varieties and 300 dye-fixing assistant product varieties 
to increase the number of dye and organic pigment product 
varieties produced in China to more than 7000 and the number of 
dye-fixing assistant product varieties to more than 900 to meet 
90 percent of the product variety requirements in the textile 
printing and dyeing industry and attain advanced levels in 
foreign countries at the time for the quality of 90 percent of 
our product varieties. Pay attention to benzene series, 
naphthalene series, anthraquinone series, and heterocyclic 
series dye intermediate production technology, improve synthesis 
techniques and key equipment. We must make use of the coloring 
properties and multifunctional properties of dyes to expand 
applications of dyes and organic pigments in non-textile 
industries. We certainly must strengthen research on ``three 
wastes'' [waste water, waste gas, and industrial residues] 
treatment technology for dyes. 
  2. The paint industry must focus on meeting the development 
needs of the construction, automobile, and other industries and 
corrosion prevention requirements under horrible conditions, 
focus on developing low-pollution and energy-saving new product 
varieties, mainly water-based paints, high solid component 
paints, powdered paints, photofixing paints, and so on to make 
the output of new unique, low-pollution, and energy-saving paint 
products account for more than 15 percent of total output. We 
must focus on the development of using inorganic pigment in 
paints, improve product quality, and increase product variety. 
We must also further improve production technology and equipment 
levels for the matching resins, assistants, fillers, and 
solvents and ensure quality and performance. 
  3. Photosensitive materials and magnetic recording materials 
must take aim at advanced world levels, do good research on the 
associated product mixtures, techniques, equipment, and raw 
materials and, along with major efforts at research on new 
products, also focus on development of the matching engineering. 
Movie film must achieve high-temperature rapid color basing, 
color centering, and color correction and matching of relief 
film and blank film; for color photographic film, photographic 
paper, and developing agents, we must achieve a matching of all 
types of photosensitive speed products; for magnetic recording 
materials, we must achieve matching of digital magnetic 
recording product series. In addition, we must undertake 
technology development for new types of information materials 
and electronic photography. By the end of this century, we must 
attain 150 varieties of both photosensitive materials and 
magnetic recording materials and export over 20 percent of them. 
  4. For chemical reagents, we must transform the backward 
equipment situation and achieve sealing of production equipment; 
we must strive to improve product quality, reinforce research on 
separation and purification technology, upgrade packaging, and 
adopt international standards for effectiveness. Further develop 
new product varieties, achieve systemization of ultrapure 
reagents, reagents used for bioengineering purposes, clinical 
diagnosis reagents, and organic synthetic reagents. By the end 
of this century, we must increase the number of reagent 
varieties from the present 6,000 types to 10,000 types. 
  5. For synthetic adhesives, we must raise technical and 
equipment levels, improve product quality, and do good matching 
of raw materials. Strengthen applied research and packaging and 
construction tools research, actively develop low-toxicity, 
non-toxic moderate and low-temperature adhesives and aqueous 
emulsions, thermosols, and functional new products. By the end 
of this century, we must attain 1,000 types of adhesive product 
varieties and achieve systemization and standardization of 
primary products. 
  6. Refined chemical products in new realms mainly include 
food additives, feed additives, surface activators, water 
treatment agents, chemical products use in papermaking, chemical 
products used for leather, oil field chemical products, water 
soluble polymer series, starch derivative series, propenoic acid 
series, cellulose ether (ester) series, vinyl acetate series, 
and other product series. The primary tasks for S&amp;T 
development 
are to focus on technology development for the primary raw 
materials and intermediates that are required and quickly solve 
unavailability problems; on a foundation of guaranteeing product 
quality, make major efforts to develop new products, develop new 
product variety trademarks, and improve their performance in 
use; strengthen research on product applications, do good 
technical service and market opening, combine research, 
development, applications, and services into a single integrated 
entity, and meet the requirements for development of all sectors 
of our national economy, progress in S&amp;T activities, and 
gradually improvement in the people's living and consumption 
standards. By the end of this century, achieve in a preliminary 
product quality optimization, product variety systematization, 
commodity trademark specialization, and matching of applications 
and performance. 
<H5>  E. Chemical industry equipment. </H5>
  The primary task for chemical industry equipment S&amp;T 
development is to strengthen scientific research and development 
and product design. 
  The problems to solve with key technologies are the 
scientific research and design software for perfecting and 
optimizing the compressors, blowers, pumps, steam turbines, and 
valves used in the chemical industry; development of the 
manufacturing technology for the new types of furnaces, towers, 
cauldrons, waste heat boilers, heat exchangers, pressure 
containers, and burning nozzles used in the chemical industry; 
improvement of the capabilities of drying, pulverizing, 
filtering, separation, mixing, packaging, and other single-unit 
equipment; and gradual establishment of flexible manufacturing 
systems for chemical industry equipment and establishment of 
chemical industry equipment software packages and computer-aided 
design and manufacturing software packages. Strengthen research 
on applied technology for corrosion prevention, apply modern 
control theory and large systems theory in primary industrial 
applications to establish system dynamic mathematical models, 
achieve partial and full-process optimized control, and 
strengthen development of the special-purpose instruments and 
gauges used in the chemical industry. 
  By the end of this century, be capable of designing and 
manufacturing high-efficiency new types of machinery and 
equipment according to users' requirements, improve the matching 
capabilities of electromechanically integrated primary and 
auxiliary equipment, and make most of the equipment used in the 
primary sectors of the chemical industry attain advanced levels 
of the 1980's in foreign countries. 
<H5>  F. Emerging chemical industry technology. </H5>
  S&amp;T work in emerging chemical industry technology realms 
involves pioneering research work and using prominent foci as a 
foundation for first focusing on doing good laboratory research, 
converting scientific research achievements into industrial 
production as quickly as possible, and upgrading existing 
chemical industry production or establishing new production 
facilities. By the end of this century, emerging technology in 
the chemical industry must certainly make major technological 
breakthroughs and produce real economic benefits. 
  1. New chemical industry materials. Focus on making 
breakthroughs in manufacturing technology for all types of 
separation membranes. Actively develop conductive, magnetic 
conductive, thermoelectric, piezoelectric, and other polymer 
materials, photoconducting fibers, and optical disk materials. 
Along with further perfecting and improving organic silicon and 
organic fluorine production technology, actively develop organic 
silicon, organic fluorine, polyurethane, and polyacrylate 
materials and finished products for use in medicine. For carbon 
fiber, we must provide 100 ton-grade polyacrylonitrile-based 
carbon fiber and 1,000 ton-grade polyacrylonitrile raw filament 
industrialized technology and equipment and achieve 100 
ton-grade and above large-scale industrial production of 
asphalt-based carbon fiber, and for arylene we must achieve 
scale industrial production above the 100 ton grade. Reinforce 
applied research on carbon fiber, acrylene, and composites. 
Carry out development of other new types of ultrahigh strength 
fibers. Strengthen research on applications of photoetching 
colloids, special gases, enclosure materials, and baseplate 
materials in the electronics industry. Develop other types of 
new high-performance chemical industry materials required for 
the development of China's high-tech industry and national 
defense industry. 
  2. Biochemical industry technology. The primary tasks for 
development of biochemical industry technology are using 
microorganic methods to produce chemical industry products 
including the upgrading of existing biochemical industry 
production technology and equipment, improving product recovery 
rates and purity, and reducing raw materials and energy 
consumption; opening up new methods for microorganic method 
production of chemical industry products, and increasing the 
variety of biochemical industry products; focusing on 
development of key biochemical industry equipment, including all 
types of biochemical reactors, transducers, production 
separation and extraction equipment, and so on; exploring 
technology for producing chemical industry products from natural 
fibers and other organic matter resources. By the end of this 
century, we must develop several biochemical technologies and 
products at advanced international levels. 
  3. Coal-formed synthetic gas chemical industry. The 
coal-formed synthetic gas chemical industry must first of all 
focus on new types of coal gasification, synthetic gas 
purification, and large-scale methanol production technology and 
equipment development and use this as a foundation for 
undertaking R&amp;D on using synthetic gas or methanol to produce 
low-carbon alcohol, fuel methanol, acetic acid, acetoanhydride, 
formic acid, oxalic acid, and methyl chlorine compounds, 
complete intermediate testing and industrial experiments, and 
provide technology and equipment for the construction of 
large-scale facilities. We must also undertake research on the 
direct synthesis of gasoline, diesel, olefines, and 
methanol-formed olefines from synthetic gas and make 
achievements in intermediate testing. We must place research on 
the catalysts used in the coal-formed synthetic gas industry in 
a primary position and establish catalyst product variety 
structures, enlargement technology, and applied technology that 
conform to our national conditions. By the end of this century, 
we must complete technology development for primary synthetic 
gas chemical industry products and the technical economics 
indicators must attain advanced levels of foreign countries to 
create the conditions for achieving industrialization during the 
next century. 
<H5>  Key Technologies for Preferential Development </H5>
  Given chemical industry S&amp;T development in foreign 
countries 
and in integration with China's S&amp;T realities, we have 
selected 
engineering enlargement technology, new catalysis technology, 
polymer modification technology, new separation technology, 
computer applications technology, comprehensive improvement 
technology, product applications technology, and other things as 
the breakthrough points for common technology for chemical 
industry S&amp;T during the next 10-plus years. 
<H5>  A. Engineering enlargement technology. </H5>
  In chemical industry technology development, enlargement 
technology is a key problem. In research on engineering 
enlargement technology, we certainly must focus on small-scale 
experiments, model experiments, intermediate testing, and the 
required industrial experiments. We must strive to do good basic 
research, process research, and engineering research. We must 
gain an understanding of the enlargement laws for all categories 
of reaction processes and reactors, pay attention to 
accumulating experience in empirical enlargement, gradually 
expand the scope of mathematical model enlargement applications, 
and work properly on the relationship between experience 
enlargement and mathematical modeling enlargement. While we are 
doing good chemical engineering research, we must certainly 
reinforce research on machinery, equipment, gauges, instruments, 
and automatic control and do good optimum combination and 
selection of industrial facilities. 
<H5>  B. New catalysis technology. </H5>
  Some 80 percent of production techniques in the chemical 
industry are related to catalysis and 90 percent of 
newly-adopted techniques require catalysts. The focus on new 
catalysis technology is on the development of polymer metallic 
complex catalysts, rare earth complex catalysts, new types of 
carrier catalysts, clustered compound catalysts, zeolite 
selective catalysts, natural polymer catalysts (including 
organic enzymes), solid acid-alkali catalysts, photocatalysts, 
and others that can spur development of the petrochemical 
industry, coal-formed synthetic gas chemical industry, and 
inorganic chemical industry; reinforce research on phase 
transfer catalysts and biocatalysts, and we should also 
strengthen reactor enlargement, manufacturing, and other 
technology development associated with new types of catalysts; 
apply advanced instruments and equipment to develop new 
catalysis technologies; do further research on catalytic 
modification and applications technology. Strive to be able by 
the end of this century to design and develop highly effective 
catalysts that are highly active, highly selective, and 
three-dimensionally directional with good stability and long 
lifespans as well as the corresponding catalysis technology so 
as to satisfy domestic demand and strive to export and corner 
part of the market in foreign countries. 
<H5>  C. Polymer modification technology. </H5>
  Polymer alloyization and compounding have now become the 
primary development directions in polymer modification 
technology, and plastics alloyization has attracted the most 
attention. Their primary S&amp;T development tasks are to do 
research on a variety of modification methods including 
blending, copolymerization, cross-linking, interpenetrating 
networks, and so on, and perfecting technologies and equipment; 
based on different requirements of materials, sifting through 
optimum mixtures and optimum equipment parameter combinations to 
set appropriate alloy blending components and quality standards; 
developing reinforcing fibers, fillers, fire retardants, 
coupling agents, shock-resistant modifiers, antioxidants, 
processing technique improvement agents, and so on for use in 
modification, establishing the required testing methods, and 
doing good equipment matchups. 
<H5>  D. New separation technology. </H5>
  Separation technology is one of the keys in converting 
chemical, biological, and other laboratory research achievements 
into industrial production. The focus in new separation 
technology development is membrane separation technology, 
precision distillation, supercritical extraction, and other 
separation technologies. Prior to the year 2000, we must achieve 
ion exchange membranes, oxygen recovery and oxygen concentration 
gas separation membranes for use in producing high-purity 
alkalis, a shift to domestic production of the micropore filter 
membranes used to produce especially pure and ultrapure 
materials and rapid diagnostic reagents, and do additional 
exploration of knowledge regarding membrane transmission 
mechanisms, integrate with the needs of chemical industry 
production and high-tech development to develop new high 
functional membranes and solve problems with their application. 
At the same time, we must achieve industrialization of 
supercritical separation technology and further improve 
technical levels in chemical industry separation and extraction. 
<H5>  E. Computer applications technology. </H5>
  Computer applications technology is a part of emerging 
technology in the chemical industry. The focus of S&amp;T 
development is on developing from simple production process 
control in chemical industry automation to integrate process 
control with enterprise management, centralized optimized 
control, inspection rounds and monitoring, administration and 
management, and planning and decision making into an integrated 
network control system divided by levels and grades; development 
of chemical industry economic and S&amp;T information technology 
applications from single-item decentralization toward 
comprehensive intelligence, application of a variety of types of 
data transmission measures, formation of a variety of types of 
comprehensive information networks composed of microcomputers, 
mini, medium-sized, and large computers, terminals, and 
peripherals to gradually achieve a movement to networks, 
databases, and office automation; developing CAE, CAD, CAM, CAT, 
and CAR technology in engineering design, machinery 
manufacturing, scientific research, and information reports. 
Undertake research on intelligent instruments, chemical industry 
industrial robot software, breakdown diagnosis, chemical 
materials differentiation, molecular and materials design, 
selection of synthesis routes, and other expert systems and 
attain the level of applications. By the end of this century or 
the early part of the next century, make computer applications 
technology in the chemical industry in China attain advanced 
levels of the late 1980's in the developed countries, make 
several single item technology applications in large-scale 
synthetic ammonia and other production process control attain 
advanced levels of foreign countries at the time, and make the 
extent of popularization of microelectronics technology attain 
international levels of the 1980's. 
<H5>  F. Comprehensive improvement technology. </H5>
  Environmental pollution has now become of the three big 
``public hazards'' facing mankind. The primary tasks for its 
S&amp;T 
development are to actively develop low pollution and 
non-polluting production technology and fundamentally eliminate 
hazards from the ``three wastes''; actively study pollutant 
control and comprehensive utilization technology, especially for 
old and difficult pollution sources in the chemical fertilizer, 
agricultural chemicals, dyes, chloro-alkalies, inorganic salts, 
and other industries and solve them within a limited period of 
time. Make major efforts at comprehensive utilization and full 
utilization of resources; focus on developing new types of 
biochemical technologies, catalysis and oxidation technologies, 
ultrafiltering technologies, liquid membrane technologies, 
extraction technologies, and the matching equipment involved in 
control of the ``three wastes'' and on development and 
utilization of a series of waste water treatment agents and 
gradually achieve the conversion of waste materials into 
resources and treatment. By the end of this century, we must 
control pollution in the chemical industry and all large and 
medium-sized enterprises must be built into hazard-free clean 
and civilized plants. 
<H5>  G. Product applications technology. </H5>
  Product applications technology involves commercialization 
technology to fully foster the functions of products and expand 
their applications. Their S&amp;T development foci include 
research 
on the amount, mixtures, states, and utilization technology 
conditions of products that are used; product secondary 
processing methods and equipment research and product 
applications methods and applications equipment research; 
product utilization process research and solving all types of 
problems that exist in gradually enlarging the scale of their 
applications. We must pay full attention to feedback from users, 
strengthen market surveys and forecasts, provide good technical 
services, and guarantee the continual development of new 
products and continual expansion of the scope of their 
applications. 
<H5>  Construction Materials </H5>
  The construction materials industry includes the three areas 
of structural materials, non-metallic ores, and inorganic 
non-metallic new materials. It provides basic materials that are 
indispensable for national economic and national defense 
construction and development of incisive technologies and is one 
of the industries that has an important impact on China's 
achievement of modernization and it must undergo preferential 
development. 
<H5>  I. Development Strategies and Objectives </H5>
<H5>  A. Development strategies. </H5>
  Make improvement of economic results the center, improve the 
enterprise structure, product mix, and technology structure of 
the construction materials industry, raise overall enterprise 
technical levels and equipment levels, rationally utilize 
resources, substantially reduce energy resource construction, 
improve the quality of construction materials industry products, 
increase product output and product variety, fully satisfy the 
development requirements of national economic construction and 
national defense construction. Along with orienting toward both 
domestic urban and rural market demand, strive to increase 
exports and manage the construction materials industry as a 
pillar industry in our national economy. 
<H5>  B. Strategic objectives. </H5>
  By the year 2000, cement output must reach about 360 million 
tons and plate glass 180 million weight boxes, there must be 
substantial developments of inorganic non-metallic new 
materials, non-metallic ores, and their finished products, new 
types of structural materials, and so on, we must achieve 
matching supplies of high, medium, and low grades for all types 
of products, the output, product variety, and quality of the 
construction materials industry must basically meet the 
requirements of modernization and construction and satisfy the 
people's ever-growing daily needs, and industrial production 
technology levels of primary products must strive to approach 
levels of the economically developed nations in the late 1970's 
or early 1980's. In new materials and certain other high-tech 
realms, we must approach or catch up with advanced world levels. 
We must strive to reduce energy consumption per 10,000 yuan in 
value of output in the entire industry from 33.19 tons of 
standard coal in 1980 by 50 percent, achieve a 6-fold increase 
in the value of output from 18.1 billion yuan to about 140 
billion yuan, achieve semi-automated and specialized production 
for the primary products of the construction materials industry 
by 2020, approach levels of the economically develop nations at 
the time in the advanced levels of construction materials 
industry production technology, make the construction materials 
industry truly become an important pillar of the national 
economy and a large industry that accumulates capital, withdraws 
currency from circulation, and exports to earn foreign exchange. 
  To achieve the objectives outlined above, we must, in 
accordance with the principle that ``economic construction must 
rely on science and technology, S&amp;T work must be oriented 
toward 
economic construction'', formulate correct S&amp;T objectives for 
the construction materials industry. Their guiding ideology is: 
  1. Make major efforts to develop advanced and appropriate 
technology, resolutely serve development of the construction 
materials commodity economy, promote exports of construction 
materials to earn foreign exchange. 
  2. With improving product quality and labor productivity, 
reducing consumption, increasing styles and product variety, and 
developing intensively processed product as the primary goals, 
strengthen S&amp;T development and technical extension work. 
While 
accelerating the conversion of S&amp;T achievements into forces 
of 
production, achieve an improvement in technical levels in 
traditional industry, the formation of a new inorganic 
non-metallic industry, and commercialization of high-tech new 
materials to make S&amp;T play a guiding role in increasing gross 
value of output for improving economic results. 
  3. Scientific research units in the construction materials 
industry must have a rational division of labor and guidance by 
categories and comprehensively arrange development research, 
applied research, and basic research to have a deployment in 
depth in scientific research, open up new routes for further 
development of the construction materials industry, and increase 
new S&amp;T reserves. 
  4. Strengthen close integration of scientific research, 
design, production, and education; accelerate the establishment 
of an S&amp;T system with ``three entities in one body'' for 
training of skilled personnel, S&amp;T progress, and production 
management, raise management levels in scientific research, 
design, and production units, and spur development of the 
construction materials industry. 
  By the year 2000, construction materials industry S&amp;T 
must 
make contributions to national economic construction, national 
defense construction, and urban and rural housing construction 
and provide services for a 6-fold increase in the gross value of 
output in the construction materials industry, raising 
construction materials production technology levels, and 
comprehensive development of the construction materials 
commodity economy. 
  1. We must make major efforts to strengthen rational 
development and comprehensive utilization of resources, raise 
resource comprehensive utilization levels, increase the 
development of technology for rational utilization of mine 
extraction, raw materials extraction and purification, 
homogenization, intensive processing, and other resources and 
gradually achieve specialized production in construction 
industry raw materials. 
  2. Actively do R&amp;D on all types of new energy 
conservation 
technologies, adopt new technologies and new techniques to 
upgrade traditional technologies, substantially reduce 
consumption of energy resources and conserve water. 
  3. Digest and absorb advanced technologies from foreign 
countries, develop advanced and appropriate domestically 
produced construction materials technology and equipment, raise 
design, manufacturing, and matching levels of construction 
materials industry production technology and equipment, attain 
an 80 to 90 percent rate of domestic production of equipment. 
  4. Make major efforts to develop intensively processed 
products, actively develop new product varieties, improve the 
product quality and product variety matching levels of 
structural materials, non-metallic minerals, and inorganic 
non-metallic new materials, make major efforts to open up 
international markets, increase our capabilities for exports to 
earn foreign exchange. 
  5. Develop high temperature-resistant, ablation-resistant, 
high-strength, highly dielectric, low loss, and other types of 
inorganic non-metallic new types of functional materials and 
non-metallic mineral products used in new technologies, serve 
national defense industry and high-S&amp;T realms. 
  6. Strengthen development of product quality supervision, 
environmental protection, information management, 
standardization management, and other basic modernized 
management technologies, pay attention to basic research, 
increase S&amp;T reserves and development reserve strengths in 
the 
construction materials industry. 
  By the year 2020, S&amp;T in the construction materials 
industry 
must make contributions to achieving semi-automation in 
production of the primary organizations in the construction 
materials industry and automatic and intelligence in production 
of some products, serve the development of the inorganic 
non-metallic new materials industry, and approach the levels of 
that period in the world's developed nations in the advanced 
technology levels of the construction materials industry. 
<H5>  II. Focal Tasks and Key Technologies </H5>
<H5>  A. Strengthen research on resource development and </H5>
comprehensive utilization technology. 
  1. Do good exploration, analysis, and comprehensive 
evaluation of construction materials industry raw materials 
mines and non-metallic mines, do research on deep extraction and 
underground extraction technology and on development and 
comprehensive utilization of paragenetic minerals; do research 
on utilization of new types of minerals. 
  2. Do research on mineral properties testing, mining and 
dressing, purification, dehydration, grinding, mineral surface 
modification, and other new technologies, new techniques, and 
new equipment. 
  3. Undertake research on comprehensive utilization of 
industrial residues and utilization of low-quality raw 
materials. The focus is on research on the basic properties and 
useability of industrial residues, formulation of industrial 
residue technical standards for use in structural materials 
production, R&amp;D on new useful waste construction materials 
products, and coordination with residue dumping departments for 
R&amp;D on primary processing energy-saving useful wastes 
construction materials products. 
<H5>  B. Do R&amp;D on new energy conservation technologies, </H5>
substantially reduce energy consumption in construction 
materials production. 
  1. Do research on new gasification technologies and new 
equipment for local coal varieties, expand fuel sources, achieve 
optimization of fuels in construction materials industry 
production. 
  2. Develop a variety of new energy conservation technologies 
for structural materials production, focus on developing series 
of top-quality fire-resistant and insulating materials, kiln and 
oven insulation temperature and new surplus heat recovery and 
utilization technology, and new cement roasting technology; 
digest and absorb new large-scale flotation method glass melting 
kiln technology and gas-burning urn-less energy-saving ceramic 
roasting kilns; improve and perfect brick kiln surplus heat 
utilization systems and one-time stack roasting technology. 
  3. Develop products with low energy consumption that utilize 
new energy resources. Do R&amp;D on energy-saving new cement, 
glass, 
and ceramic product varieties and lightweight high-strength 
hollow-core concrete blocks, sintered micropore hollow-core 
finished products, and other low energy consumption new types of 
wall materials; utilize solar energy, wind energy, and 
geothermal energy, and the inorganic non-metallic new materials 
and their products required for infrared energy conservation. 
  4. Develop new products and new technologies for energy 
consumption that conserve structural materials to improve 
insulation function services for structures. Based on the 
characteristics of China's different regions, do research on 
energy-saving composite wall materials, energy-saving doors and 
windows, and energy-saving room models. 
  5. Do research on ``phase changing'' materials for automatic 
temperature adjustment in structures, utilize solar energy 
heating materials and applied systems. Strengthen applied 
research on structural insulating materials. 
  Strive to reduce energy consumption per 10,000 yuan in value 
of output by 50 percent from 1980 to 2000 and for another 
reduction of about 20 percent in energy consumption per 10,000 
yuan in value of output from 2000 to 2020. 
<H5>  C. Do R&amp;D on matching technologies for new techniques and </H5>
complete sets of equipment, gradually form domestically produced 
technical equipment that has Chinese characteristics and 
multiple levels. 
  1. The focus in the cement industry is on integration with 
digestion and absorption of imported technology in doing R&amp;D 
on 
the roasting, pulverizing, pre-homogenization, and packaging 
equipment and systems technology required for new types of dry 
method outside-the-kiln decomposition production technology and 
the associated formation of large-scale advanced technical 
equipment for 2,000 ton and 4,000 ton daily finished material 
output production lines. Attain an equipment self-sufficiency 
rate of 90 percent prior to the year 2000. Do research on 
mechanized vertical kiln production line new technologies and 
new equipment, form complete sets of technical facilities with 
yearly cement output at the 50,000 and 100,000 tons grade and 
stabilize finished material grades above 525*. Achieve new types 
of dry method outside-the-kiln decomposition with heat 
consumption of 750 to 800 kilocalories/kg of finished material 
and total electricity consumption of less than 100 kWh per ton 
of cement. 
  2. The focus in the glass industry is on digestion and 
absorption of technology from foreign countries, perfecting and 
gaining an understanding of key technologies for flotation 
method techniques, including mixing, melting, shaping, 
annealing, cold junction, and automation systems technology and 
equipment, improving the quality of glass raw sheets, and 
attaining advanced international levels; doing R&amp;D on glass 
intensive processing technology and equipment; digestion and 
absorption of glass fiber tank kiln filament drawing, 
non-spinning, and special-purpose textile finished product 
processing technology and equipment. Do R&amp;D on all types of 
new 
composite superior-quality reinforcing base materials and 
electronics, appliance, and other top-quality insulting and 
textile finished product processing and treatment technology and 
equipment, and gradually achieve a shift to domestic production. 
  3. The focus of the structural and public health ceramics 
industry is on digesting and absorbing imported wall foundation 
bricks and public health ceramic technical equipment sets, doing 
R&amp;D on dry method powder making techniques, rapid driers, 
high-pressure and moderate-pressure grout injection technology 
and equipment, energy-saving fast roasting kilns and automatic 
control system technology. 
  4. The focus in the building materials industry is on reform 
of product mixes, continual perfection and improvement of 
structural bricks, gas-added cement, gypsum products, 
lightweight aggregate finished products, and asbestos composite 
wall material technology and equipment; development of 
hollow-core brick technology and equipment appropriate for 
medium-sized and small brick and tile plant product; research on 
technical equipment appropriate for China's national conditions 
that is capable of producing a wide variety of high-quality 
hollow-core finished products; integration with digestion and 
absorption of imported technology to develop production 
technologies and equipment for waterproofing materials and for 
decorative and refurbishing materials. 
  5. For non-metallic mineral extraction, do research on 
technologies and equipment for underground extraction of soft 
rock layers, phased natural collapse extraction, fill method 
mechanized extraction, and so on based on different mineral 
types, and on pulverizing, ore dressing, narrow grading, 
extraction, dehydration and drying, recovery, and other 
technologies and equipment for all varieties of minerals that 
are suitable for exporting to earn foreign exchange. Do research 
on non-metallic mineral intensive processing technology, develop 
high purity, ultrafine, and modified raw material preparation 
technologies and sets of equipment. Develop impulse-type 
centrifugal self-grinding machines, rolling machines, ultrasonic 
air flow pulverizers, and other energy-saving pulverizing 
equipment. 
  6. The focus for inorganic non-metallic materials is on 
digestion and absorption of imported electrical arc centrifuge 
methods, molded continuous fiber thermoplastic composites, large 
diamond presses and tools, and other production and equipment, 
and on achieving a shift to domestic production. 
<H5>  D. Develop intensively processed products, develop new </H5>
product varieties, improve matching capabilities, meet the 
development needs of all aspects of the national economy. 
  1. Match up with maritime development and special project 
construction, do research on high strength, early strength, 
highly corrosion resistant, and radiation resistant special 
cement varieties, do research on improvement of highly effective 
concrete composite external additives, explore fiber 
reinforcement, immersion processing, high temperature and high 
pressure heat treatment, and other technical routes, develop 
high strength, high ductility, corrosion resistant, and leak 
resistant special concretes. Develop large tonnage marine 
drilling platforms, floating piers, floating docks, marine 
airports, seawater desalination ships, and other large concrete 
floating structures, and do the associated R&amp;D on 
lightweight, 
high strength, insulated, and weather resistant building 
structures and enclosure materials for use in structures atop 
marine floating structures. 
  2. Match up with the development of all types of maritime, 
land, and air communications and transportation tools and the 
development requirements of the construction industry, make 
major efforts to strengthen research on intensively processed 
glass, highly effective friction materials, lightweight and 
high-strength fiberglass reinforced plastic structural materials 
and on engineering concrete products for use in modern 
transportation. The focus is on development of laminated, 
hollow-core, film plated, and steel-reinforced glass 
applications technology and research on the associated 
materials. While improving the performance of asbestos friction 
materials, develop non-asbestos high temperature resistant, high 
strength, and low wear automobile friction sheets, high 
performance composite friction materials, and so on, and 
gradually achieve a shift to domestic production for the 
friction materials used in automobiles and aviation. Do R&amp;D 
on 
high-speed railway concrete ties, high pressure resistant large 
curvature power transmission prestressed concrete towers, large 
diameter concrete pipes for the transmission of solid materials, 
and so on. 
  3. Do R&amp;D on lightweight, high strength, multifunctional 
building structural materials, reinforce research on materials 
durability, improve the use functions of building structures, 
satisfy the people's living needs. The focus is on development 
of decorated surface weight-bearing porous bricks, high strength 
porous concrete products, hollow core lime sand products and 
reinforcing components, and composite multifunction wall 
materials; highly effective durable waterproof sealing 
materials, high, medium, and low-grade decorative and 
refurbishing and sanitation tools and their components, slanted 
layer surface lightweight tiles and building framework 
components, fiber-reinforced organic structural composites, and 
the matching applications technology for new types of structural 
and enclosure materials. 
<H5>  E. Make major efforts to develop inorganic non-metallic new </H5>
materials and non-metallic mineral finished products. 
  The focus is on developing high-performance fiber-reinforced 
composites, non-metallic--metallic composite high-tech 
materials, high temperature structural ceramics and functional 
ceramics, ablation resistant heat-proofing materials, high 
purity high temperature resistant quartz glass, functional 
optical fiber materials, infrared laser and new artificial 
crystal materials, inorganic non-crystalline materials, membrane 
materials, superconducting materials, new types of irradiation 
resistant materials, solid ion conductor materials, 
photosensitive materials, bioengineering materials, sealing 
materials, mineral fillers, and other R&amp;D. Form a production 
substantial capacity on a substantial scale for some products by 
the year 2000. 
<H5>  F. Promote applications of microelectronics technology in </H5>
the construction materials industry, raise automation levels. 
  Prior to 2000, gradually extend and apply electronic 
computers in construction materials enterprises at the county 
level and above to reduce energy consumption, improve and 
stabilize product quality, improve working conditions, achieve 
modernized management, and integration in some single machines 
or operating single unit electromechanical instruments. Prior to 
2020, develop applications of intelligent technology, achieve 
semi-automated and automated production in some large cement, 
glass, and ceramics plants, non-metallic mineral mines, and 
high-tech inorganic non-metallic new materials enterprises. 
<H5>  G. Research on environmental protection and safety and </H5>
protection technology. 
  1. Do research on underground safe extraction production 
technologies for kaolinite, talc, asbestos, and other soft raw 
ore bodies; 
  2. Do research on dust prevention technology for asbestos 
dressing enterprises and on treatment and applications 
technology for the waste gas, waste water, and industrial 
residues produced in the construction materials industry; 
  3. Strengthen research on labor protection technology and 
special-purpose labor protection products for the construction 
materials industry. 
<H5>  H. Comprehensive development and research of associated </H5>
technologies. 
  1. Strengthen research on resource comprehensive 
utilization, 
extension of bulk cement and commercial concrete, reform of wall 
materials, coordination of the development of the construction 
materials industry with the national economy, and other 
comprehensive soft topics. 
  2. Do R&amp;D on chemical industry raw materials for use in 
construction materials production, achieve a matching of 
products. Strengthen research on applied technology for chemical 
industry construction materials, metallic construction 
materials, and other production products. 
  3. Do R&amp;D on construction materials product performance 
testing and on information collection, analysis, and 
transmission technology. Do good standardization work, 
comprehensively adopt advanced international standards, promote 
a movement of construction materials product quality toward 
international levels. 
<H5>  I. Track world S&amp;T development, strengthen basic </H5>
 scientific 
research in the construction materials industry. 
  The focus is on development of heat, motion, and mass 
transfer and reaction theory in the silicate materials formation 
process, on new silicate materials mineral structures and 
mineral raw material purification, ultrafine pulverizing, rapid 
drying and roasting, materials compounding and ductility and 
strengthen reinforcement, crystal growth and surface technology, 
limiting technology, membrane technology, testing technology, 
and other basic research to open up new materials realms. 
<H5>  Minerals </H5>
  Resources and the environment are the basic prerequisites 
for 
human existence. They also are the primary constraints on 
economic and social development. Geological work is both the 
base and precondition of industrial development and permeates 
various sectors of the national economy, including industry, 
agriculture, construction, and transportation. In terms of 
resources, 95 percent of the world's energy resources and 75 to 
80 percent of its industrial raw materials come from mineral 
resources. In terms of the environment, the geological periods 
in history were witness to global events which led to the 
extinction of certain species. There has been no extinction on a 
global scale of any species in the history of the human race, 
but because of changes in the geological environment and a host 
of other factors, many species have died out on a small scale, 
endangering mankind. Changes in the natural geological 
environment and man-made geological environment directly shape 
and control the growth, maturation, reproduction, and extinction 
of all living things, including man, and directly determine 
whether or not a nation's economic development strategic goals 
will be achieved as well as the rate of social development. When 
it comes to mineral products (including groundwater) and the 
geological environment (including geological disasters), 
research, evaluation, forecasting, along with the formulation of 
policies, are the principal tasks in geological prospecting and 
geological scientific and technical work in the future. The 
success of geological prospecting hinges upon the level of 
S&amp;T 
development in geology. The efficacy of the evaluation of the 
geological environment as well as the effectiveness of the 
monitoring and prevention of geological disasters also depend on 
the depth of our understanding of certain geological principles 
and the level of S&amp;T. Accelerating the development of 
geological 
S&amp;T, therefore, has profound strategic significance. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) S&amp;T Development Strategy 
  In the main, research in geological S&amp;T must revolve 
around 
the achievement of the magnificent objectives put forward by the 
Party and the State by the end of this century and the objective 
demands made by sustained economic development on geological 
work in the 21st century. We must never stop enhancing our 
ability to solve the major S&amp;T problems encountered in the 
prospecting of mineral resources and in environmental geological 
studies. We must nurture an army of scientific researchers and 
managerial personnel; lay the foundation for the development of 
the discipline; develop new theories, new methods, new 
technology, new equipment, and new processes; make a great 
effort to solve a string of critical S&amp;T problems and come 
up to 
or close in on advanced world standards in a number of fields 
where we are on solid ground, such as stratigraphy, prospecting 
geochemistry, isotope dating, sedimentology, regional 
composition and ore-field composition, certain mineralization 
theories, and crustal stress. 
  2) S&amp;T Development Goals 
  Year 2000 
  a) Concentrate our resources on examining and solving a 
number of mineral geological issues, with the emphasis on 
energy, precious metals, and copper; solving a number of 
environmental ecological problems, focusing on the proper 
extraction and utilization of groundwater resources, geological 
disaster forecasting, and the formulation of policies and 
measures in response to the disasters; solving problems relating 
to methods, technology, and equipment, focusing on the 
effectiveness of the search for complex oil fields and gas 
fields, deep mines, minerals that are hard to identify, and 
low-grade ores; furthering the geological study of important 
mining areas and geological units and solving major basic 
geological problems; continuously raising the level of 
geological science in theory and technology; enhancing the 
effectiveness and environmental benefits of mineral prospecting 
work; and increasing the staying power of mineral prospecting 
work. 
  b) Nurture a group of academically accomplished geologists 
who are influential in the international geological community 
and an army of young and middle-aged academic leaders who have 
mastered the theories and are skilled in technology. Together 
they will form a high-caliber and academically excellent corps 
that has a balanced mix. 
  c) Create an environment conducive to the proportionate and 
balanced development of basic research, applied research, and 
research and development [R&amp;D]. Solidify and develop a 
number of 
national-level research institutions and laboratories of an 
international standard. Create a new dynamic mechanism in 
several areas that will start in motion a sequence of 
activities, from achievements to application and production to 
commodity sales. 
  d) In light of the reality in China's geology, we shall 
absorb from overseas advanced academic thought in order to 
reinforce and develop our own geological theories. Keep up with 
the march of S&amp;T progress in geology. Utilize the latest 
achievements in modern natural sciences. Introduce and develop 
high-technology. Diligently develop new peripheral disciplines. 
Open up new territory for geological science. Gradually narrow 
the gap with advanced nations, with a view toward approaching or 
matching advanced world standards and even becoming a leader in 
those areas where we have a strong foundation. 
  By the Year 2020 
  Building on the progress in geological S&amp;T in this 
century, 
we should continue to raise the level of geological S&amp;T, 
enhance 
our capacity for solving geological problems so as to better 
meet the demands made by socialist development on geological 
work. Further develop the theory and technological methods of 
geological science and come up with a host of pioneering S&amp;T 
achievements, make fresh contributions in an ever-growing number 
of areas, approaching or reaching advanced world standards and 
even becoming a leader in the world, thus making even greater 
contributions to geological science. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technologies 
  The major tasks in the development of geological S&amp;T 
are: 
establish a mechanism for integrating geological S&amp;T, on the 
one 
hand, with the search for minerals and the national economy, on 
the other, by revolving around the general goal of quadrupling 
the gross value of industrial and agricultural output; vastly 
step up research on conditions for mineralization in key areas 
and for key minerals, further examine geological theories and 
mineralization theories, and work hard to develop and utilize 
properly all manner of advanced methods and technology to bring 
about major breakthroughs in the search for minerals; intensify 
research on the comprehensive utilization of mineral products, 
promote the sound development and utilization of mineral 
resources, and seek major progress in the research on several 
key minerals whose dressing and smelting present problems; 
further research on groundwater resources, the environmental 
ecology, and major geological disasters to provide a basis for 
optimizing the geological environment and the prevention and 
control of geological disasters. 
  1) Intensify Research on Mining Geology and Solve Critical 
S&amp;T Problems in the Search for Minerals 
  To ensure that the goals outlined in the 12-year mineral 
search plan relating to the increase in reserves will be 
achieved and to lay the groundwork for the bases for mineral 
prospecting by the beginning of the next century, we must first 
further geological research and then make better use of 
geological theory as a guide to geological prospecting. 
  About mineralization theory. On the one hand, we must learn 
from advanced foreign experience in light of geological 
practices in China, study mineralization mechanism in depth, and 
establish a variety of mineral deposit models and mineralization 
series models. On the other hand, in the long haul we must 
utilize the existing data accumulated over the past 4 decades 
and, combining it with field studies and global crustal 
evolution, study geology and the conditions for the formation 
and development of various deposits comprehensively. Using 
computer technology, we should build four-dimensional geological 
and mineralization models on various scales, all the way from 
the national level to key mineralization areas and deposits at 
the provincial and prefectural levels. Develop mineralization 
theories and conduct mineral forecasting to guide geological and 
mineral prospecting work. 
  Before the year 2000: Concentrate on pilot projects in key 
mining areas and important mineralization areas. 
  Methods for looking for minerals. Proceed from regional 
geological background and the conditions for mineralization. 
Integrate it with the appropriate mineralization theory, 
geochemistry (including deposit geochemistry), geophysics 
(including deep-layer geophysics,) and the comprehensive 
research of remote-sensing geological engineering and other 
forms of engineering. Establish an effective geological 
engineering science that can locate minerals. Design a 
comprehensive mineral-location methods that achieve the best 
allocation. 
  Regarding the different kinds of minerals, we must step up 
comprehensive mineral research, comprehensive mineral 
forecasting, make energy our top priority, step up the search 
for liquefied gas, precious metals, copper, and other minerals 
that we are acutely short of. Redouble our effort to discover 
new ore types and new mines and provide an S&amp;T basis for the 
location of large and extra-large mineral resources. Also, step 
up mineral location in the peripheral areas of mines. Intensify 
geological research on mines. Increase the recovery rate of 
minerals. Prolong the life-span of a mine. 
  a) Energy source minerals. Achieve S&amp;T breakthroughs 
and put 
equal emphasis on petroleum, coal, and natural gas. With the 
requirements for mineralization as a starting point, we should 
emphasize petroleum, coal, and natural gas equally. Increase the 
share of natural gas in overall energy consumption. Further 
research on uranothorite, geothermal heat, and energy sources in 
groundwater-bearing crust. 
  -- Intensify the exploration, forecasting, and assessment of 
petroleum reserves in eastern and western China (particularly 
the Tarim Basin) and along the coast. Open up new oil-bearing 
strata, areas, depths. Pay attention to the origins, principles 
of distribution, resource evaluation, and development and 
utilization of non-anticlinal and complex oil and gas deposits, 
particularly natural gas (including coal gas) to provide a 
scientific basis for the discovery of new large oil fields and 
gas fields and increase the share of natural gas in the mix of 
energy sources in China. 
  -- Conduct in-depth research into the mineralization 
principles of the major uranium deposits, as well as mineral 
deposits of the granite, volcanic rock, moissanite, and 
sand-pile types. Establish comprehensive mineral location 
models. Launch intensive research on new pre-Cambrian deposits. 
Select our search areas strategically. Do a good job in the 
evaluation of major uranium-bearing areas and the mineralization 
projections of large-scale uranium-rich deposits to build up a 
reserve for the development of nuclear energy beyond the year 
2000. 
  -- Improve coal prospecting and step up mine geological 
studies to contribute to the doubling of coal output. In 
addition to the on-going research on coal formation, we must 
develop methods to locate hidden coal fields and to identify 
different kinds of coal and their distribution and study ways of 
developing and utilizing coal properly to pave the way for the 
comprehensive utilization of coal in the next century. 
  b) Non-ferrous metals. Emphasize copper. Examine 
mineralization conditions for deposits and conduct mineral 
geological studies. Improve mineral forecasting of the deep and 
peripheral areas of old mines and other areas favorable to 
mineralization to guide the location of large-scale copper 
mines. Give priority to research on material composition and 
comprehensive utilization of large and mid-sized multi-metal 
deposits that occur with copper deposits and that of 
copper-nickel deposits to provide a basis for comprehensive 
development and comprehensive utilization. Continue research on 
the mineralization environment for aluminum, lead, zinc, nickel, 
antimony, tin, bismuth, mercury, and other minerals, and make 
reserve projections to better ensure the availability of mineral 
resources. 
  c) Precious metals. Step up research on mineralization 
geological background, mineralization theories, new technology, 
and new methods. Improve the mineralization theory for gold and 
silver. Strive for breakthroughs in new types of metals and new 
areas to bring about a substantial increase in reserves. 
  d) Ferrous metals. Intensify research on mineralization 
theories. Launch research on the Anshan and Panxi types of iron 
ores to guide the search for minerals. Using paleogeographic 
sedimentary methods, we should research the law of distribution 
of low-sulfur good-quality manganese in the areas surrounding 
the Yangtze plateau and the geological requirements for 
mineralization of small but rich oxidized manganese to provide 
long-term iron and manganese prospecting areas and meet the 
requirements of the metallurgical industry after the year 2000. 
  e) Potassium, chromium, platinum, diamond. Long-term 
reserves 
uncertain. Prospecting difficult. Focusing on the in-depth 
analysis of the geological requirements for mineralization for 
key minerals at home and abroad, we should analyze and project 
the prospects and direction of the search for these minerals in 
the future and provide a scientific basis for planning the 
search for minerals. Continue research on the exploitation of 
the modern potassium-bearing salt lakes in Qinghai and the 
comprehensive utilization of potassium-bearing water in 
northeastern Sichuan. Conduct research on potassium-bearing 
rocks and the extraction of potassium from sea water. 
  f) Tungsten, molybdenum, rare-earths, and other rare metals. 
Allocate a substantial amount of resources to continue research 
on mineralization theories and the law of distribution to 
preserve our resource edge, step up geological research on 
mines. Increase the recovery rate and raise the standard of ore 
dressing. Vigorously pursue research on the multiple processing 
of mineral products and their utilization. Widen the area of 
application and enhance China's ability to export and earn 
foreign exchange. 
  g) Non-metallic minerals. There are 85 non-metallic minerals 
in China with proven reserves, but research on their development 
and utilization is very limited. There should be more testing 
and research on the minerals, rock quality, material properties, 
and special properties. There should be feasibility studies on 
successor industries following the multiple processing of 
mineral products to extend geological work. Accelerate the 
commercialization of geological achievements and spur economic 
development. 
  h) New mineral raw materials, new resources, and new 
materials. The discovery of a certain mineral (rock) property or 
special property often leads to changes in resource demand and 
resource structure. So we should continue to participate in and 
develop research on new performance materials such as 
superconducting materials and industrial ceramics and new 
structural materials in order to find new sources and new 
materials for what the national economy demands: superconducting 
materials, permanent magnet materials, industrial ceramics, and 
new building materials. Conduct tests and experiments to find 
new uses for minerals (rocks). Develop research on substitute 
materials. 
  2) Launch Comprehensive Utilization Research. Promote the 
Sound Development of Mineral Resources 
  Comprehensive utilization research is a prerequisite for 
distinguishing what is mineral from what is not, and deciding 
how to develop and whether or not to invest in geological work. 
It also is a key basis for deposit appraisal and sound 
development and utilization. In the past this area of work was 
overlooked. In the case of some mines, the proven reserves might 
be considerable, but so far we have not been able to exploit 
them because they are lean ores or complex ores, or because 
mineral separation is difficult. Once ore dressing and 
comprehensive utilization technology are mastered, idle mines 
will become active ones and single minerals will become multiple 
minerals, significantly increasing the degree of resource 
assurance and the extent of resource self-sufficiency. Thus we 
must step up basic theoretical research on the comprehensive 
utilization of minerals and ore-dressing or smelting technology, 
and use the latest achievements in modern natural sciences to 
overcome the barriers to the utilization of new, impure, or 
minute mineral species. Intensify the testing and research of 
the material composition and dressing and smelting of mineral 
ores which are found in large quantities in many areas but which 
are hard to dress by developing new technology, new methods, and 
new processes. Launch research on floatation mechanisms, 
floatation agents and the phase-change mechanism in the course 
of ore dressing and smelting. Expand the scope of resource 
utilization and provide resource reserve bases. 
  Before the year 2000, we should concentrate research on the 
comprehensive utilization of tin and iron ores, ludwigite, 
manganese carbonate, salt lakes and water resources, sedimentary 
phosphorite, micrometals, precious metals, non-metals, liquefied 
minerals, and other resources. Study ore dressing and smelting 
processes, including non-polluting gold extraction. Conduct 
experiments in red iron ore dressing and smelting. Develop ore 
dressing theories and methods. 
  Before the year 2020, we should further research on the 
comprehensive utilization of certain large and mid-sized mineral 
products that are desperately needed; new, complex, fine mineral 
products; low-grade iron, phosphorus, precious metals, 
non-metals, liquefied mineral products, and other resources. 
Intensify the comprehensive utilization research of tailings and 
slag. Open up new territory for reconnaissance mineral surveys 
and the comprehensive utilization of mineral products. Conduct 
systematic research on the comprehensive utilization of 
underwater mineral resources. 
  3) Intensify Environmental Geological Research To Ensure 
Smooth Progress in Economic Construction. 
  The environmental issue is an important task in geological 
S&amp;T. In the wake of industrial and agricultural development 
and 
rapid social development, the geological environmental problem 
will become increasingly prominent. An essential part of 
geological S&amp;T research will be geological environmental 
evaluation, interactions between the geological environment and 
human activities, measures to protect and judiciously utilize 
the geological environment, and geological disasters and 
prevention and treatment. 
  Pre-2000 geological environmental research will focus on 
major economic regions, land restoration areas (agricultural and 
animal husbandry areas), key cities, major projects, important 
transportation arteries, and leading mines. 
  a) groundwater resources research. Groundwater is an 
essential part of mineral resources. In arid and semi-arid areas 
in northern China and the karst areas in the south which are dry 
on a seasonal basis, in particular, groundwater often serves as 
the principal source of drinking water for both humans and 
livestock as well as water for industrial and agricultural uses. 
Within this century, we must ascertain the total magnitude of 
China's groundwater resources and draw up a regional profile of 
these resources. With that as a basis, we can then focus on 
research that would ensure the availability of groundwater 
resources in the north (especially northern China) the karst 
region in the south, and agricultural development areas, and on 
principles regulating the recharge of groundwater, runoff, and 
drainage and their development and utilization. Conduct 
feasibility studies on the conversion and joint storage of 
atmospheric precipitation, surface water, and (epigenetic) 
groundwater, thereby contributing to the sound development, 
utilization, and protection of water resources and help develop 
water-efficient agriculture and industry. 
  Step up research on ensuring the volume and availability of 
groundwater resources in energy bases. Work out an optimal 
development plan so that energy recovery and the exploitation of 
groundwater can proceed in a coordinated manner. 
  Launch research on groundwater resource surveying in 
important cities, coastal economic development areas, key 
projects, and key mines. Conduct studies on water resource 
management models. 
  b) Geological engineering research. Conduct geological 
engineering studies diligently in coastal economic development 
areas, in major cities, in key engineering projects, and in 
leading mines; prepare the appropriate diagram series; study 
crustal stability, rock structure, and its dynamic properties; 
study the impact of the recharge, runoff, and discharge of 
groundwater on engineering geology; study the geological 
engineering characteristics of rock formation and changes in 
properties under different conditions as well as new technology 
and new methods for geological engineering testing. Review and 
develop China's geohydrological and geological engineering 
theories and methods. 
  c) Monitor geological disasters and work out prevention and 
control measures. Do a preliminary study on the classification, 
causes, distribution, and evolving trends of geological 
disasters. Conduct an economic appraisal of geological 
disasters. Put forward measures to alleviate or prevent 
geological disasters. 
  Continue our active structural monitoring and current 
crustal 
movement research to spur the development of seismogeology. 
Focus on research on changes in ground surface along the coast 
of the Chang Jiang mainstream, along important transportation 
arteries in major cities, in areas where major engineering and 
construction projects are under way, and in economic development 
areas; focus on research on the monitoring of the formation and 
development of mud-slides, landslides, mud rock flow, and other 
geological disasters as well as their forecasting. Pay attention 
to the geological environmental changes that occur in major 
mining belts in the mining process, the laws governing the 
gushing of water in pits, and subsidences and collapses caused 
by the tapping of groundwater; put forward solutions and methods 
of dealing with them. 
  d) Research on geological environmental changes, pollution, 
and policies. Conduct feasibility studies on water diversion 
between the basins of large rivers. Conduct research on the 
natural and man-made changes (such as the geological disposal of 
nuclear waste) in the geological environment in energy 
development zones, large and mid-sized mining zones, industrial 
areas, major cities, and coastal economic development zones, and 
their impact on the ecology. Study pollution sources. Put 
forward treatment measures for national policy-making. 
  4) Develop Agricultural Geology and Spur Agricultural Output 
  Practice proves that agricultural geology is of profound 
practical significance for the sound distribution of crops and 
increase in output. It is proposed that the state invest in it 
as appropriate and support the development of agricultural 
geology. 
  Initiate research on the relations between agrogeology and 
superior crops within this century, improve the division of the 
nation into agricultural regions and give a boost to sound 
planting; disseminate scientific research achievements that 
would promote the scientific and sound use of water, the 
transformation of land and soil that is excessively wet or dry 
as well as saline-alkali soil and the increase in output over a 
large area; use geothermy to develop cash crops; study ways of 
broadening the application of non-traditional mineral 
agricultural fertilizers to fuel rising crop output; investigate 
the relations between soil and the five elements, on the one 
hand, and crop growth, on the other, and guide the research and 
development of compound fertilizers and the application of such 
fertilizers; research and develop mineral fodder additives, 
conserve grain, and develop aquaculture and animal husbandry. 
  5) Step Up Basic Geological and Regional Geological Studies. 
Strengthen the Staying Power of Geological Work 
  Basic geology and regional geology are the foundation of 
mineral geology and provide a scientific basis for strategic 
planning for reconnaissance survey and mineral search, 
comprehensive environmental evaluation, comprehensive treatment, 
and national land renewal. Deepening our understanding of basic 
geological issues is the cornerstone of our effort to further 
regional geological studies and a precondition for achieving 
major breakthroughs in the search for minerals. Accordingly we 
must assimilate the latest achievements in modern geological 
science, adopt advanced methods and technology, and learn from 
and cooperate with a variety of disciplines. Conduct 
multiple-objective comprehensive research and comprehensive 
evaluation to enhance the efficacy of our search for minerals 
and raise the standard of environmental evaluation. Launch 
studies on the lithosphere, hydrosphere, biosphere, and 
atmosphere, and their interactions. The development of the 
theory of geological science is a long-term strategic task in 
geological S&amp;T work. 
  a) Comprehensive research on major minerogenetic areas 
(belts) and structural units favorable to mineralization. 
Building on the basic research outlined in the Seventh Five-Year 
Plan, we should continue in-depth studies on the 
Aer-tai-Xizhunge'er-Tianshan-Kunlun-Qinling mountain ranges, the 
three-river fold in the southwest, the lower and middle reaches 
of Chang Jiang, and the northern edge of the Zhongchao platform. 
Initiate studies on new areas like the Yangzi platform, the 
Daxingan Ling and Qilian folds. Compile the appropriate diagrams 
and maps. Develop regional geological and regional 
mineralization theories. Conduct minerogenetic forecasting. Step 
up comparative geological studies on an inter-continental and 
even global scale. 
  Before 2020, launch a number of new regional studies. Deepen 
our understanding of the areas mentioned above and participate 
extensively in comparative studies on an inter-continental and 
global basis. Expand regional geological studies into global 
geology, then use global geological concepts to deepen our 
understanding of regional geological characteristics, thereby 
contributing to global geological studies. 
  b) Compile a new generation of maps, atlases, and books 
dealing with the geology, geophysics, geochemistry, and remote 
sensing of major regions and the entire nation. Compile special 
diagrams to meet the needs of national land restoration and 
development planning. Compile or participate in the compilation 
of inter-continental (including oceanic) geological maps. Study 
new map-making methods and theories. Further automation in 
map-making. 
  c) Integrate China's major minerogenetic geotectonic 
elements. Conduct comprehensive research on the lithosphere, 
deep-lying geology, geophysics, and geochemistry. Within this 
century, through multi-disciplinary comprehensive studies and 
research on Class I geoscientific fractures, structural tectonic 
belts, and important basins, we should determine the basic 
framework of the structure of the lithosphere within China and 
the crustal structure of important structural zones and basins 
and establish a classification of crustal structures. Use 
satellite location technology to study the new structural 
movement. Ascertain the gravitational stress in key areas. 
Accumulate data and gradually develop a crustal movement and 
dynamic model. After these tasks are accomplished, explore their 
impact on ore formation and spatial distribution, on crustal 
stability and on major geological disasters. Pave the way 
geologically for extra-deep geological well-drilling projects. 
  Participate in international cooperation on an extensive 
scale before the year 2020. Monitor developments at the 
forefront of earth science. Solve more theoretical and practical 
problems. Carry out extra-deep well-drilling projects. 
  d) Conduct basic geological research. Study major basic 
geological issues: crust, rocks, minerals, major geological 
events, and major geological properties and structural activity. 
Expedite the development of such disciplines as geotectology, 
experimental geology, rock science, applied mineralogy, regional 
and deep geophysics, geochemistry, and organic geochemistry. 
  e) Marine geological resources research. Conduct geological 
resources survey to scale on China's continental shelf, 
continental slope, and deep-sea basins to produce a clear 
profile of the geological structure of China's territorial 
waters by the end of this century. Research and develop advanced 
technology for exploring deep-sea marine geological resources. 
  Investigate oceanic sedimentation, the law of ore formation, 
and the structure of the ocean crust. Develop oceanic geological 
theories to provide a scientific basis for the exploitation of 
minerals in international waters. 
  Systematically exploit mineral resources in both shallow 
coastal waters and the oceans before 2020. 
  f) Geological mineral surveys in Antarctica. Conduct surveys 
in Antarctica. Compile geological and mineral products maps for 
Antarctica. Complete preliminary evaluation of the geological 
and mineral resources of Antarctica and project its exploitation 
prospects to provide the data necessary for China's drive to 
develop Antarctica resources. 
  6) Develop Prospecting Technology. Expedite Major 
Breakthroughs in the Search for Mineral Ores. Increase the 
Returns on Investment in Geological Prospecting. 
  In a certain sense, geological science is an information 
science. It follows that prospecting methods, technology, and 
equipment are the tools and means for securing such information, 
an important guarantee of enhancing the economic and social 
returns of geological work. 
  The basic methods of geological prospecting today are 
physical prospecting, chemical prospecting, and remote-sensing 
prospecting. On the other hand, drilling is the most essential 
means for uncovering ores and other geological matter, 
collecting a variety of test samples, examining and verifying a 
range of abnormalities, and laying our hands on mineral 
deposits. Up to the end of this century we should concentrate on 
researching and developing new methods, new technology, and new 
apparatus in geophysics, geochemistry, and remote-sensing for 
use in mineral prospecting, environmental geological surveying, 
and the study of complex of geological issues, as well as new 
processes and equipment for mineral prospecting. At the same 
time, continue to develop advanced rock analysis and testing 
techniques and methods and look for ways to broaden the 
application of computer technology. Make our methods more 
comprehensive and our equipment better related. Enhance our 
ability to locate deep-seated ores and others that are hard to 
identify and to solve complex environmental geological problems. 
  a) Intensify research on geophysical and geochemical methods 
and technology. Develop high-resolution three-dimensional 
seismic prospecting and integrated digital and numerical control 
logging technology. Develop physical and chemical prospecting 
technologies for directly locating oil, gas, and geothermal 
heat. Develop technology that can effectively probe deeply 
buried minerals and others that are hard to identify, as well as 
technology to be used in environmental geological surveying. 
Improve physical and chemical prospecting technologies for use 
inside a pit, follower logging, and other pit locating 
technology. Explore setting up a system for drilling for solid 
mineral products without coring. Step up research on the 
application of regional geophysical and regional geochemical 
data. Give priority to theoretical research on geophysical 
prospecting and geochemical prospecting to lay the foundation 
for the development of new methods and new technology. 
  b) Promote the application of remote-sensing technology. 
Make 
good use of new satellite pictures, develop new aerial 
remote-sensing methods, raise the standard of digital processing 
technology and the level of theory of remote-sensing technology, 
and launch research on the application of resource prospecting, 
environmental monitoring, land restoration, and urban-rural 
planning. 
  c) Extra-deep well drilling is a large-scale comprehensive 
piece of engineering that represents advances in multiple 
disciplines. Not only can it directly shed light on matter in 
the inner depths of the crust and its structure, but it can also 
spawn a string of new theories and new technology. However, it 
embraces a broad area, involves complex technology, and requires 
a substantial investment. We should go about drawing up an 
extra-deep well drilling plans before the year 2000, select well 
sites and conduct studies, formulate a technological plan, lay 
down the task in its entirety as well as the measures that need 
to be taken, and conduct research on the technology of 
extra-deep well drilling as well as its basic theory. Meanwhile, 
we also need to train qualified personnel to set the stage for 
implementing the extra-deep well drilling plan at the beginning 
of the next century. 
  d) Raise the standard of experimental testing technology. 
Closely integrate geological prospecting with scientific 
research. Give priority to the R&amp;D of an analytical system 
for 
multi-trace-elements and super multi-trace-elements. Improve the 
technology for geological dating and stabilize the level of the 
technology of isotope analysis. Develop organic geochemical 
testing technology. Research and develop petrological minerals 
and geochemical samples. Build up China's body of geochemical 
samples systematically. Intensify research on the geochemical 
properties and application of new mineral and rock materials. 
  e) Research, develop, and popularize new special-purpose 
equipment. Over time, equipment that is widely used all over 
China should become part of a set and most of it should be 
manufactured at home. Research and develop multi-parameter and 
multi-media intelligent prospecting equipment and apparatus to 
be used in the air, on land, or underground. Research special 
physical prospecting equipment and apparatus for use in on-site 
analysis. Promote real-time surveying in chemical prospecting. 
Develop and popularize a host of new equipment for use in 
mineral and rock testing and sample analysis. 
  f) Vigorously popularize computer technology with a view 
toward using the computer widely in the collection of geological 
information, data processing, image processing, machine 
map-making, composition, and printing. Explore setting up a 
geological information system based on a data base, model base, 
and method base and a system with all kinds of interpretation 
systems. Set up an automatic evaluation system for solid mineral 
products, a network of artificial intelligence experts, and a 
data network. 
  By the year 2020, the latest S&amp;T achievements, including 
stratification analysis, holography, high-temperature 
superconductivity, and the smart computer, should be used to 
develop new prospecting methods, technology, and equipment and 
open up new areas of application. 
  7) Soft Science Research 
  a) Research on geological economics and management. 
Concentrate on global mineral resources demand forecasting and 
their development strategy, the prices of mineral products on 
the world market, China's import-export policy, the resource 
economics of China's leading minerals, the economic evaluation 
of regional mineral resources and industrial development 
distribution, coastal mineral resources and economic 
development, the technical and economic evaluation of mineral 
deposits and the optimal degree of mineral deposit prospecting, 
geological work and geological economic management model, 
payment for the use of geological achievements, and other issues 
that arise in the reform of geological work. 
  b) Provide scientific support for macro policy-making by the 
state. Using mineral resources and the geological environment as 
the base, conduct comprehensive scientific studies revolving 
around the major engineering projects undertaken by the state, 
national land planning, and economic development zones so as to 
provide scientific base for the state as it formulates major 
policies. 
  c) Systems research on geological work, geological S&amp;T 
development strategy, policy, and management. 
  d) Effective ways of integrating geological work with 
economic development. 
  e) Methodological studies on the soft science of mining. 
<H5>  Recycled Resources </H5>
  Today even as man enjoys the material civilization created 
by 
the Industrial Revolution, he discharges into a living space 
none too big to begin with a variety of waste materials in huge 
quantities. Each year tens of billions of tons of waste 
materials in solid, liquid, or gaseous form are released, not 
only taking up an enormous amount of land but also polluting the 
environment extensively and damaging the ecological balance. 
  At the beginning of this century, many people of vision 
foresaw the resource crisis and deterioration in the living 
environment that would accompany an industrial society. They 
spread their message loud and clear and over time came to 
command widespread public interest. In the second half of this 
century, industrialized nations were driven by the mounting 
pressure of a resource crisis to deal with the urgent need to 
clean up the environment. This spawned the rise of an industry 
that develops and utilizes recycled resources. 
  So-called recycled resources is an umbrella term for all 
materials that are created in a multi-stage process in society, 
including production, circulation, and consumption, that may 
exist in any one of a variety of forms, that no longer have the 
original use value but that may regain use value through 
different processing procedures. 
  Unlike the exploitation of natural resources, the 
utilization 
of recycled resources does away with the complicated extraction 
and resource-concentrating process. Not only are natural 
resources effectively protected, saving a lot of investment 
dollars and lowering production costs and energy consumption 
significantly, but the environment is also improved markedly and 
a unity and balance are achieved between short-term demand and 
long-term development. 
  At present all developed nations have come to regard the 
development and utilization of recycled resources as the second 
mining industry and take it most seriously. The recycling 
industry has become an up-and-coming enterprise. 
  China is a developing nation with a huge population and a 
weak industrial base. It suffers from energy shortages and is 
sorely strapped for funds. This being the reality in China, 
fully tapping the potential of recycled resources and finding 
new ways to utilize them is no doubt an effective and important 
means to achieve economic development with Chinese 
characteristics by securing greater economic benefits and 
widespread social results in return for relatively low 
consumption. Recycling provides society with more basic 
materials to strengthen the nation's economic muscle in a hurry 
while satisfying a burgeoning demand on the part of consumers. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) Development Strategy Provide the nation with a full 
line-up of important materials on an on-going basis in view of 
the massive requirements of economic development and the severe 
shortfall in resource supplies, and given the need to economize 
on investment, lower production costs and energy consumption, 
cut back on the exploitation of natural resources, and maintain 
the ecological balance. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  Year 2000 
  a) Produce 1.1 million tons of recycled non-ferrous metals 
each year, 25 percent of the total output of non-ferrous metals, 
up from the current 20 percent. The production of a similar 
amount of original primary minerals would mean an additional 
8.68 billion yuan in investment. Besides saving investment 
dollars, the use of recycled non-ferrous metals would cut energy 
consumption by an equivalent of 6.7 million tons of standard 
coal, reduce the amount of assorted wastes emitted by 6.7 
million tons, and reduce the amount of hazardous substances like 
sulfur emitted by more than 200,000 tons. 
  b) Recover 22 million tons of scrap iron nationwide each 
year. Provide iron and steel mills with 16 million tons of 
furnace materials, thus saving 16 million tons of pig iron, 
which translates into savings of 20 million tons of standard 
coal and 12.8 billion yuan in investment. 
  c) Recover 500,000 tons of used chemical fibers, including 
200,000 to 300,000 tons which have been mechanically loosened 
and 100,000 tons which have been chemically treated. 
  d) Recycle 4 million tons of paper each year, constituting 
30 
percent of the total volume of scrap paper, up from the current 
20 percent. This can be made into 3.2 million tons of paper, 
saving 16 million cubic meters of timber, 1.6 million tons of 
sodium hydroxide, 1.6 million tons of standard coal, 200,000 
kilowatt-hours [kWh] of electricity, and 80 million yuan in 
production costs. 
  e) Recycle 300,000 tons of used rubber, 46 percent of used 
rubber resources. Recycle 7.5 to 8 million used tires, 16 to 18 
percent of total tire output. 
  f) Recycle 1.25 million tons of waste plastics, raising the 
recycling rate (the amount of plastics recycled as a percentage 
of all waste plastics) from the current 21 percent to 40 percent. 
  g) Recover 4.8 million tons of used or old glass, 20 percent 
of total glass output for the same period, saving 480,000 tons 
of standard coal, 285,000 tons of quartz, and 1 million tons of 
soda ash compared to the traditional glass production process, 
and lowering production costs by 20 percent. 
  h) Utilize 80 million tons of powdered coal, 40 percent of 
the total amount of ash discharged for the period in question, 
including 20 million tons for mixing with cement or building 
materials, 10 percent of the total amount of ash discharged in 
the period; and 40 million tons for use in road construction, in 
fill in development zones, in the construction of road 
embankments, and in land surfacing, 20 percent of the total 
amount of ash discharged. Another 20 million tons, 10 percent of 
the total amount of ash discharged, are used for other purposes. 
  By the year 2020 
  Recycle 2.2 million to 2.5 millon tons of nonferrous metals 
each year. Recycle 40 million tons of scrap iron. Provide iron 
and steel mills with 30 million tons of standard furnace 
materials, 75 percent of the amount recovered; recover 1 million 
tons of waste chemical fibers, including 700,000 tons that are 
mechanically loosened and 300,000 tons that are chemically 
treated. Recover 7 million tons of waste paper, achieving a 
recovery rate of 45 percent. Recycle 2.93 million tons of waste 
plastic materials, raising the recycling rate to 50 percent. 
Utilize old and used glass at a rate of 40 percent of total 
glass output for the period concerned. Utilize powdered coal ash 
at a rate of 60 percent of all powdered coal ash discharged in 
that period. The major ash-discharging areas should make it a 
priority to achieve the full recovery of all ash discharged. 
  To achieve the above strategic objectives, S&amp;T must 
orient 
itself to the reality in production, scientific research must be 
guided by what the commodity market needs, and production must 
closely rely on S&amp;T progress, fully utilizing the important 
S&amp;T 
contributions in the area in question. 
  Based on this guiding thought, we decide on the following 
S&amp;T 
strategic objective as far as the utilization of recycled 
resources is concerned: Providing the key technology for 
furthering the comprehensive utilization of recycled materials, 
lowering production costs and energy consumption, improving 
product quality, and raising the added value of resources. 
Create the necessary technical conditions for the achievement of 
the general strategic objective. 
  -- Give priority to the R&amp;D of new technology and new 
equipment for sorting and preprocessing. 
  When it comes to the development and utilization of recycled 
materials, the gap between China and the leading nations in the 
world is most striking in the sorting and preprocessing stages. 
Accordingly, the R&amp;D and dissemination of sorting and 
preprocessing technology is a vital yet common part of the 
technology in this field. We should develop methods for the 
recovery of recycled resources of all sorts by group as well as 
means of containerized transportation and storage; adopt, 
absorb, and assimilate foreign sorting and preprocessing 
technology, learning from the experience of the advanced; study 
ways of diffusing mechanized sorting and preprocessing 
techniques and equipment that are suited to China's 
characteristics, and raise the direct utilization rate of 
recycled resources. Specifically, the direct utilization rate of 
mixed non-ferrous metals should exceed 50 percent compared with 
the current 30 percent. The sorting and preprocessing technology 
for mixed used plastics should match the prevailing advanced 
standard in the world. 
  -- Develop new technology for processing and utilizing scrap 
iron. Continue to research and popularize double-filings steel 
smelting technology. Study and popularize technology for the 
comprehensive utilization of low-alloy scrap steel to make the 
most of alloying elements. Adopt new scrap iron processing 
technology to enhance our scrap iron processing capacity 
effectively. Provide iron and steel works with clearly 
classified standard furnace charges in sufficient quantities. 
  --Introduce new recycling technology for waste and impure 
nonferrous metals. Research the specific processes and key 
technology for recycling lead, aluminum, copper, and other 
traditional metals. Widely adopt new processes and equipment 
that result in high recovery rates and low energy consumption, 
are non-polluting, and achieve a high level of comprehensive 
utilization. Aim for a metal recovery rare of 95 percent and 
more. Develop and popularize recycling technology for used 
batteries, used toothpaste tubes, scrap aluminum alloys, and 
other resources waiting for exploitation. Expand the production 
capacity of existing enterprises. Effectively increase the 
output of recycled non-ferrous metals. 
  -- Research recycling technology for waste organic 
high-molecular materials. Introduce methods to improve the 
existing recycling processes for scrap plastics. After mastering 
the preprocessing technology, we should learn from the 
experience of other advanced nations and research and popularize 
the use of waste plastics recycling machinery suited to China's 
national conditions in order to improve the product's 
performance and quality. Use new technology and advanced 
equipment to replace in due course outdated technology and 
equipment currently used in rubber recycling. Research new 
technology and equipment to make a variety of products using 
used rubber, thereby creating new uses for recycled rubber. 
Develop a whole new set of technology and flaw detection 
equipment for retreading used tires. Improve the performance of 
retreaded tires. 
  -- Introduce new ways to utilize powdered coal ash and waste 
glass comprehensively. In light of the reality in China's 
economy today, we should introduce a way to process and utilize 
powdered coal ash in large quantity so as to solve the current 
problems of pollution and land being taken up, two problems that 
demand immediate attention. Research the use of powdered coal 
ash in providing a variety of building materials as well as 
sorting technology and technology for sound utilization. Study 
ways of using used glass, including the technology and equipment 
for making several value-added products using used glass, so as 
to increase the economic value of used glass. 
  By the year 2000, recycling in China must be as advanced as 
the best in the world in the 1980's in terms of S&amp;T, while 
the 
recycling technology of some precious metals and high-molecular 
materials should approach the prevailing advanced standard in 
the world. Microelectronics technology will begin to be applied 
in some areas in this field. Speed up the application of 
scientific research achievements to production extensively. The 
rudiments of an inter-industry scientific research, design, and 
dissemination system will have taken shape. The quality of 
workers will have improved to varying extents. Professional and 
technical staff will account for 4 to 5 percent of all workers, 
up from the current 1 percent. 
  In the year 2020 we must continue to tackle the 
comprehensive 
development of recycled materials as a priority and work to 
increase the output of recycled materials. We must continue to 
concentrate on the high-standard comprehensive utilization of 
recycled materials and the dissemination of multiple processing 
technology. Take into consideration the social, environmental, 
and economic benefits of recycling even as recycled materials 
increase in value substantially. 
  Building on what has been accomplished by the year 2000, we 
should continue to make improvements in the several areas 
mentioned above. In addition, we should pay attention to basic 
scientific research, weaving basic theoretical research, the 
development of applied technology, and the high-efficiency 
development, comprehensive utilization, and multiple processing 
of resources into a coherent and integrated industrial system 
that begins with resource development and culminates in 
providing society with all sorts of mature products. By and 
large the R&amp;D of recycled materials in China should approach 
the 
advanced standard in the world. In some fields, China should 
even set the pace globally. Set up a more complete scientific 
research, dissemination, and information feedback system. There 
should be marked improvements in the caliber of the workers, 
with professional and technical staff accounting for 10 to 15 
percent of all workers. Build up a professional and technical 
corps that combines scientific research, design, and trial 
manufacturing with actual production. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technology 
  1) Soft Science Research in the Development and Utilization 
of Recycled Resources 
  a) Survey on the basic conditions of recycling enterprises. 
Conduct a survey on recycling enterprises in China, followed by 
dynamic and static analyses. Then draw an accurate statistical 
profile of their resources and make scientific projections and 
appraisal of the development potential and trends for the entire 
industry. This will form a scientific basis for macro study and 
long-term planning by the state. 
  b) Work out resource classification standards and product 
quality standards suited to the characteristics of China's 
recycling enterprises. Primarily quality classification 
standards for used non-ferrous metals, used glass, and used 
plastic materials and classification standards for recycled 
plastics. 
  c) Economic and technical policy studies in the field of 
recycling. In the light of the characteristics of China's 
economy, we should formulate an economic and technical policy 
for each different sector of the economy. Such a policy should 
mainly include the following: prices, taxation, investment, 
examination and approval of scientific research projects, the 
transfer of and rewards for S&amp;T achievements, as well as 
technical standards for enterprises. Through the implementation 
of the appropriate economic and technological policies, we hope 
to expedite enterprise technical progress and a close union 
between technology and the economy. 
  2) Research on Scrap Iron and Steel Recycling Technology 
  a) Research and diffuse scrap iron and steel processing 
technology. Research and develop a new heating furnace to 
drastically improve baling density and cleanliness and 
performance. By the year 2000 1 million tons of steel filings 
should be baled using this method, increasing to 2 million tons 
by the year 2020. Research and popularize plasma scrap iron 
cutting technology so that it will gradually replace the 
traditional oxygen cutting technology. In 2000, plasma scrap 
steel cutting technology should be used in the processing of 2.5 
million tons of scrap steel. By the year 2020 such technology 
should be applied universally. 
  b) Find new ways to recover and comprehensively utilize iron 
and steel filings. Continue to popularize the double-filing 
steel smelting technology, raising the average proportion from 
the current 20 to 25 percent. Research new technology to make a 
variety of new products out of unclassifiable high-alloy steel 
filings using chemical metallurgical technology. Research and 
popularize new technology to make a variety of value-added 
products, using low-alloy scrap steel such as bearing steel 
filings. Aim to recover and comprehensively utilize over 200,000 
tons of low-alloy steel filings by the year 2000. 
  3) Waste Paper Recycling Technology 
  Research new specialized processing technology and special 
equipment to sort, remove the dust and ink from, and bale waste 
paper using mechanized and semi-mechanized equipment. 
  4) Study New Recycling Technology for Mixed Scrap 
Non-Ferrous 
Metals 
  a) Research new technology for the comprehensive utilization 
of waste impure copper. Learning from the experiences of 
advanced nations like Britain and the United States, we should 
successfully develop by the end of this century the technology 
for the comprehensive utilization of mixed scrap copper that is 
suited to China's national conditions, and work hard to diffuse 
such technology. Essentially the technology would entail sorting 
mixed scrap copper into clearly marked alloys waste and then 
directly producing alloys close to the original designation in 
order to achieve the goal of direct utilization. The key here is 
the R&amp;D of sorting and preprocessing technology. 
  b) Research and develop new technology and equipment for the 
recycling and utilization of mixed scrap aluminum and several 
kinds of aluminum alloys. 
  In view of the fragmented and small-scale nature of recycled 
aluminum enterprises, our focus up to the year 2000 should be 
the technological transformation of small and mid-sized 
enterprises, the development of technology and equipment that 
come close to matching the best in the world, and the 
popularization of new smelting equipment such as the vertical 
furnace and double-chamber reverberating furnace. Unit energy 
consumption should drop to between 100 and 150 kilograms of 
standard coal and the metal recovery rate should exceed 95 
percent. 
  Research recovery technology for used pull-to-open cans and 
toothpaste tubes. Focus on problems in preprocessing technology. 
The successful development of such technology and its all-out 
diffusion should result in the recovery of 20,000 to 30,000 tons 
of aluminum each year by the year 2000. Study ways of recycling 
and utilizing aluminum alloys recovered from aircraft retired 
from service. End the current poor utilization or 
under-utilization of good materials. Increase the value-added 
level of recycled aluminum alloys. 
  Modernize the backward technology and equipment used in the 
smelting and processing of several kinds of lead-based alloys, 
including used lead-based batteries and the lead coverings of 
used cables. Research and popularize new technology and 
equipment that would raise the recovery rate, entail low energy 
consumption, cause no pollution, and achieve high comprehensive 
utilization rate. Focus on the pollution problem. Aim for a 
recovery rate over 95 percent. Lower the unit energy consumption 
to between 200 and 250 kilograms of standard coal. The amount of 
hazardous substances in the gases, fumes, and waste residues 
discharged should meet national emission standards. Alloys in 
the waste residues such as antimony should be recovered and 
utilized. By the year 2000, lead recycling technology should be 
fully diffused. 
  d) Comprehensive utilization of used dry batteries 
  Dry batteries contain zinc, manganese, ammonium salt, 
copper, 
and mercury and can supply over 350,000 tons of resources each 
year. By the year 2000, we must come up with recycling 
technology that is non-polluting and low-cost. Essentially this 
would include utilizing manganese, zinc, and ammonium salt 
soundly; raising the recovery rate for zinc and eliminating 
mercury pollution; directly utilizing manganese oxides if at all 
possible; and building two to four demonstration plants. Every 
effort should be made to diffuse the technology to every major 
city after the turn of the century, which would provide 60,000 
tons of zinc and over 100,000 tons of manganese dioxides each 
year. 
  e) Adopt from overseas, research, and develop new technology 
and new assembly lines for sorting and preprocessing mixed scrap 
metals. 
  Study and make use of the advanced and mature technology and 
key equipment overseas. Combine the importation of prototypes 
with R&amp;D on our own. Essentially this will involve developing 
equipment for crush sieving, wind sorting, magnet sorting, 
high-pressure electrostatic sorting, eddy-current sorting, and 
low-temperature freeze separation, and solving some of the more 
severe problems existing today: scrap metals being excessively 
mixed, cumbersome post-treatment technology, high energy 
consumption and production costs, and modest increases in added 
value. By 2000, we must successfully come up with sorting 
technology and equipment for used electronic parts and 
components and a variety of mixed waste materials as well as 
sorting and preprocessing technology for mixed wastes containing 
copper, aluminum and lead, thus creating the conditions for the 
large-scale recycling and utilization of mixed scrap metals and 
the drive to boost the utilization rate directly. 
  f) The comprehensive recovery and utilization of a variety 
of 
used catalysts. Used catalysts contain copper, nickel, zinc, 
vanadium, tungsten, molybdenum, bismuth, cobalt, and precious 
metals. At present we typically use the wet method for recovery 
purposes. By the year 2000 we should have introduced technology 
to process all kinds of used catalysts. It is proposed that a 
process combining the heating method with the wet method be used 
to process catalysts in the vanadium family and the family of 
precious metals and that ore separation and extraction or 
electrochemistry be used to process used catalysts in the 
copper, nickel, and cobalt families. Aim to boost the metal 
recovery rate beyond 95 percent. Carriers and other components 
that are valuable should be put to proper use. 
  g) Research new technology and equipment for the recycling 
of 
rare precious scrap metals. By 2000 we must have largely worked 
out the problems encountered in the recycling of various kinds 
of waste hard alloys and high smelting scrap metals which are of 
a complex make-up by introducing into this field special 
smelting processing technology and studying plasma smelting 
technology and applying it to solve the problems in the 
recycling of the above-mentioned waste materials. The 
development of new technology for the recycling and utilization 
of the platinum family of metals will remain an important 
scientific research topic in the future. Economically rational 
technological processes should be developed for different kinds 
of metal wastes such as used catalysts, used electronic parts, 
and the waste residues and waste liquid resulting from the 
metallurgical process. Concentrate on the research of techniques 
like flux extraction, ion exchange, and the heating method-wet 
method combination process which yield a high recovery rate. 
Solve the separation and purification problems among precious 
metals and between precious metals and base metals. By the year 
2000 we should come close to being the best in the world in some 
technologies. 
  h) Continue research on basic science in the recycling of 
nonferrous metals. Launch research on the mechanism of 
hydro-metallurgy in processing mixed scrap non-ferrous metals 
for comprehensive utilization as well as the use of special 
smelting technology in processing a variety of waste residues. 
Study the mechanism of various extraction processes and the 
screening of several new extracting agents. Research the 
thermodynamics and dynamics of the recycling of scrap mixed 
metals. 
  5) Recycling Waste Plastics 
  a) Study new technology and equipment for preprocessing 
waste 
plastics. This includes technology and equipment for sorting 
miscellaneous waste plastic materials, technology and equipment 
for crushing, cleaning, and drying waste plastics, and 
developing key technology and equipment for preprocessing and 
gradually diffusing such technology and equipment. 
  b) Develop a complete set of equipment for recovery, 
recycling, and utilization. Evaluate, select, and redesign 
recycling machinery, both domestic and foreign. By the year 2000 
we must come up with a complete set of recycling equipment and 
recycling unit for mixed plastics suited to China's conditions. 
  c) Study the chemical thermal decomposition method and other 
recycling methods. Popularize the polystyrene and organic glass 
thermal decomposition reduction method. Other methods should be 
developed for plastics not suited to the chemical thermal 
decomposition reduction method, such as incineration. Treat them 
as a fuel and hence a source of thermal energy. 
  6) Technology for Recycling Used Rubber and Retreading Old 
Tires 
  a) Research on and application of rubber recycling 
technology 
By the year 2000 we should have developed new technology to 
replace the water-oil method and oil method. At present rubber 
recycling is dependent on backward technology and causes serious 
pollution. That must be changed. Continue research on a new oil 
method, mechanization method, compression method, and 
plasticization at low temperatures or room temperatures, and 
complete their industry-wide application. Complete research on 
and popularize recycling technology for butadiene-styrene 
rubber, maleic rubber, and chloroprene rubber in used synthetic 
rubber. By the year 2020 the microwave method, dephasing method, 
and other directional jiaoliu techniques should be put into 
industrial use and popularized. Complete research on and 
popularization of the recycling technique for used rubber 
plastics products. 
  b) Research on the production of waste rubber powder and 
utilization methods By the year 2000 we should have completed 
research on rubber powder, the transformation of rubber powder, 
rubber powder surface treatment, and the production of 
extra-fine rubber powder. Increase the uses of rubber powder, 
for example, as a full substitute for recycled rubber and in 
conjunction with plastics, asphalt, or other materials. Complete 
research on the production and uses of extra-fine rubber powder 
by the year 2020. 
  c) Technology for processing used rubber using chemical 
thermal decomposition method. Used rubber is broken down into 
monomers, then polymerized into recycled rubber. The gases and 
liquids produced can be used as fuel and as a source of chemical 
industrial raw materials. 
  d) Develop a complete set of technology to make the kinds of 
recycled tires China is not making at present. Develop a 
complete technology to recycle heavy-duty construction tires, 
radial tires, and airplane tires. Conduct research on new 
technology and new equipment for tire recycling, including the 
quantitative pressurized tire surface recycling method and 
flexible mold recycling technology. 
  e) Research non-destructive testing equipment Learning from 
advanced foreign technology and prototypes, we should develop 
the balancing machine, far-infrared ray tester, reflectoscope, 
and tire roller tester to replace the current testing methods, 
which rely on eye observation and experience exclusively. 
  7) Research Recycling Technology for Used Chemical Fibers 
  Before and after 2000 we should import from nations like 
Germany and France large-scale mechanized loosening equipment 
and technology for processing used chemical fibers. Learning 
from their advanced experiences and assimilating their 
technology and equipment, we should then develop large, 
mid-sized, and small loosening equipment and the accompanying 
technology that is suited to China's specific conditions and 
highly automated, gives a steady performance, and produces 
good-quality chemical fibers. The technology should be 
popularized. Research new comprehensive utilization technology 
for waste chemical fibers and study ways of using different 
grades of loosened fibers to make adhesive-bonded fabrics, 
adhesive bonded blankets, double-knits, and a variety of 
fillings. Develop multiple processing technology for waste 
chemical fibers. Use chemical processing methods and adopt 
different chemical de-polymerization methods. Use production 
units like waste nylon and waste dylon (polyester fiber). Make 
every effort to complete industrial testing and gradually 
diffuse the technology by the end of this century. 
  8) Recycling Technology for Used and Old Glass 
  a) Research on special equipment and technology for 
recovering and recycling old and used glass. Includes: sorting 
technology for old and used glass. Methods of collection, 
storage, and transportation. Special instruments and equpment. 
  b) Explore new ways of using old and used glass. Research 
and 
popularize new technology for utilizing crushed glass directly 
in road construction and the manufacturing of building 
materials. New technology and corresponding equipment for using 
crushed glass to make glass fibers, wall tiles, cellular glass, 
floating beads and other value-added products. Study the various 
mechanisms involved in the recycling of crushed glass. 
  9) Research on the Comprehensive Utilization Technology of 
Powdered Coal Ash Focus before the year 2000: R&amp;D of the 
methods 
of processing and utilizing powdered coal ash, notably the 
following: road construction, mine backfilling, development zone 
backfilling, and the manufacturing of agricultural fertilizers. 
Pay special attention to the pollution threat posed by powdered 
coal ash to groundwater in the backfilling process and research 
its bearing capacity. Explore ways of using high-penetration 
powdered coal ash in cement and concrete. Research powdered coal 
ash sorting technology and utilization-by-grade technology. Sort 
powdered coal ash into floating beads, glass micro-beads, 
magnetic powder, and good-quality fine ash. By the year 2020 we 
should have developed new technology for the comprehensive 
utilization of powdered coal ash and valuable metals recovered 
from powdered coal ash. 
<H5>  Oceans </H5>
  The ocean has immense impact on human existence and 
development. Every country in the world is scrambling to study 
the ocean from the political, economic, military, and ecological 
perspectives, adjusting its strategy, boosting its maritime 
power, and pressing ahead with oceanic exploration in order to 
consolidate its maritime stature and secure maximum maritime 
rights and interests. 
  In the wake of S&amp;T advances, our growing appreciation 
of the 
ocean, and the endless discoveries of its strategic resources 
since the end of World War II, man's perception of the value of 
the ocean and its strategic position has changed profoundly. 
There has been an on-going struggle over maritime rights and 
interests and oceanic resources. On the other hand, the 
exploitation of the ocean has made rapid strides since the 
1960's. The maritime economy assumes growing importance in the 
world economy, fueling the all-round development of 
oceanography. Oceanographic engineering has become an important 
field in the new technological revolution. 
  China ranks among the world's leading maritime nations. 
Under 
the United Nations Maritime Convention, the maritime space over 
which China exercises jurisdiction (including its territorial 
waters, the continental shelf, and exclusive economic zone) is 
equivalent to one-third of the nation's land area. China's 
maritime space is superb in both geographical location and 
climatic conditions. It also teems with abundant biological 
resources, oil, natural gas, and other resources. 
  China faces a glorious but arduous task in safeguarding its 
maritime rights and interests, exploiting its oceanic resources, 
and protecting the maritime ecology. We must rouse ourselves and 
enhance our marine consciousness; rely on S&amp;T progress to 
increase our overall ability to exploit and utilize the ocean, 
to monitor, to forecast, to manage, and to protect; increase the 
economic and social benefits derived from the ocean; and improve 
the marine ecology, thereby strengthening China's standing and 
role in international maritime affairs. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  Development Strategy. For many years to come China's 
maritime 
development and management should focus on the coast and the 
maritime space over which it exercises jurisdiction, while 
developing the open sea beyond the littoral zone as appropriate. 
Give priority to the development of aquaculture, maritime 
transportation, and the off-shore oil and natural gas industry. 
Develop high-tech oceanic industries selectively. This being our 
strategic concept, we have arrived at the following guiding 
thought for the development of our marine S&amp;T: Plan 
comprehensively, develop the priorities, achieve breakthroughs 
where they count, enhance our power. Development goals: 
Intensify and deepen our investigation of the environment in the 
maritime space under China's jurisdiction and our search for 
resources there, complete a number of applied research projects, 
and prepare basic maps drawn to small and medium scale on the 
maritime space under China's jurisdiction. Develop oceanic 
technology in common use as well as technology essential to the 
exploitation of the ocean; establish a number of high-tech 
marine industries. Complete the stereo-marine monitoring network 
and a host of technical systems. Enhance our ability to monitor 
and protect the marine environment, to make forecasts about it, 
and to prevent maritime disasters. That way China may find 
itself among the leaders in the world in terms of the overall 
standard of marine S&amp;T. 
  Before the year 2000 we need to modernize our methods of 
marine surveying, monitoring, and experimentation. We need to 
improve across the board the technology for the comprehensive 
development of the coast and major estuaries. Complete the 
making of basic maps and the compilation of other data 
indispensable to delimiting the boundaries of the maritime space 
under Chinese jurisdiction, its continental shelf, and its 
exclusive economic zone, to exploiting the ocean, and to 
protecting and managing comprehensively the marine environment. 
The overall maritime power of the nation should match the best 
in the world as of the late 1980's, and in some areas even 
approaching or reaching advanced world standards prevailing at 
the time. 
  By the year 2020, we must have set up and perfected a stereo 
oceanic monitoring network and miscellaneous technological 
systems and become part of the international network, met the 
various technical requirements laid down in the general 
objectives, and enhanced our capacity for oceanic development 
and oceanographic engineering design, being able to produce the 
equipment that we need. We must further close our gap with the 
advanced nations in the world and become a global leader in yet 
more areas. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technology 
  To achieve the above strategic goals, we must concentrate 
our 
resources on achieving some breakthroughs based on the reality 
in China. Accordingly the following major S&amp;T tasks have been 
planned: 
  -- Acquire a thoroughly clear idea of the environment of 
China's maritime space and the magnitude of its resources. 
  -- Complete the development of various marine maps and the 
compilation of other marine data essential to delimiting the 
boundaries of the maritime space, the continental shelf, and the 
exclusive economic zone under China's jurisdiction, and ensuring 
maritime safety. Further the exploitation of marine resources. 
  -- Establish the infrastructure and assorted technical 
systems indispensable to marine monitoring, forecasting, 
protection, and management. 
  -- Develop the technology needed for oceanic exploitation, 
underwater engineering technology, and other important basic 
technologies. 
  These major tasks include the following research topics and 
principal technological targets: 
  1) Surveying China's Maritime Space and Ocean Map-Making 
  Disasters strike frequently in China's territorial waters 
and 
the neighboring oceans. They also are a hotbed of rivalry for 
maritime rights and interests as well as a focus of China's push 
for oceanic development. At present it is a scarcely researched 
area as far as China is concerned. There are no systematic, 
coherent, and reliable basic data, maps, or diagrams. 
Accordingly, we must: 
  a) Conduct a comprehensive study on the continental shelf 
and 
exclusive economic zone (including the maritime space under 
China's jurisdiction and outlying seas). 
  b) Conduct a comprehensive survey on the islands and launch 
a 
detailed study on the coast, the estuaries of major rivers, 
gulfs and bays. 
  c) Prepare maps on the maritime space under the nation's 
jurisdiction. 
  d) Conduct special surveys on designated oceanic zones and 
the two poles. 
  Launch a detailed study on the continental shelf and 
exclusive economic zone and begin prospecting for resources 
before 2000. Complete the study on coastal islands. Complete 
mapping the key parts of the oceans and develop a host of basic 
oceanic maps and a body of data that is urgently needed (scale: 
continental shelf, 1:500,000; outlying seas, 1:1,000,000) to 
meet the basic requirements of resource exploitation and 
management in the continental shelf and exclusive economic zone. 
Before the year 2020 we should continue to step up and deepen 
marine surveys and map-making, produce all the necessary basic 
maps and compile all the basic data on the maritime space under 
China's jurisdiction. Systematize the publication of all basic 
maps and data pertaining to the neighboring seas. 
  2) Technologies for Monitoring the Ocean and Forecasting 
Oceanic Disasters 
  a) Develop marine remote-sensing technology. Establish a 
stereo oceanic monitoring and disaster surveillance system based 
on oceanic, space, and aerial remote-sensing and underwater 
acoustic detection. Complete the network of coastal and island 
observation stations, realize the automation of the observation 
of major elements and data processing before the year 2000, with 
unmanned auxiliary vessels performing observations 
automatically. Put together the rudiments of a near-shore buoy 
observation network. Research maritime satellite remote-sensing 
systems, including the satellite-carried sensor, the 
transmission and reception system for remote-sensing data, and 
applied satellite technical system. Increase the number of 
remote-sensing aircraft and land-based remote-sensing 
observation stations. Put together the rudiments of a stereo 
oceanic surveillance and monitoring system to track marine 
disasters effectively. Perfect the forecasting and forewarning 
system for the marine environment and marine disasters as well 
as an ocean information and data service system in order to 
bring China's overall capacity for analysis, forecasting, and 
services to the advanced level in the world at the time. After 
the year 2000, expand the underwater buoy system and increase 
the number of underwater acoustic detection installations to 
achieve on-going underwater surveillance. Establish a stereo 
ocean monitoring system that combines underwater observation 
with sea-level and land-based remote sensing observation and 
space remote-sensing. China's oceanic environment and disaster 
forewarning and forecasting technology should match the best in 
the world and the country should develop the ability to provide 
high-standard services for the western Pacific and in oceans 
around the world. 
  b) Technology to forecast and forewarn disastrous weather on 
the sea and poor oceanic conditions. Develop and perfect before 
the year 2000 a long- , mid-, and short-range forecasting model 
based on numerical value diagnosis and analysis and numerical 
value forecasting, supplemented by a host of other forewarning 
methods. Develop a range of forewarning products to meet the 
requirements of disaster warning and oceanic development. 
Develop a forewarning service network and put together a marine 
disaster forewarning system that should be uniform all over the 
nation. Develop technology and equipment for rescue operations, 
disaster prevention, and disaster relief at sea and near shore. 
Before the year 2020 continue to improve forewarning technology. 
Step up long-range weather forecasting research and conduct such 
forecasting. Establish a real-time response-type marine 
monitoring, forecasting, and forewarning information 
transmission system. Establish a disaster prevention and 
disaster relief technical system. 
  c) Develop marine data and information technology. Create an 
automated marine information processing and service system. 
Create a marine environmental and rescue data base before 2000. 
Develop marine data service products. Develop a body of marine 
information methods and models. Nurture a pool of experts. We 
should put all marine data under one roof before the year 2020, 
creating a data storage, processing, and service system, a 
user-friendly modern information system. 
  3) Technology for Prevention and Treatment of Oceanic 
Pollution and Ecological Protection Technology 
  a) Technology to monitor oceanic pollution. Improve the 
existing pollution monitoring technology before the year 2000. 
Research and develop new technology and new methods to monitor 
pollution. Work hard to develop aerial remote-sensing monitoring 
and buoy monitoring technology. Automate pollution monitoring in 
particular. Put together the basic framework of a stereo oceanic 
pollution monitoring system. 
  b) Technology to prevent and tackle oceanic pollution 
disasters. Before 2000 we should concentrate on the research of 
technology and equipment for preventing and controlling oil 
spills and restoring the environment that is suited to China's 
coastal waters. Develop highly effective new methods for 
preventing and treating organic pollutants. Launch studies on 
the prevention and control of nutrients in near-shore waters. 
Develop red tide forecasting, control, and eradication 
technology. Make a major effort before the year 2000 to research 
and develop the theory, method, and technology pertaining to the 
preservation of the ecological balance in the oceans, 
tentatively realizing a ``benign circle'' in the ecology in the 
maritime space under China's jurisdiction. 
  c) Establish a management model and standards for the marine 
environment. Before 2000 develop a model which balances the 
environmental capacity of China's coastal waters with the 
quantity and quality of pollutants discharged into the sea. 
Establish a water-quality management model for each body of 
water; take the first steps toward quantifying environmental 
management in coastal waters. Perfect marine environmental 
qualitative and quantitative standards. Study oceanic dumping 
technology. Examine the comprehensive functions of China's 
territorial waters. Complete the regionalization of China's 
territorial waters by function. Continue to improve the 
above-mentioned models and standards before the year 2020 so 
that Chinese oceanic environmental management can keep up with 
the demands of oceanic development at the time. 
  d) Nature protection in the oceans. Before 2000 we must 
equip 
ourselves with a clear, if preliminary, idea of the species of 
rare and endangered plants and animals in China's territorial 
waters, their population size, as well as their biological and 
environmental characteristics. We must formulate laws and 
regulations to save and protect marine life on the verge of 
extinction and come up with the technical measures to bring 
about resource restoration. We must restore endangered marine 
resources back to a level capable of supporting appropriate 
exploitation before the year 2020. 
  4) Technology To Exploit Marine Biological Resource 
  a) Develop aquaculture technology. Includes: new breeds and 
varieties. High-efficiency and low-cost mixed feeds. Prevention 
and treatment of plant diseases. The agriculture- and animal 
husbandry-oriented experiment in Bohai. The comprehensive 
development and utilization of biological energy resources and 
nutrients. Before 2000 aquaculture technology must on the whole 
have advanced enough to meet the technical requirements of 
increase-in-yield targets, even approaching or matching the best 
in the world in the case of some varieties. Before 2020 
biotechnology must be used to improve a host of fine varieties 
of fish, shrimp, shellfish, and aquatic plants. Establish 
automated factory-style aquatic production systems. Fishing in 
Bohai should begin to be operated like agriculture or animal 
husbandry. 
  b) Offshore fishery resources protection technology and 
deep-sea fishery development technology. Includes: variety 
breeding technology and artificial release technology. Study and 
evaluate deep-sea fishery resources and the environment of the 
fishing grounds. Technology for preserving offshore fishery 
resources, increasing their value, and managing them. Check the 
trend of declining offshore fishery resources before 2000, 
gradually restoring the amount of some aquatic resources to back 
to their previous levels. Deep-sea fishing technology must meet 
the requirements of increase-in-yield targets by and large. The 
technology for preserving, increasing the value of, and managing 
offshore fishery resources must reach or approach advanced world 
standards, accompanied by considerable progress in deep-sea 
fishing technology. 
  c) Technology to tap natural medicinal resources in the 
oceans. Conduct research on anti-cancer and anti-cardiovascular 
disease drugs and their extraction technology. Develop 
technology to extract toxin from marine organisms. Develop a 
host of new drugs derived from the ocean before the year 2000. 
Before 2020, develop more efficient drugs based on existing 
technology. 
  5) Marine Mineral Resources Prospecting and Extraction 
Technology 
  a) Develop off-shore petroleum and natural gas prospecting 
and recovery technology. Before 2020, import, absorb, and 
assimilate advanced foreign technology and make innovations on 
it to come up with China's own offshore petroleum and natural 
gas prospecting and recovery technology and equipment. Broaden 
the area of application of domestic equipment. Step up 
theoretical studies on the search for petroleum. Raise oil field 
comprehensive development level. Provide basic data on off-shore 
petroleum and natural gas reserves and preliminary services in 
order to increase oil and natural gas output. Before 2020, 
establish a system of offshore petroleum and gas prospecting and 
recovery technology that is practical and has Chinese 
characteristics. 
  b) Develop coastal placer mining technology. Modernize 
coastal placer mining technology and equipment before the year 
2000 by transforming the collection method and taking the first 
steps toward mechanized production. Further the extent of 
automation. Press on with technological transformation before 
2020 and provide the necessary technology to meet increase in 
output targets. Step up the search for and mining of ore 
urgently needed in China. 
  c) Examine deep-sea mineral resources and develop technology 
for the preliminary phase of prospecting. Before 2000 we should 
survey deep-sea mineral resources in the more important areas of 
the oceans. Improve prospecting technology and equipment. 
Research and develop deep-sea mining equipment. Intensify 
research on environmental disasters in oceanic development zones 
and work extra hard to come up with solutions. Experimental 
mining should be launched before 2020 provided we are fully 
prepared. 
  6) Sea Water Resources Exploitation and Utilization 
Technology 
  a) Technology for the direct utilization of sea water. Study 
technology for the direct cooling of sea water and related 
technology. Popularize sea water cooling technology in power 
plants and chemical industrial enterprises along the coast. 
Diffuse such technology widely along the coast before 2020. 
Develop other technologies for the direct utilization of sea 
water. 
  b) Sea water (salt water) desalination technology and 
applied 
basic research. Focus on the development of reverse osmosis 
desalination technology. Improve the electrodialysis 
desalination technology. Develop distillation desalination as 
appropriate. Research and develop high-performance 
electrodialysis ion exchange membrane and reverse osmosis 
membrane. Develop 10,000-ton reverse osmosis desalination 
equipment and 1,000-ton distillation desalination equipment; we 
should aim to be able to design and manufacture an entire 
100,000-ton electrodialysis water-making plant and 10,000-ton 
distillation desalination equipment before the year 2000. 
Develop high-efficiency and energy-efficient sea water 
desalination technology before 2020, thus lowering the costs of 
water-manufacturing and basically creating a desalination 
industry. 
  c) Sea water chemical resources extraction technology and 
applied basic research. Before 2000: Conduct experiments in the 
comprehensive utilization of sea water technology and common 
element extraction continuing production technology. Launch 
research on trace element extraction. Before 2000 (as 
published): Lower extraction costs, further expand the scale of 
production, and establish demonstration factories for sea water 
common element extraction. 
  7) Oceanographic Engineering and Technology 
  a) Oceanographic engineering. Before 2000: Concentrate on 
the 
development of gulfs and bays and that of coastal and offshore 
engineering technology essential to the recovery of petroleum 
and natural gas in coastal waters; on studies on the oceanic 
environment in the early stages of a project and the 
environmental impact of a project. Before 2020: Initiate 
research on deep-sea engineering and technology and conduct 
exploratory research on such engineering projects as the 
construction of underwater tunnels and ocean-floor dumping 
grounds. 
  b) Research and develop the bathyscaphe. Before 2000: 
Research and develop the 600-meter close-observation and 
professional bathyscaphe. Research 600-meter-deep bathyscaphe 
and related technology and theories. Research underwater 
robotics. Before 2020: Research 600-meter deep observation type 
bathyscaphe and professional-grade bathyscaphe. 
  c) Underwater detection technology. Before 2000: Concentrate 
our resources on developing underwater power positioning 
systems, underwater buoy systems, underwater data base and image 
transmission systems, remote control systems, high-precision 
multi-beam acoustic depth finder, Doppler cross-section current 
measuring systems, and a variety of sample tools in an all-out 
effort to reach or surpass the international standard of the 
1980's, even matching the best the world can offer at the time. 
Before 2020: Strive for breakthroughs in underwater remote 
measurement technology, remote control technology, and acoustic 
bedding analysis technology. 
  d) Develop saturated diving technology. Before 2000: Make 
300-meter saturated diving technology usable. Improve simulated 
testing equipment and create a coherent system including the 
diving vehicle, surface support system, and underwater life 
maintenance system. Develop a multi-function power positioning 
type of saturated aqua-nautical diving vessel. Step up research 
on diving physiology and medicine. 
  e) Develop tools and equipment for working underwater and 
power source technology. Before 2000: Develop sea water 
hydraulic technology. Research and develop sea water hydraulic 
power equipment. Research and develop underwater engineering 
tools for such processes as welding and cutting. Research and 
develop sea-floor pipe-laying technology. Before 2020: Further 
improve and develop underwater engineering tools and power 
sources. 
  8) Basic Research 
  a) Research on marine hydro-physics and sea water dynamics 
measured by every scale. Conduct oceanographic studies on 
China's neighboring seas. Research the impact of the kuroshio on 
China's climatic conditions in coastal waters and near shore. 
Research on ocean-atmosphere interactions, marine disasters, sea 
level changes and comprehensive studies on the North Pole, South 
Pole, and surrounding waters. 
  b) Marine biology research. Research on marine productive 
forces and nutritional physiology in coastal and near-shore 
waters. Research on ways of using the ocean for agriculture or 
animal husbandry. Marine ecosystem research and marine 
biotechnology. 
  c) Marine geology research. Research on the principles of 
evolution governing the geologic structure in coastal near-shore 
waters and petroleum- and natural-gas-bearing basin. Research on 
the theories of sea floor expansion and plate movements. 
Oceanographic engineering geology research. 
  d) Marine chemistry research. Studies on the laws of 
migration and changes of pollutants in the oceanic environment. 
Studies on various surface chemical fluxes. Basic theoretical 
research on the extraction of marine chemical resources. 
  e) Oceanographic engineering research. Research on the 
mechanisms of oceanographic engineering dynamic factors, 
research on interactions between oceanographic engineering and 
the oceanic environment, diving physiology research, satellite 
oceanography, deep-sea oceanography, and military oceanography. 
<H5>  Ecological Environmental Protection and Prevention of </H5>
Natural Disasters 
  Protecting the environment, preserving the ecological 
balance, preventing pollution from endangering human health, and 
reducing natural disasters are vital matters impacting all 
economic and social development. They are basic work essential 
to achieving the mid- and long-term economic and social 
development strategy. The Chinese government attaches a good 
deal of importance to this and considers it a basic national 
policy. Continuing the remarkably effective work that has been 
done is an important guarantee of realizing the strategic 
objectives of China's economic and social development. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  Ecological Environmental Protection 
  To keep China's ecological environment in harmony with 
sustained economic and social development, we must make a mighty 
effort to develop S&amp;T in the field of ecology and 
environmental 
protection, rally and attract even more S&amp;T workers to 
contribute to the cause of environmental protection, work hard 
to create the conditions, enhance our research capability and 
technical standard, provide even more S&amp;T support for the 
achievement of the short-range goal, which basically involves 
bringing China's environmental pollution under control, 
improving the environmental quality in key cities, and slowing 
the trend toward the degradation of the natural environment 
before the year 2000, and ultimately realize the long-term goal, 
namely, a benign cycle of a clean, attractive, and tranquil 
urban and rural environment. 
  1) Development Strategy 
  a) Rely on policy guidelines and legal management. Work hard 
to develop production technologies and processes that are 
energy- and resource-efficient and that cause little or no 
pollution in order to meet the requirements of the 
transformation of agricultural and industrial technology taking 
place in China right now and to expedite that transformation. As 
far as production technology and processes that confer 
environmental and economic benefits are concerned, we must step 
up their R&amp;D and do everything we could to bring them to 
fruition and popularize them by the year 2000. Select another 
batch of such technologies for further development before the 
year 2020, combining our own research with international 
cooperation, our own manufactured products with imports. 
  b) Actively research technology for turning refuse into 
resources. Maximize China's level of energy and resource 
utilization, ease the burden of resource shortages, and take 
advantage of the conversion of what is bad into what is good, 
waste into treasure. Before 2000: Our research priorities should 
be industrial water reutilization and making resources out of 
waste waster and solid wastes discharged during the industrial 
production process, striving for notable gains by 2000. 
  c) Actively launch research on individual pieces of 
pollution 
control technology that are highly-efficient, low-consumption, 
and widely applicable as well as technology for the prevention 
and treatment of pollution on a regional scale to provide a 
technical support system for the drive to quickly improve 
China's environmental quality. Before 2000: Focus on industries 
that still lack coordinated pollution treatment technology, 
particularly those that cause serious pollution, so as to fill 
the gap in the lineup of technologies. Continue to develop 
high-efficiency, low-consumption technology that can solve a 
large number of widespread pollution problems. When it comes to 
tackling regional pollution, we should emphasize the development 
and judicious utilization of transitional technology that 
integrates natural purification processes. The idea is to get 
the best result for the least cost. As our economic strength 
increases after 2000, we will seek to raise the level of 
man-made treatment gradually. 
  d) Vigorously develop technology to help restore areas that 
have been ecologically damaged as well as technology that would 
bring about a good benign cycle in agriculture. Choose 
representative areas properly. Apply multiple technological 
approaches depending on the natural conditions and ecological 
requirements at any one particular locality, thereby providing 
effective technical support for ecological construction in China. 
  e) Initiate research on the relations between natural 
climatic changes, on the one hand, and the greenhouse effect and 
deforestation, on the other. Study the impact on climate of the 
construction of large dams and the diversion of river water from 
the south to the north. Further study the effects of climatic 
changes on the ecological environment and social development. 
Investigate the consequences of ozone depletion. 
  f) Step up R&amp;D on ecological and environmental 
monitoring 
technology and equipment. Work hard to raise China's monitoring 
standard so that environmental monitoring can play an expanded 
role in reflecting China's environmental quality and supervisory 
and managerial functions. 
  g) Redouble efforts to foster environmental protection 
industries. Work hard to make environmental protection equipment 
more coordinated and more standardized, forming part of a set. 
Improve product quality as well as the quality of technical 
services. Strive to improve technological design and equipment 
manufacturing in environmental protection industries and their 
technological standards. 
  h) Intensify basic environmental research and strengthen its 
ties with related disciplines, gradually perfecting a body of 
Chinese environmental sciences. 
  i) Strengthen soft science research. Raise the standard of 
ecological and environmental management in China. Make 
environmental management policy-making more scientific and 
democratic. Deepen public appreciation of the environment and 
enhance its ability to transform the environment and participate 
in environmental protection. 
  j) Expedite the conversion of S&amp;T achievements into 
production. Raise the conversion rate of the achievements of 
environmental science and technology into productive forces. 
Shorten the conversion cycle. 
  2) Strategic Objectives 
  a) By the year 2000: Agriculture and industry in China must 
go all out to match the production technology of their 
counterparts in developed nations typical of the late 1970's and 
early 1980's by the following yardsticks: yield per unit energy, 
resource consumption per unit output, and the amount of their 
pollutants, which would mean cutting by more than half the real 
consumption of energy and resources as well as the amount of 
pollutants discharged today. 
  b) Comprehensive utilization technology for wastes should 
reach or match world standards, as should pollution treatment 
technology. The amount of solid waste, waste water, and waste 
gases--the ``three wastes''--discharged by large and mid-sized 
enterprises should meet emission standards set by the locality 
in question. 
  c) Establish a specified number of specialized 
national-level 
laboratories that are open to the whole nation and meet the 
standards of comparable laboratories in developed nations in the 
1980's. Also set up a number of representative ecological 
improvement and pollution control laboratories or experimental 
points in a host of localities in accordance with the long-term 
requirements of China's ecological environment. 
  d) Set up a national-level dynamic climate laboratory 
without 
delay to build a climate forecasting model and conduct 
greenhouse effect research. These undertakings should form the 
basis of a weather forecasting system. Establish a climate and 
pollution baseline monitoring network, stations that monitor the 
effects of climate on the ecology, and an ecological monitoring 
network. 
  e) As far as basic research is concerned, we should double 
our ability to track cutting-edge research in the world. We 
should enhance our ability to develop environmental S&amp;T 
substantially on a sustained basis. There should be broad 
improvements in the caliber of S&amp;T personnel, with some of 
them 
achieving world-class standards in research ability. 
  By the year 2020, we must have done everything possible to 
push agricultural and industrial production technology to a new 
level as far as lowering resource and energy consumption and 
cutting the amount of pollutants discharged are concerned. Large 
and mid-sized enterprises shall reach international standards. 
Further improvements shall have been made in the technology for 
turning wastes into resources and disposing of such wastes. We 
should have established several ecological and environmental 
laboratories oriented toward opening to the outside world. We 
should be significantly more adept at absorbing advanced foreign 
S&amp;T. The standard of the construction of the model ecological 
and environmental and pollution control zones will improve 
steadily even as such zones are gradually replicated nationwide. 
By the year 2020 we should basically have paved the way 
scientifically and technologically for the creation of a benign 
cycle in China's ecological environment. 
<H5>  Prevention of Natural Disasters </H5>
  1) Development Strategy 
  a) Push for all-round S&amp;T advances in the three links of 
disaster forecasting, disaster prevention, and disaster relief. 
In accordance with the operational principles of ``prevention 
first'' and ``combining prevention with relief,'' we should 
focus on intensifying research on natural disaster forecasting 
and prevention theories, methods, and technology, particularly 
major and sudden disasters, while we master disaster relief 
technology and policies. 
  b) Strengthen the monitoring system. Monitoring is the 
cornerstone of the scientific study of natural disasters, 
particularly the study of forecasting and forewarning. 
Accordingly, we must set up in prime natural disaster monitoring 
areas a monitoring, information, and feedback system that is 
guided by scientific theories and based on high tech. This is 
the starting point of improving natural disaster forecasting. 
  c) Tackle new methods and new technologies in forecasting 
and 
forewarning as the most urgent topics in disaster prevention 
science. Continuously deepen our research. They are critical to 
advances in the development of disaster prevention science. 
Moreover, apply new technologies and new achievements in related 
fields to disaster prevention science research, refining and 
innovating on them constantly. 
  d) Launch multi-disciplinary comprehensive research. Tackle 
research jointly with cooperation between industries and 
sectors. Expand the scope of research of disaster prevention 
science regularly. Strengthen research on disaster forecasting, 
relief operations, and disaster sociology both vertically and 
horizontally and heighten our ability to prevent and ameliorate 
natural disasters across the board. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  By the year 2000 we should have basically completed the 
technological transformation and modernization of the major 
natural disaster monitoring, information, and experimentation 
systems and markedly heightened our ability to monitor and 
respond promptly to major natural disasters. We should have 
gained fresh and ground-breaking understanding of their origins 
and their developmental process, improved the theory and method 
of forecasting and forewarning noticeably, and raised the rate 
of accurate forecasting significantly. The idea is to research 
and develop practical disaster prevention and relief technology 
and enhance China's disaster prevention capabilities overall so 
that there will be a significant drop in the magnitude of human 
and economic losses that any major natural disaster can inflict 
upon China. 
  By the year 2020 there should have been substantial 
breakthroughs in monitoring methods and technology, with an 
advanced experimentation system based on high-tech and 
consisting of world-class monitoring, information, and feedback 
systems already in place. We should have set up some objective 
quantified forewarning systems for certain natural disasters, 
which will clearly enhance our forewarning ability. A mighty 
effort will have been made to develop China's capability to 
forecast certain major and sudden natural disasters effectively. 
There should be remarkable or ground-breaking progress in our 
understanding of the causes of certain major natural disasters. 
Advanced disaster prevention and disaster relief technology will 
be diffused and adopted to minimize the human casualties and 
economic losses that China may sustain from a major natural 
disaster. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technology 
  Ecological and Environmental Protection 
  1) Intensify Research on Technology To Prevent and Treat 
Environmental Pollution Occurring during Urbanization 
  Step up research on industrial production processes and 
technology that are energy- and resource-efficient and discharge 
few or no pollutants. Drastically reduce the amount of solid 
waste, waste water, and waste gases, otherwise known as the 
``three wastes,'' discharged by large and mid-sized enterprises 
per unit of output. 
  Step up research on technology to turn industrial wastes 
into 
resources and utilize them comprehensively. Work hard to raise 
the recycling rate of industrial wastes and the percentage of 
waste water and garbage that are turned into resources. 
  Intensify research on industrial waste water treatment 
technology, taking extra care to develop technology to treat 
industrial waste water (such as that produced by paper mills, 
textile printing factories, and pharmaceutical enterprises) 
currently being discharged in large quantities in numerous 
places. Since there is presently no mature treatment technology 
for industrial waste water, we must come up with new methods to 
fill this void in the line-up of industrial pollution treatment 
technologies. Develop high-efficiency and energy-efficient waste 
water treatment technology in a way that takes into account 
local conditions. Develop technologies for recovering 
bio-energetic waste water and processing mud. 
  Intensify research on China's urban drainage system 
planning. 
Resolve the problem relating to the use of the sewer system in a 
confluence system. Further improve and popularize the urban 
sewage system. Develop technology that would combine industrial 
waste water with urban domestic sewage for treatment purposes. 
Promote the centralized biological treatment of industrial waste 
water which is pre-treated in the plant, and domestic sewage. In 
water-deficient areas, step up the research of technology that 
would recycle urban waste water for use in industry, 
agriculture, irrigation, and urban landscaping, thereby opening 
up a second water source. Where the necessary conditions are in 
place, we should continue to research bio-stabilizing pond 
treatment and land treatment technology for waste water as well 
as the technology for discharging waste water into seas and 
rivers. Utilize the environment's own self-cleansing ability 
properly. 
  Step up research on technology to treat industrial gases and 
auto exhaust fumes, urban centralized heating technology, molded 
coal technology and technology to render industrial wastes 
harmless. Launch research on technology for the comprehensive 
utilization of urban garbage and technology for rendering it 
harmless. Develop and disseminate technology to prevent urban 
noise pollution. 
  2) Step Up Research on Rural Environmental Pollution 
Prevention and Treatment Technology and Technology on 
Agricultural Ecological Improvement 
  Initiate research on technology to prevent and treat 
environmental pollution caused by township enterprises. In light 
of their economic conditions, develop a host of simple, easily 
applicable technologies for those industrial enterprises (such 
as small paper mills and small chemical industrial enterprises) 
that exist in large numbers and are geographically widespread 
and that cause serious pollution to solve the current rapid 
degradation of the rural environment. 
  Step up R&amp;D of pesticides that are low in toxicity, 
highly 
effective, and harmless as well as research on biological 
control technology to solve one of the problems facing the 
countryside today--the pollution of the agricultural ecological 
environment caused by the widespread use of chemical pesticides. 
To prevent chemical pesticide pollution, our urgent priority now 
is to set standards for pesticide use and strictly limit the 
usage per unit area. Establish a system for the safe use of 
chemical pesticides to ensure the safety of both humans and 
animals. 
  Launch research on waste water irrigation technology. 
Develop 
scientific methods, quantitative limits, and standards for waste 
water irrigation. Strictly control water quality. Step up the 
tracking and monitoring of waste water irrigation. Prevent 
farmland pollution. 
  Launch research on the technology for the treatment and 
comprehensive utilization of waste water and waste residues 
discharged by large-scale aquatic farms under intensive 
management. 
  Develop a range of technologies to facilitate diversified 
operations in agriculture, forestry, animal husbandry, sideline 
production, and fishery that would fully utilize bio-energy, 
solar energy, and wind energy, and popularize them. Explore new 
ways to modernize agriculture. 
  Conduct research diligently on ways to irrigate different 
varieties of crops properly and scientifically. Develop 
water-saving agriculture and new agricultural irrigation 
technologies, constantly boosting the irrigation water 
coefficient. 
  3) Step Up Research on Ecological and Environmental 
Improvement Technology for Different Types of Ecological Zones 
and Nature Preserves 
  Launch research on ecological improvement technology in arid 
and semi-arid areas in order to curb the spreading 
desertification in the ``three north'' region and provide a 
support system for the drive to restore life to some desertified 
areas. 
  Conduct research on rebuilding the ecosystem in areas 
severely affected by soil erosion so as to reduce the land lost 
to soil erosion progressively year after year. 
  Conduct research on technology to protect, improve, and 
restore key economic zones and water conservation zones. 
  Conduct research on the technology for scientifically 
delimiting, effectively protecting, and soundly utilizing nature 
preserves as well as research on the artificial reproduction and 
breeding of rare endangered species, along with gene 
preservation technology. 
  Consider setting up an ecological and environmental 
indicator 
system. Research ecological monitoring, surveillance, and 
management. Complete the transition of ecological management 
from qualitative management to quantitative management over time. 
  4) Launch Research on the Impact of Environment Pollution on 
Human Health 
  In conjunction with life sciences, we should study the 
effects of trace biological elements in the environment on human 
health. 
  Examine the relationship between air pollution, particularly 
indoor air pollution, and diseases of the respiratory system, 
between drinking water contaminated by toxic chemical pollutants 
and biological pollutants and cancer of the digestive tract and 
cardiovascular diseases. 
  Launch studies to monitor the concentration levels of 
environmental pollutants inside the human body, paying close 
attention to the accumulation levels of harmful elements and 
organic pollutants inside the human body. Research the total 
amount of pollutants absorbed. Establish a human body material 
specimen pool. 
  Launch research on the forecasting and forewarning of 
diseases caused by environmental pollution. Monitor the outbreak 
of such diseases closely. Pay attention to the sudden outbreak 
and spreading of diseases caused by biological environmental 
pollution. Speed up research on measures to prevent poisoning 
incidents caused by environmental pollutants and procedures to 
rescue the victims of such emergencies. 
  Intensify research on the ecological effects and potential 
hazards of synthetic chemicals. 
  Develop a human health environmental sensitivity indicator 
to 
gauge the effects of environmental pollutants on human health at 
various levels, including biological monitoring, immunology, and 
genetics, at an early stage. 
  Step up research on environmental monitoring systems and 
quality assurance. Work hard to raise the level of environmental 
monitoring. 
  5) Increase Research on Soft Sciences Such as Ecological 
Planning and Environmental Standards. Work Hard To Raise the 
Standard of Ecological and Environmental Policy-Making and 
Management 
  Map out an ecological strategic plan for sustained economic 
and social development in China. Clearly lay out the path that 
would take us from the current gross imbalance between 
environment and economic development to balanced development. 
Decide upon a sound industrial structure and scale of operation 
as well as sensible methods of resource utilization, depending 
on a particular region's ecological environment and resource 
availability. 
  Examine ways of incorporating the environment and resources 
into the national economic statistical indicator system so that 
environmental and resource factors would be fully taken into 
consideration when major economic decisions or economic 
adjustments are being made. 
  Fully utilize modern S&amp;T to do an inventory of the 
nation's 
land resources, water resources, forest resources, and energy 
resources to obtain a clear idea of the current status of 
China's natural resources and how they are being utilized. 
Create a resource data base. Examine the macro regulatory and 
control mechanism of the aggregate demand placed by social and 
economic development on the aggregate supply of land, water, 
forestry, energy resources so as to develop an optimal model to 
provide a scientific basis for the proper utilization of natural 
resources. 
  Launch research on comprehensive land use planning. 
Establish 
a comprehensive land use planning system at each level. Set 
standards limiting the amount of land that can be devoted to 
non-agricultural uses. Effectively prevent non-agricultural 
projects from taking up land, especially farmland. 
  Step up research on the comprehensive treatment, planning, 
and management of drainage area (region) environments. Draw up a 
management plan for the rational development, comprehensive 
utilization, and fair distribution of water resources in 
drainage areas (regions). Work on drainage area (regional) water 
quality management planning, draw up district boundaries based 
on functions, and consider the factors of water quantity and 
water quality in their overall context. Develop a management 
plan for the comprehensive prevention and treatment of drainage 
area (regional) water pollution. In light of the functions of 
the body of water and the grade of its water quality, we should 
decide on a permissible load of pollutants, set overall emission 
standards for each major pollutant, and draw up a general 
pollution reduction plan. 
  Intensify research on developing a management model for 
major 
cities and large-scale groundwater sources. Develop the water 
resources properly while protecting water quality. Prevent the 
exhaustion of water resources, water pollution, water quality 
degradation, and other geological environmental problems caused 
by the improper exploitation of groundwater (such as subsidence, 
infiltration of sea water, and karst collapse). Step up research 
on the joint regulation of groundwater and surface water. 
  Launch research on function-based oceanic zoning. Customize 
management in light of the functions of a zone. Perfect oceanic 
environmental quality standards. Investigate the self-cleansing 
ability and environmental capacity of coastal waters. Research 
technology to control oceanic pollution and biological resource 
degradation. 
  Broaden research on the use of remote-sensing technology in 
environmental planning and resource surveying. Raise its 
application level. 
  Examine the natural resource utilization system and the 
prices of resources, with emphasis on the prices of water, land, 
and energy resources, and the issue of adjusting the prices of 
resources. Mobilize the enthusiasm of enterprises for energy and 
resource conservation and for reducing the amount of the three 
wastes discharged. 
  Launch research on environmental pollution control planning 
for cities, key economic zones, mining development areas, areas 
with developed township and town enterprises, and important 
river basins so as to bring a greater measure of rationality to 
the mix of industry, to the distribution of industry, and to 
ecological and environmental improvement. 
  Continue research on improving environmental quality 
standards and pollutant emission standards. Create a system of 
environmental standards based on restrictions on the total 
volume. Continue research on standards for resource consumption 
and emissions per unit of output. Tighten the management of 
resource consumption and emissions in industrial production. 
  Work out incentives and penalties as well as management 
regulations for the comprehensive treatment of the ``three 
wastes'' discharged by the industries. Formulate management 
regulations to protect land resources and vegetation in the 
extraction of mineral resources and the comprehensive 
utilization of wastes and discarded materials. 
  Launch research on the control of toxic wastes and toxic 
chemicals. The aim is to set up a registration and licensing 
system for toxic hazardous industrial wastes and toxic chemicals 
in the course of time that will regulate the entire process 
effectively from production and utilization to cleaning, 
transportation, and disposal. 
<H5>  Preventing Natural Disasters </H5>
  1. Step Up Research on Natural Disaster Monitoring 
Technology, Particularly Technology That Has Many Applications 
and Is Multi-Functional 
  Establish or improve an appropriate monitoring system to 
generate accurate and timely information about the origins and 
occurrence of a natural disaster. Improve the seismographic 
observation and experimentation system. We should research new 
observation and experimentation methods; research and develop 
new apparatus and equipment that would monitor the seismically 
active environment and collect seismic information more 
effectively; improve the monitoring system in leading seismic 
monitoring areas; apply high-tech and new technology to 
gradually achieve high-precision, high-density, digital and 
three-dimensional real time monitoring, and build a 
comprehensive laboratory to demonstrate simulated complex 
seismically active structure, dynamic conditions, and pre-quake 
signs. 
  Optimize the monitoring system for disaster-causing weather, 
climate, and flood. Research and develop a new generation of 
ground and air monitoring equipment, paying special attention to 
meteorological satellite remote-sensing and ground detection 
technology. The Doppler radar system, surface remote-sensing 
sounding system, surface laser radar, wind sound testing radar 
system, and other remote-sensing technologies should teach 
advanced world levels as of the 1980's. Accelerate the 
construction of a comprehensive remote-sensing detection system 
that is internationally advanced and a nation-wide network 
comprising numerous automated meteorological stations. Also 
create a network of rainstorm and flooding monitoring station 
network for key areas and a system for using planes to detect 
disastrous weather. 
  Develop oceanic remote sensing technology. Research and 
develop an oceanic satellite remote sensing technological 
system. Increase the number of remote-sensing planes for 
detailed observation in coastal waters and land-based remote 
sensing observation points. Gradually expand submerged buoy 
measuring technology and underwater acoustic detection equipment 
to achieve continuous underwater observation. Improve unmanned 
automated observation by monitoring stations along the coast and 
on islands and by auxiliary ships. Establish a three-dimensional 
oceanic disaster surveillance system based primarily on oceanic, 
space, and air remote-sensing, as well as underwater acoustic 
detection. 
  Armed with a preliminary understanding of the 
classification, 
causes, laws of distribution, and development trends of 
geological disasters, we should then begin active monitoring of 
the formation and development of sudden surface changes and 
other geologic disasters such as landslides, land-slips, and 
mud-rock flow affecting the mainstream of Chang Jiang, key 
arteries of transportation, major cities, major engineering 
projects, and economic development areas. 
  Step up the construction of a nationwide monitoring network 
against sudden major outbreaks of plant diseases and insect 
pests affecting crops and a grass-roots vegetation service 
system. Standardize the dynamic reporting and investigation of 
major outbreaks of plant diseases and insect pests nationwide. 
Launch research on the applied technology of using radar to 
detect and monitor major sudden pest disaster outbreaks. Raise 
the standard of monitoring. 
  Use meteorological satellite information to monitor forest 
fires and major plant diseases and insect pests in forests over 
a wide area. In the short haul, the pine moth, small pine moth, 
and other insect pests that affect a broad area and cause 
obvious damages as well as forest fires should be our primary 
monitoring targets. 
  2. Step Up Research on Natural Disaster Information 
Processing Technology and Create the Rudiments of a Natural 
Disaster Information System for the Nation. 
  Using the satellite, microwave, ultra-short wave, a national 
communications network, and other channels as well as advanced 
computer technology, we shall set up a national meteorological 
data base communications and processing network system and a 
two-level--national and provincial--seismic information network 
that combines fixed sites with mobility, thus achieving the 
speedy collection and processing of meteorological, oceanic, and 
seismic data and facilitating a prompt feedback. 
  Develop oceanic data and information technology. Establish 
an 
automated data processing, storage, and management system, a 
modern and user-oriented system for the automatic processing, 
storage, and management of data and information. Step up 
research on flood control monitoring technology and technology 
to ensure the speedy handling of forewarning information. 
Improve the system for processing flood control warnings. 
Intensify research on technology to transmit and process 
information pertaining to plant diseases affecting crops and 
forests, rodent infestation, forest fires, and natural 
geological agricultural disasters. Create a corresponding system 
for the speedy transmission and real-time processing of 
information, along with a mechanism for feedback. 
  Step up research on a range of technologies to assess the 
damage caused by natural disasters and to retrieve and process 
information, tentatively putting together a natural disaster 
damage assessment system and information transmission and 
processing system in China. 
  3. Step Up Research on the Principles Governing the 
Occurrence of Various Major Natural Disasters and Theories and 
Methods of Forecasting 
  Develop or propose an even more practical and effective 
system for forecasting a major natural disaster. Intensify 
research on the method of numerical disaster-causing weather and 
climate forecasting. Establish a medium-term numerical 
forecasting system that is internationally advanced, focusing on 
the forecasting of disastrous weather and climatic conditions 
that have a serious impact on national economic development and 
social development, such as prolonged rainstorms and high 
temperatures, persistent cool temperatures and rain in the south 
in the spring, hot dry wind, and cold dew wind. Step up research 
on long- and medium-range forecasting methods. Establish a 
forecasting and forewarning system that matches the most 
advanced in the world. Intensify research on the environmental 
conditions for rainstorm and flood and create a pool of experts 
in flood control. 
  As of to date earthquake prediction remains a scientific 
problem for which no nation has found a solution. We must probe 
new theories and new methods to predict and forecast an 
earthquake. By examining ever more closely certain major 
seismically active areas, through laboratory simulation, by 
adopting the latest research achievements of related disciplines 
from overseas, and through laboratory simulation, we should 
study in depth the structural environment and dynamic conditions 
for the occurrence of earthquake, the relations between 
non-elastic deformities in the medium of the epicentral area and 
structural movements of the surrounding areas, the 
characteristics of the various stages of the quake-formation 
process and warning signs, a physics model for quake formation, 
and the mechanism of its warning signs. Build a mathematical 
physics model for forecasting and develop a deterministic 
forecasting method. 
  Perfect a forecasting and forewarning system for oceanic 
disasters. Develop and perfect short-, medium-, and long-range 
forecasting models based primarily on numerical diagnostic 
analysis and numerical forecasting and combining a variety of 
forecasting methods. Develop a host of disaster forewarning 
products. Equip China with the ability to provide services at 
sea in the western Pacific and in any ocean all over the world. 
  Step up research on dynamic simulation technology on plant 
diseases affecting crops and trees and on rodent infestation. 
Intensify research on a numerical predicting method. Make better 
use of systematic analytic predictions and the pool of experts. 
Intensify research on the conditions of formation and 
forecasting methods for geological disasters like landslides, 
mud-slides, mud-rock flow, and other sudden natural disasters. 
  Study in depth the laws of distribution, both spatial and 
temporal, of a whole range of natural disasters. Using the 
insight derived therefrom we can then conduct in-depth 
comprehensive analysis and comparisons, studying the 
interactions between the various kinds of natural disasters, 
particularly the demonstrated regional and clustering 
characteristics, and exploring the causes of all natural 
disasters and possible common regulatory and control mechanism 
and factors. 
  4. Strengthen Research on Methods and Technology of Disaster 
Forecasting, Disaster Prevention, and Disaster Relief, and 
Enhance Our All-Round Ability to Withstand Natural Disasters 
  Conduct comprehensive research on the methods and technology 
for predicting and assessing the losses caused by a natural 
disaster as well as disaster prevention and disaster relief 
measures. Formulate a comprehensive plan for each type of 
location, depending on the situation it is in and its 
conditions. Focus on the technology and methods for predicting 
the losses caused by a major sudden disaster and secondary 
disasters in the area as well as methods and technology for 
disaster prevention and relief. 
  Research earthquake prediction and the theory, methods, and 
technology of earthquake prevention, earthquake-proofing, and 
disaster relief. This will include: special characteristics of 
surface movements in nearby areas, reactions of buildings to the 
tremor of the foundation, the division of seismically active 
areas into small zones and forecasting the damages caused by 
earthquake, regional and township risk analysis, standards and 
new technology for quake-proofing buildings, building damage 
detection technology, and life-saving technology suited to 
China's conditions. Research major technical problems relating 
to combating massive flooding: engineering and non-engineering 
measures in flood control; changes in the waters, silt, and 
courses of major rivers and lakes; new technological measures to 
reinforce such works as dams, embankments, and floodgates; 
engineering and technical measures to prevent and control flood 
damage in hilly and mountainous areas and for flood management 
in cities; and technical measures to control storm surges in 
coastal cities. Of particular importance are effective methods 
and technology to prevent massive flooding in key rivers. 
Develop technology and equipment for disaster prevention at sea 
and along the coast. Create a disaster prevention technical 
system. 
  Step up research on artificial weather control. Establish a 
number of man-made experimental zones and demonstrational zones 
where efforts will be made to prevent hail and increase 
rainfall. Step up basic research on rain-making and 
hail-prevention. Perfect practical application and scientific 
targets. Establish an effective scientific artificial weather 
control system and search for other new scientific ways to 
influence climatic conditions such as typhoons. 
  Master technology for the comprehensive prevention and 
treatment of plant diseases, weeds, and rodent infestation. 
Master biological control methods. Do a good job in the research 
and demonstration of high-efficiency, low-toxicity, and 
low-residue pesticides. Step up research on the prevention of 
plant diseases and rodent infestation that occur suddenly. 
  Assess the safety of engineering projects (including the 
lifeline system and other important projects) in view of the 
amount of damages inflicted by natural disasters on a particular 
region in the past or the projected damages in long- and 
medium-term forecasts and bearing in mind China's social and 
economic conditions. Conduct an economic assessment of 
geological disasters and put forward measures to mitigate, 
prevent, and control geological disasters. 
<H5>  Production Safety </H5>
  Production safety is an essential part of the protection of 
worker safety and the development of productive forces. It is a 
basic precondition for ensuring sustained, steady, and 
successful economic construction and social stability and unity, 
an important hallmark of social civilization. 
  Production safety includes, among other things, the personal 
safety of workers during the production process or work process 
in enterprises and other institutions, equipment and product 
safety, and transportation safety. It covers a variety of areas, 
including economics, politics, society, environmental 
management, S&amp;T, and publishing and education. We must put 
forward a S&amp;T safety policy suited to China's conditions in 
accordance with its social and economic development situation in 
the medium and long run even as we step up safe management and 
develop modern safe S&amp;T. This is the only way to solve major 
S&amp;T 
problems in production safety and bring about safe and civilized 
production. 
  1. Development Strategy and Objectives 
  1) Development Strategy The development strategy in 
production safety is to enforce the principle of ``safety first, 
prevention first'' across the board; insist that safe production 
be planned, developed, and implemented in tandem with economic 
construction, the deepening of reform in enterprises, and 
technological transformation; adhere to the principle of 
marrying the development of production with the protection of 
productive forces; and abide by the principle of combining the 
full utilization of existing practical and safe S&amp;T with the 
development of modern and safe S&amp;T. Guided by policies, 
technological progress, and scientific management, we should 
shift the focus of safe productive work to the notion of 
prevention first by systematizing safety rules, regulations, and 
standards, making safety management scientific, regularizing 
education, and making equipment safe. 
  -- When it comes to the technological transformation of 
traditional industry, proceed from reality and make full use of 
domestic and foreign advanced S&amp;T to carry out safe 
technological transformation. 
  -- Even as we develop modern industry, we should develop 
essentially safe products in light of the reality in production, 
adopt automatic control technology and computer technology, and 
put together a robot with artificial intelligence, thereby 
improving working conditions and ensuring safe production 
fundamentally. 
  -- Make energy and transportation safety the focus of the 
development of safe S&amp;T. Launch research on the technology of 
preventing, forecasting, and controlling major serious accidents. 
  -- Step up applied basic research on safety to lay the 
theoretical foundation for the development of the S&amp;T of safe 
production. 
  -- Step up research on safety engineering and public health 
engineering to resolve effectively and quickly the new problems 
relating to technological safety that keep popping up in the 
course of economic construction and enterprise production. 
  -- Intensify research on safety management science. Develop 
safety assessment, reliability analysis, and safety testing and 
inspection technology. Raise the S&amp;T standard of the 
supervision 
of production safety. Establish a safe production assurance 
system. 
  -- Strengthen international cooperation. Adopt, emulate, and 
assimilate foreign advanced safety technology to enhance 
significantly China's capacity to develop safety and sanitation 
technology. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  The strategic goals of production safety are: fully rely on 
technological progress to vigorously transform the working 
conditions in traditional industries, establish a scientific 
management system, and perfect safety technology and equipment 
as well as means of monitoring so that there will be a sharp 
drop in accidents causing deaths and injuries by the end of this 
century, thus basically checking the trend toward increasing 
major serious accidents and rising incidence of pneumoconiosis, 
and striking improvements on the production safety front, 
essentially ending the state of backwardness characteristic of 
safety and public health in production, transportation, and 
communications. When that comes to pass, we shall have put in 
place a safe production environment commensurate with both 
national economic development and the fairly comfortable 
standard of living achieved by the people then. 
  By the year 2000 the standard of production safety S&amp;T 
will 
match that of advanced nations as of the late 1970's and early 
1980's. 
  -- In production safety, large and medium-sized enterprises 
shall be the equal of advanced nations in the 1980's, with the 
death rate per thousand workers dropping 50 percent and the rate 
of serious injury per thousand workers also falling 50 percent. 
The number of enterprise workers killed on the job should fall 
below 0.05 per thousand, while the number of workers seriously 
injured on the job should be less than 0.15 per thousand. 
  -- Systematically improve the working environment in 
accordance with a plan. Raise the standard of technology to 
prevent dust poisoning. Gradually increase dust poisoning pass 
rate for work sites so that the incidence of pneumoconiosis 
among factory workers will have dropped 60 percent in the 20 
years between 1980 and 2000. 
  -- Production safety targets in the key economic sectors 
will 
go up markedly. The fatality rate for 1 million tons of unified 
distribution standard coal will drop 60 percent, or under 1 
fatality per thousand workers. In key iron and steel mills, the 
death rate for 1 million tons of steel should drop 60 percent, 
or under one fatality per thousand workers. The incidence of 
explosion per 10,000 boilers should drop 75 percent, or under 
0.3 explosion per 10,000 boilers annually. In construction 
projects, the death rate will be held below 0.12 workers per 
thousand workers. 
  -- Popularize among township and town enterprises existing 
managerial technology and safety measures suited to safe 
production in those enterprises. Incorporate those technologies 
and measures into the ``Spark Plan'' and implement them at the 
same pace as the plan. 
  -- Suiting measures to local conditions, speed up the 
diffusion and application of safety S&amp;T, gradually forming a 
group of enterprises providing key safety and protective 
products and expediting the commercialization of production 
safety technologies and products. 
  -- Intensify research on production safety science so that 
the field will essentially equal the best in the developed 
nations as of the 1980's. Perfect our scientific research system 
and safety monitoring and inspection system. Never stop 
improving the caliber of the S&amp;T corps. 
  By the year 2020 we shall have achieved a major breakthrough 
in the standard of our production safety S&amp;T. We shall have 
gone 
all out to create safe, sanitary, and good working conditions 
for Chinese workers in the first half of the next century, 
steering the development of safety S&amp;T in the direction of 
ensuring a high degree of physical and mental health for workers 
even as it lays a solid S&amp;T basis for the ``inherent 
safety'' of 
production equipment, technology, and products. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technology 
  To accomplish the above objectives, we have decided upon the 
following as the major tasks in the development of the S&amp;T of 
production safety: 
  1) Research and Application of Safety Technology 
  Concentrate on the research of technology to prevent and 
control major serious accidents and recurrent accidents: 
  Research the prevention and control of gas and dust 
explosions in mines and coal and gas outbreaks. Research the 
forecasting and control of mine cave-ins and landslides. 
  Develop technology to prevent major fires and explosions, 
including the likelihood of dust explosions in industry, 
technology to prevent dust explosions in factories and at 
harbors, the prevention of boiler explosions, and the 
forecasting of such accidents, technology to prevent fires and 
explosions caused by hazardous substances in the manufacturing 
process, in transit, and in storage, and technology to prevent 
and forecast the variety of explosions and accidents caused by 
static electricity. 
  Research technology to prevent highway, railroad, and 
maritime accidents. 
  Research technology to prevent serious accidents caused by 
the extensive leaking of highly toxic radioactive materials in 
the production, transportation, and storage processes. 
  Research technology to prevent the damage and collapse of 
buildings and other structures and construction accidents, 
including the testing and control of dilapidated industrial 
buildings, and safety monitoring of reservoirs, dams, and 
embankments, and technology to prevent falls and collapses that 
occur in the construction process. 
  Research ways to enhance disaster-prevention capacity. 
Research rescue technology to prevent accidents from getting 
worse, technology to achieve swift accident investigation, and 
emergency rescue technology. 
  Research technology to prevent recurrent injury-causing 
mechanical accidents, including technology to prevent injuries 
caused by all kinds of metallic blank rollings, and technology 
to prevent injuries caused by punching and metal-cutting machine 
tools, lifting and transportation equipment, woodworking 
machinery, and other equipment. 
  Research the built-in safety technology of mechanical and 
electronic equipment, the safety technology for the R&amp;D, 
production, and use of new composite materials, as well as 
electrical safety and technology for safe electricity generation 
and supply. 
  Research and develop a variety of sensitive safety testing 
instruments and multi-function, remote-control, 
remote-measuring, automatic alarm systems and automatic testing 
systems. 
  2) Research and Application of Sanitation Engineering 
  Concentrate on the research of technology to prevent 
occupational diseases like pneumoconiosis which seriously 
jeopardize workers' health. 
  Research dust control technology, including dust-preventing 
ventilation and purification technology for use in mining and 
tunnel excavation, new highly effective dust-removal technology 
and equipment, dust-source removal technology, dust-removal 
technology for ship compartments, and harbors and dust-removal 
technology for high altitudes with cool temperatures and arid 
areas. 
  Research technology to control toxic substances and 
carcinogens, particularly technology for the purification, 
absorption, centralized recovery and treatment of toxic 
substances, technology using non-toxic or low-toxicity 
substitutes, and all sorts of protective sealing technology. 
  Research technology to control physically hazardous 
substances, including the danger posed to the human body by high 
temperatures, noise, vibration, electro-magnetic radiation, and 
electromagnetic rays, and technology to protect against such 
hazards. 
  3) Research and Application of Safety Management 
  Investigate the causes of accidents that occur in the 
production processes in factories and mines and in transit and 
consider corresponding preventive measures. Research management 
technology centered upon equipment safety and operational 
safety. Research the technology of plant and mine management 
safety whose aim is to create a system of safety and assurance. 
Research the scientific management of production safety in 
township and town enterprises. 
  Launch research on systems safety engineering, modern safety 
management, safety economics, safety psychology, and safety 
human engineering, among other things. Research systems safety 
analysis, safety assessment, accident information management 
system, risk analysis technology, accident comprehensive 
analysis technology, and its forecasting technology. 
  Examine the scientific basis for production safety 
legislation, monitoring system, safety management system, paid 
leave system, and accidental compensation system. Establish and 
perfect an accident and production safety S&amp;T information 
system, and create a data base for accidents causing deaths and 
injuries as well as a predicting system. Establish ties with all 
labor departments and all industrial sectors across the nation 
and become part of the international occupational and health 
information network under the International Labor Organization. 
  4) High-Tech Applications and the Research and Application 
of 
Safety Technology in Special Environments 
  Study the technology to protect against hazards brought 
about 
by high tech. Research the application and development of the 
computer in the realm of production safety. 
  Research and develop technologies for condition monitoring, 
fault diagnosis, and accident recall for use during the 
operation of a piece of equipment. 
  Develop an economic robot which can operate normally in a 
toxic, hazardous, inflammable or explosion-prone environment and 
a robot with artificial intelligence which can withstand danger 
in an emergency situation. 
  Research the use of laser, microwave, infrared technology, 
and other safety technologies to measure distance, guide 
navigation, and prevent collision. 
  Research safe production and management technology with 
regard to nuclear power stations, nuclear fuels, and radioactive 
isotope, including nuclear safety simulation, inherent safety, 
radiation protection, the prevention of accidents like nuclear 
meltdown, and the disposal of nuclear wastes. 
<H5>  Social Public Security </H5>
  Social public security is a basic guarantee of economic 
development and social development in China. 
  A comprehensive approach is essential to safeguarding social 
public security. Increasingly social public security is 
dependent on S&amp;T development. The S&amp;T of social public 
security 
is an effective weapon in preventing, controlling, and managing 
a variety of criminal activities and other incidents disruptive 
to social order, in preserving social order, in ensuring that 
members of society can live and work in a normal orderly 
fashion, and in protecting the lives and properties of the 
people and the nation. 
  The S&amp;T of social public security embraces multiple 
disciplines and is a comprehensive applied S&amp;T. It includes 
preventive security, computer security, surveillance, road and 
traffic management, material evidence identification, fire 
prevention, social public security information management, 
police communications and command, and police-use weapons and 
protective gear. The S&amp;T of social public security not only 
serves the cause of social public security, but it also 
contributes to national economic and social development. 
  We must utilize modern S&amp;T to solve the problems in the 
S&amp;T 
of social public security, step up applied basic research and 
basic technical development so as to end the backwardness 
characteristic of the S&amp;T of social public security and its 
equipment gradually, and meet the needs of preventing, 
controlling, and managing promptly and accurately all sorts of 
criminal activities in violation of the law and other incidents 
harmful to social law and order, as well as the needs of legal 
development. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) Development Strategy 
  The development strategy of the S&amp;T of social public 
security 
is to enforce the principle of ``prevention first, combine 
prevention with treatment;'' steadfastly stay the course of 
serving social public security; end the traditional ``small but 
complete'' practice and the old way of doing things in 
isolation; rely on the state, orient oneself to society, and 
join forces with other pertinent agencies to expand and 
reinforce the forces of the S&amp;T of social public security; 
strengthen specialized S&amp;T organizations to handle highly 
specialized technology, and establish a corps of S&amp;T workers 
who 
are of a high caliber and represent a full lineup of skills, 
making it an organic part of the national S&amp;T contingent and 
enabling the S&amp;T of social public security to develop 
effectively and swiftly; and gradually standardize social public 
security facilities, modernize technology and equipment, 
regularize technical laws and standards, and professionalize 
education and training. 
  The detailed guiding thought is as follows: 
  -- Proceeding from reality, we shall firmly abide by the 
principle of combining the full utilization of the existing 
achievements of the S&amp;T of social public security with 
developing modern S&amp;T, of combining popularization with 
improvement. 
  Apply to social public security all advanced S&amp;T 
achievements 
in China either directly or with modifications in order to 
produce better and faster results. 
  -- Keep track of advances in the new technology of social 
public security in the world. Adopt them and assimilate them. 
Strengthen international technical exchange and cooperation and 
research major topics jointly to expedite the development of the 
S&amp;T of social public security in China. 
  -- Intensify the notion of social public security as a piece 
of systems engineering. Plan and develop the S&amp;T of social 
public security comprehensively. Create security assurance 
technological systems of different kinds and covering different 
areas. 
  -- Step up research on applied basic theory to provide a 
theoretical base for the S&amp;T of social public security. 
  -- Intensify research on the applied technology of social 
public security and effectively and promptly solve the endless 
technical problems relating to security assurance that pop up in 
the course of social development. 
  -- Intensify research on the management science of social 
public security. Conduct safety assessment and reliability 
analyses of social public security standards, and engineering 
and technical systems. Perfect security testing and monitoring 
technology. Raise the S&amp;T standards of social security 
inspection and supervision. 
  -- Launch research on the soft science of social public 
security. 
  2) Strategic Goal in light of the evolving trends and 
characteristics of each kind of social law and order problem, 
criminal activity, and incident injurious to social order, we 
must proceed from reality, make full use of high-tech like 
microelectronics technology, computer technology, weak signal 
processing, ultra micro-analysis, biotechnology, and systems 
engineering. Create and improve the technical methods and 
equipment of social public security as well as a scientific 
management system, putting an end to the backwardness in the 
S&amp;T 
of social public security. At present China trails developed 
nations by 10 to 25 years in terms of the S&amp;T of social 
public 
security. By the year 2000, we shall have gradually closed the 
gap and steadily broadened the role of S&amp;T in the 
preservation 
of social public security. 
  -- Modern security systems shall be widely installed in key 
protection areas in large and mid-sized cities and some 
residents shall be practicing new security preventive measures 
so that they can call police expeditiously in a special 
emergency situation. As a result, there will be a heightened 
security and sense of security. In urban areas, the police shall 
be able to respond to a call and arrive at the scene within 10 
to 15 minutes, down from the present average of 30 minutes. 
  -- Improve the undercover investigation technological 
system. 
Establish and perfect a national three-level technical network 
for material evidence identification. Standardize material 
evidence identification technology. Make full use of technology 
in every stage of the investigation and solution of a case. 
  -- Make full use of high-tech. Overcome the technical 
problems in weak signal (voice, image) processing. Develop 
ultra-micro analysis and new DNA technology to significantly 
improve our ability to solve major difficult cases. 
  -- Promptly initiate research on technology to prevent and 
solve computer crime. Track the development of new technology 
overseas to provide effective measures in our effort to prevent 
computer crime. Research and develop computer security standards 
and security assessment and testing tools to provide a 
scientific basis for policy making by the government. 
  -- Establish a social public security integrated information 
system that is multi-level, multi-function, multi-purpose, that 
can respond quickly and that is sophisticated and essentially 
computer-based and information-oriented to improve information 
management and raise the level of operations and command in 
social public security. 
  -- Reverse the trend toward more serious traffic accidents. 
Traffic fatalities will decrease 8 to 10 percent per thousand 
vehicles every 5 years. Major intersections in cities with a 
population over 1 million should mostly be regulated by traffic 
lights. 
  -- Establish the framework of fire-fighting S&amp;T 
developing in 
tandem with national economic development. We should be better 
able to control the frequency with which major fires occur and 
markedly enhance the fire-fighting capacity of towns and large 
industrial areas. The number of fires annually should be limited 
to less than 5,000 per 100 million people, at the same time 
holding the line at direct economic losses below 0.025 percent 
of GNP. 
  By 2020, there will have been a new quantum leap in the 
S&amp;T 
of social public security, making it more intelligent and 
information-oriented. We will have initiated research on public 
social security science in the urban environment and developed a 
soft science in social public security combining the natural 
sciences with social sciences and forming an advanced integrated 
S&amp;T system in social public security commensurate with the 
personal and property security of the people, with civil rights, 
with economic development, and with social progress. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technologies 
  Concentrate on the development of technology to collect, 
transmit, and process special information closely related to the 
maintenance of modern social public security as well as 
technical tools of controlling and managing factors that 
endanger social public security. Accordingly the major tasks are: 
  1) Security and Preventive Technology 
  In preventive security, we must make full use of the 
achievements of modern S&amp;T in signal processing and computer 
science and overcome the difficulties presented by the 
suddenness of criminal behavior in terms of time, its 
uncertainty in terms of space, and the confrontational nature of 
its tactics. 
  -- Develop the technology of modern integrated protection 
systems engineering with major security protection areas such as 
key departments and important sites as our principal service 
targets. 
  -- Develop an integrated anti-burglary, anti-intrusion 
detection technology that is all-weather and highly reliable, 
has a low false alarm rate, and is low-consumption. Such 
technology should also come with a police-reporting network 
which could form the basis of an intelligent police reporting 
technology. 
  -- Research and apply new technology using fingerprints, 
acoustics, and eye prints as means of identification, forming a 
new entry control system. 
  -- Research anti-smuggling and anti-hijacking technology. 
  -- Research and apply detection technology against hidden 
instruments of crime (explosives of all sorts, weapons, etc.) 
and corresponding families of equipment to meet the needs of 
different occasions. 
  -- Develop processing technology for use at the scene of an 
explosion and an intelligent robot for detonating explosives. 
  -- Develop protective security technology and equipment and 
its corresponding standards and testing technology. Set up 
security and protective equipment quality supervision and 
monitoring agency at the national level. 
  -- Establish an anti-explosion anti-violence technological 
training center. 
  By the year 2000 key units and vital organs of the state 
shall have a multi-function multi-level integrated security and 
police-reporting system. Enhance the anti-intrusion, 
anti-burglary, anti-sabotage capabilities of these units and 
organs. By the year 2020 we shall have put together a 
comprehensive and intelligent social protective security system, 
foreseeing and tracking newly emergent dangerous and covert ways 
of committing crime, and developing corresponding detection 
methods, and perfecting the necessary equipment. 
  2) Computer Security Technology 
  The existence or otherwise of computer security technology 
is 
a crucial matter with a direct impact on state security and 
social security. Our war with this intelligent criminal is a new 
challenge facing us today. Computer crime perpetrators typically 
alter data, receive computer information, or use other high-tech 
means to steal money, properties, and information, which 
explains why computer crimes are hard to discover and 
investigate. Accordingly we must waste no time in marshalling 
public security and social forces to research and develop 
appropriate preventive and crime-solving technologies to fill 
the void in computer security technology and ensure computer 
security in China. 
  -- Formulate computer systems security assessment standards, 
including security assessment standards for operating systems, 
data bases, network, media, information leakage, software, 
hardware, and applications environment. 
  -- Develop computer systems security technology and 
equipment. 
  -- Develop the technology for solving computer crime. 
Develop 
corresponding investigative technology and equipment. 
  -- Launch soft science research in the field of computer 
security in order to provide scientific a basis for drawing up 
laws and regulations for computer monitoring and security. 
  -- Establish a computer security research and testing 
center. 
  By 2000 the research tasks mentioned above will begin to 
bear 
fruit in the form of computer security technical standards, 
security assessment and testing tools, and the ability to 
provide a scientific basis for policy-making by the state. By 
2020, we will have the ability to prevent or solve the kinds of 
computer crime most common at the time: 
  3) Investigative Technology 
  Investigative technology is a vital component of the 
investigative work of public security organs, an important tool 
and a powerful weapon at our disposal as we struggle with 
serious criminal offenders, hostile forces at home and abroad, 
spies, and agents. Among the most important tasks of 
investigative technology is research on decoding, intercepting, 
surveillance, searching, shadowing, monitoring, 
anti-investigation and anti-eavesdropping technologies and the 
development of corresponding tools and devices. 
  The subjects of investigative work are complex and variable, 
as are its environments. And then there is the strict need for 
covertness. This means there is a host of technically complex 
and difficult issues awaiting our solution before we can raise 
the level of investigative technology, 
  -- Develop mobile voice pick-up technology. 
  -- Develop investigative technology compatible with modern 
communications technology. 
  -- Research the technology to pick up a voice under adverse 
investigative conditions and make it intelligible. Establish a 
voice signal processing laboratory that would provide services 
to the entire nation. 
  -- Develop a high-sensitivity, low-consumption, and compact 
video camera and photographic equipment that work in poor 
illumination and low contrast. Develop processing technology for 
low-contrast poor-illumination faint image signals. Enhance the 
efficacy and mobility of image and evidence gathering work. 
  -- Research anti-surveillance, anti-evidence-gathering 
technology. Ensure the security of investigative work itself. 
  -- Research and master ultra low-concentration and complex 
coding technology. 
  -- Stay abreast with and analyze every new way in which 
criminals commit crime as well as new investigative technology. 
Improve the effectiveness of investigative devices. 
  -- Set up a center for simulated testing of investigative 
technology, devices, and methods and the popularization and 
application of new technology to bridge the gap between research 
and application and to popularize and diffuse new technology and 
new products. 
  By 2000 we should have largely completed the research tasks 
with the exception of faint voice signal and image signal 
processing technology, markedly boosting the standard of 
investigation. By 2020 we shall have continued to improve and 
further the above-mentioned research priorities, at the same 
time working to master faint voice and image signal processing 
technology. We must also try to keep up with advanced technology 
overseas and never cease to heighten the adaptability and 
manageability of high-tech investigation. 
  4) Material Evidence Identification Technology 
  The goal of material evidence identification is to crack 
down 
on criminals and solve cases and provide iron-clad evidence for 
trial purposes. 
  -- Develop new technology for inspecting and gathering 
evidence at the scene of a major crime, such as a murder, 
robbery, or explosion. 
  -- Study ways of applying cytology and enzyme kinetics in 
examining injuries on a corpse and determining time of death. 
  -- Develop high-tech to identify fingerprints, voice, 
handwriting, and for skull restoration. 
  -- Examine the comprehensive evaluation of footprint 
characteristics and the relations between the physical 
attributes of an individual and the principles of walking. 
  -- Put the high-tech of DNA to use for personal 
identification. 
  -- Research new technology and equipment to solve cases 
involving the counterfeiting of currency, certificates, 
documents, and seals. 
  -- Research systems identification technology for use in 
collecting, analyzing, and separating the structural components 
of micro material evidence. 
  -- Study drugs and the rapid and sensitive testing of drugs 
and their human metabolins. 
  -- Create a computer inquiry system containing data on 
criminals and samples of material evidence. 
  -- Gradually standardize and regularize the technology for 
crime site inspection and material evidence identification. Step 
up the diffusion and widespread adoption of such technology. 
  -- Set up and perfect a material evidence identification 
laboratory at the national level. It shall conduct 
ground-breaking research to identify and verify problematic 
material evidence in major crimes across the nation. 
  By the year 2000 we should have gradually increased the 
discovery rate and utilization rate of material evidence and we 
shall have been able to predict trends of crime and formulated a 
correct policy. By 2020 China shall have caught up with the most 
advanced nations in the world at the time. 
  5) Traffic and Transportation Management Technology 
  The traffic pattern in China today is a mixed one where 
automobiles compete for space on the road with a large number of 
non-motorized vehicles and pedestrians, a pattern that would be 
hard to change for a long time to come. Thus research on traffic 
and transportation management in China must proceed from this 
reality and seek to solve the practical problems in the nation. 
  -- Research the applied basic theories of traffic management 
science. focusing on the characteristics of mixed traffic, the 
characteristics of vehicular traffic, and the management S&amp;T 
appropriate to each. 
  -- Develop traffic management and safety systems engineering 
to provide a comprehensive traffic management model for urban 
renewal and transportation planning. 
  -- Promptly research and develop technology for highway 
traffic safety management, technology for the prompt 
investigation of accidents, and emergency rescue. 
  -- Research testing and monitoring technology that would 
improve automobile safety and the safety of traffic 
installations and facilities. 
  -- Study traffic safety psychology, traffic safety 
physiology, and human engineering. Identify the principles 
governing the relations between the caliber of drivers and 
traffic accidents. Develop technology to control and correct 
dangerous factors. 
  -- Establish a road and traffic safety assessment and 
accident predicting system and a traffic management 
policy-making support system. Also provide a scientific basis 
for legislation on traffic management. 
  -- Establish a traffic safety testing center where traffic 
accidents of all types are simulated for testing and analytical 
study. 
  -- Research and develop a traffic management and traffic 
accident data base and a vehicular management, driver training 
and examination, traffic communication, and traffic guidance 
integrated information system. 
  By the year 2000 we should have essentially applied the 
S&amp;T 
achievements mentioned above to the metropolises and large 
cities of all types, tentatively forming a mixed traffic 
management system that can direct and guide traffic effectively, 
thus raising the average speed of urban vehicular traffic by 10 
percent or so. (For traffic accident fatalities, see above.) By 
the year 2020, a modern road and traffic management and safety 
technical system with Chinese characteristics shall have been 
put in place, with signal control technology and vehicular 
safety testing technology being widely adopted. This should be 
accompanied by a further decline in traffic accident fatalities 
per thousand vehicles. 
  6) Fire-Fighting S&amp;T 
  The purpose of the fire-fighting S&amp;T is to enhance our 
ability to avert and combat disasters and heighten the ability 
of fire-fighting forces to put out fires, thus contributing even 
more effectively to safeguarding economic development and 
protecting the people's lives and properties. In the past 10 
years or so, fire fighting facilities have fallen woefully 
behind the needs of urban development. The potential danger of 
fire breaking out is high, so there is an urgent need to take 
every appropriate fire-fighting measure. Even more acute is the 
need for fire prevention and fire-resistance technology in 
high-rise buildings and underground works. In addition, there 
are new issues to be tackled regarding the causes of fires, the 
theory of fire spreading, rescue technology, and fire-fighting 
standards, rules, and equipment. 
  -- Consider setting up a system for dividing a city into 
zones according to its level of fire hazard. Establish a 
comprehensive technical system to prevent and fight urban fires. 
  -- Increase the ability of key protection points which 
present special fire hazards and technical problems to prevent 
and control fires. Targeting sites and locations (such as 
high-rise buildings, underground projects, petroleum 
enterprises, transportation hubs, nuclear power facilities, and 
new cutting-edge industries) in national economic production and 
in cities which present exceptional fire risks and complex 
rescue problems, we shall consider setting up a system for 
preventing and reporting fires and explosions, for extinguishing 
the fire or stopping the explosion, and for delivering emergency 
services. We should also develop a coordinated, intelligent 
remote-control, auto-control execution system as well as rescue 
equipment suitable for use in dangerous areas. 
  -- Develop new fire-fighting technology and equipment 
suitable for use at all types of fire scenes. 
  -- Launch research on rescue technology and equipment to be 
used in putting out extra-large fires and handling earthquakes, 
storms, and war. 
  -- In the wake of the development of fire-fighting S&amp;T 
and 
advances in building technology, we shall formulate or revise 
fire-fighting technical rules and criteria and improve the fire 
fighting product quality control technical system. 
  -- Conduct research on fire and explosion theories. 
  -- Conduct research on the psychology and physiology of fire 
and fire fighting. Shed light on the psychological state of a 
human being trapped in a fire. Study the hazard posed by high 
temperatures, lack of oxygen, and the products of combustion to 
the human body, the injury caused, time of death, and 
appropriate preventive measures. 
  By the year 2000, there should have been set up an 
appropriate fire prevention and fire-fighting technical system 
in every city with a population over 1 million and every major 
fire protection target. We should have reached the standard of 
developed nations as of the late 1980's in fire detection, 
automatic fire extinguishing, anti-explosion, explosion 
suppression, and all types of fire-fighting technology and 
equipment, fire-resistant building materials, and parts and 
components. There should be 100 fire-fighting technical rules, 
up from the current 20, and 500 or so fire-fighting standards, 
both national and professional, up from the current 70. The 
rudiments of a fire-fighting testing and research center shall 
be in place, along with a fire cause identification and 
fire-fighting forces technical equipment testing and research 
center. There should also be a complete fire-fighting product 
quality control and inspection network centered upon a national 
quality inspection center. 
  By the year 2020 we should have basically established a 
multi-function national urban fire-fighting technical 
comprehensive protection system, a fire-fighting scientific 
research and education system, and a body of fire-fighting 
technical laws, regulations, and standards. In terms of 
fire-fighting technical facilities and the technical equipment 
of fire-fighting forces, China should equal the best in the 
industrialized world at the end of the century. 
  7) Social Public Security: Information Management Technology 
and Command System Technology 
  Since China embarked on reform and introduced the open 
policy, people, goods, materials, and money have been on the 
move on a massive scale. To ensure social public security, an 
all-out effort must be made to develop social public security 
information technology, create a social public security 
information system, a national multi-level, multi-function, 
multi-purpose, rapid-response, and high-standard system based on 
the computer and communications to raise the standard of 
information management and command. 
  -- Study the theory, characteristics, model, method of 
design, and assessment criteria of a social public security 
information system for a mass society; create a large-scale 
population movement information management system that extends 
all the way from the grass-roots police substation to the 
national level to provide social law and order organs and other 
departments with demographic information services. 
  -- Establish a foreign population information management 
system and a computer network linked to the appropriate 
international body. 
  -- Develop a crime information management system and become 
part of the information network of Interpol. 
  -- Examine the social public security command, the dial-110 
police-reporting system, and technical approaches and results 
model of different cities. 
  -- Develop information technologies essential to social 
public security, such as those relating to voice, writing, or 
imagery. 
  -- Establish a social public security auxiliary 
policy-making 
system, a social public security intelligence system, and a 
social public security statistical and information system. 
  By the year 2000 the social public security information 
management and command system should cover all major cities in 
the nation and, by the year 2020, a majority of cities in China. 
  8) Police Weapons and Protective Gear 
  The primary task here is to develop weapons and protective 
gear for use by police in self-defense or to bring the criminal 
under control in an emergency or dangerous situation, such as 
plane and boat hijacking, or in situations where the police are 
trying to prevent an explosion or quell violence. Proceed from 
the current situation in China and bring about the 
standardization and automation of police weapons and protective 
gear, also making them compact and multi-function. 
  -- Research and develop a light-weight, compact automatic 
pistol, weighing no more than 1 kilogram, with an effective 
range of 30 to 50 meters. The pistol should be easy to draw, 
have a high percentage of hits among first shots, and fire both 
military and non-lethal rounds. 
  -- Research and develop a reliable, multi-purpose revolver 
with a high percentage of first-shot hits. Develop ammunition 
(including lethal and non-lethal ammunition and special 
ammunition). 
  -- Research and develop semi-automatic anesthetic rifle, 
anti-riot guns, multi-purpose signal pistols, hand grenades, and 
rifle grenades. 
  -- Research and develop protective gear and simulation 
training equipment. 
  By 2000, police weapons and protective gear in China shall 
be 
as advanced as those in developed nations in the late 1980's 
and, by the year 2020, equal the best in developed nations at 
the end of the 20th century. 
<H5>  Surveying and Mapping </H5>
  Surveying and mapping is a pace-setting and basic industry 
that deals with geographical information. It is 
technology-intensive and has an extremely broad range of 
services. To meet the surveying and mapping needs in every 
field--national management, economic development, defense 
build-up, scientific research, culture and education, daily 
life, it must devote itself to obtaining, processing, and 
supplying information relating to the shape, size, and 
gravitational fields of the planet Earth, as well as basic 
information relating to natural and man-made land forms, the 
characteristics and distribution of surface features, the plane 
position and elevation of surface points, geographical names and 
geographical factors. Such information is used in various ways: 
to determine the position and orientation of a place, to 
investigate and analyze, to forecast and assess, in planning and 
policy-making, in supervision, in operations and command, and in 
diffusing knowledge. 
  In the next 2 to 3 decades, Chinese surveying must not only 
effect the transition from the old to the new management 
systems, but also help the new technology replace the old by 
adopting new technology to refine geodetic surveying references, 
totally revamping China's basic land surveying information 
products and launching basic surveying and special-topic 
surveying in China's territorial waters, thus filling the void 
in China's cadastral surveying and mapping and opening up a new 
field of surveying and mapping services, both domestic and 
foreign. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) Development Strategy Follow the strategy of ``first, 
guarantee; second, rely; third, efficiency; fourth, market. In 
other words, it should be the goal of the surveying and mapping 
profession to ensure that the surveying and mapping requirements 
of national economic and social development are met to the 
greatest extent possible. It should rely on modern S&amp;T, 
scientific management, and improvements in the caliber of the 
producers to mobilize the forces of the entire surveying and 
mapping industry. It should raise surveying productivity, 
increase the returns on funds and the efficiency with which 
resources are utilized, and prolong the effective use of 
surveying products. It should open up and perfect the surveying 
information market, product market, technical market, and labor 
market to develop China's surveying and mapping industry with a 
strategy that is centered on S&amp;T, seeks survival through 
services, and pursues development by being efficient. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  -- Establish uniform land and sea geodetic surveying 
standards. Refine the geodetic control system and gravitational 
fields. Specifically, the point to point density and precision 
of the horizontal control net and elevated control net must 
reach a scale between 1:500 and 1:1,000 for urban maps, and 
between 1:2,000 and 1:5,000 for rural maps to meet the 
requirements of research on crustal movement, etc. The density 
and precision of priority areas and points targeted by the state 
must be such that the requirements of spatial science and 
resource prospecting are met. 
  -- To preserve our present situation, we shall maintain the 
comprehensive coverage of both land and sea topographic maps 
used in national land development. As far as land is concerned, 
coverage by topographic maps at a scale between 1:500 and 
1:10,000 shall exceed 80 percent. Specifically in the case of 
urban areas, coverage by topographic maps at a scale between 
1:500 and 1:2,000 shall exceed 90 percent. Turning to China's 
territorial waters, the coverage by water depth maps at a scale 
between 1:50,000 and 1:100,000 shall reach 100 percent. As for 
China's exclusive economic zone outside its territorial waters, 
there should be full coverage by water depth maps at a scale 
between 1:250,000 and 1:500,000. Ocean-floor topographic maps 
should also be developed for priority areas. 
  -- The quantity and diversity of simulated and digital 
surveying information products on the domestic market must be 
such that they can satisfy at least 70 percent of social demand. 
  -- Mapping products that are small-scale, that is, 
1:1,000,000 and below, and national in scope shall enter the 
international surveying and mapping market. The exports of 
mapping products shall increase 3 to 4 times over that in 1985. 
Also, steadily expand the range of mapping and surveying 
services offered by this nation overseas. 
  -- Over 70 percent of the surveying and mapping instruments 
used by the entire industry should be domestically made. 
  -- Fifty percent of the surveying and mapping units in the 
industry shall basically have completed their transition from 
simulated mapping technology to analytic and digital mapping 
technology, fundamentally forming a practical industry that 
provides basic information on China's national territory. 
  -- Develop a contingent of surveyors and cartographers that 
is first-rate in the world. 
  By the year 2020, we should have gone a long way toward 
meeting the above-mentioned objectives, made substantial 
progress in the digitization and automation of mapping and 
surveying technology, making it more intelligent, and basically 
brought about the modernization of China's traditional surveying 
and mapping system, pushing it into the forefront of the world. 
  To achieve its development objectives, the surveying and 
mapping industry must: 
  a) Transform traditional surveying and mapping technology. 
  -- Apply the latest technical achievements comprehensively 
to 
form new technical plans and operating processes in order to 
improve and overhaul plane surface control net and complex 
vertical precision net, and update topographic maps. 
  -- Building on large-scale mapping technology, we shall use 
low-attitude photography, internal/external electronic infrared 
technology, and microcomputer data base to create a 
multi-purpose cadastral surveying and mapping technology. 
  -- Use the microcomputer, digitization, and other new 
technologies to transform the traditional simulated mapping 
technology into a new technical system that includes a digital 
information acquisition and processing technical system as well 
as a simulated mapping system, becoming also an information 
system data collection work station. 
  -- Organically combine aerial photographic surveying with 
space remote-sensing technology, forming a specialized applied 
industry. 
  -- Use image recombination, map-making printing, and other 
new technology to develop shadowgraph and other forms of new 
cartographic products. 
  b) Develop modern surveying and mapping technology. 
  -- Use aerial surveying and locational technology to 
establish a uniform land and sea geodetic control net and 
super-precision aerial geodetic surveying control net to satisfy 
the needs of resource prospecting and construction in the oceans 
and geodynamics. 
  -- Establish and improve the commercialization of national 
land basic information system as a support system, a 
three-dimensional information vehicle, for national economic 
information system and the information system of various 
specialties. Modernize the management of surveying and mapping 
data. 
  -- Make more extensive practical use of remote sensing 
digital image processing, fully digitized automatic map-making, 
and machine-aided map-making. Building on that, we can develop 
new aerial surveying, remote-sensing map making, data base and a 
surveying and mapping experts system linked to artificial 
intelligence to track advanced technology in surveying and 
mapping in the world. Create a modern surveying and mapping 
technical system with Chinese characteristics. 
  -- Utilize new materials and the achievements of computer 
hardware and software technology in conjunction with one another 
to design and manufacture innovative high-quality Chinese-made 
surveying and mapping instruments. Build a production base for 
high-tech surveying and mapping instruments. 
  c) Develop special applied surveying and mapping technology 
  -- Provide dynamic mapping and real-time monitoring 
technology to prevent rivers and streams from flooding; support 
agriculture, forestry, and transportation; protect against 
natural disasters; protect the environment; and deal with 
deteriorations in buildings and engineering works, ground 
subsidence, crustal deformations, and landslides. 
  -- Provide real-time locational and specialized map-making 
and data base technology in the interest of ecological 
equilibrium, population control, resource surveying, and social 
and economic management. 
  -- Provide basic information systems technology to help the 
central government and local authorities at all levels with 
their management and policy-making. 
  -- Provide electronic mapping technology for all means of 
transportation, including land, sea, and air. 
  -- Provide non-topographic photographic and surveying 
technology to such fields as archaeology, investigation, 
medicine, biology, chemistry, industrial production control, and 
robotic vision. 
  2. Major Tasks and Key Technologies 
  To achieve the developmental objectives of the surveying and 
mapping industry, improve the precision of information 
acquisition and processing in surveying and mapping production, 
reduce its field labor-intensity, enhance external and internal 
productivity, diversify the industry's product lineup, broaden 
its scope of application and services, and effectively and 
promptly meet the need of both domestic and foreign users at 
various levels, those in the S&amp;T of surveying and mapping 
shall 
make it their overarching mission in the next 2 to 3 decades to 
realize the preliminary digitization and automation of the 
surveying and mapping production system, the diversification of 
surveying and mapping products, and the systematization of 
surveying and mapping equipment and processes so that the 
technical capability of the surveying and mapping industry and 
the quality of its products will be such that the position of a 
topographical or spatial surface can be determined promptly and 
precisely and that changes in major topographical or spatial 
features will be reflected accurately. 
  By the end of this century, these will be the principal 
tasks 
of the S&amp;T of surveying and mapping: 
  1) Applied Research of Modern Spatial Geodetic Surveying 
Technology 
  Adopt spatial surveying technologies such as VLBI, SLR, and 
GPS, unify land and sea geodetic surveying bench marks, refine 
the static geodetic control net, and create an ultra-high 
precise dynamic geodetic control net; link together all 
surveying observation stations in the nation, establish a 
satellite trading net and satellite observation and data 
processing center, and determine the orbital parameters of 
satellite GNP and other satellites accurately; go about 
providing the use of satellite locational technology 
extensively, use GNP locating in conjunction with aerial 
photography, and significantly reduce field surveying workload 
and labor intensity. 
  2) Experimental Research Relating to National Land Basic 
Information System and Specialized Geographical Information 
System 
  Design a hierarchical model and commercialized structure for 
the national land basic information system. Set national 
technical standards for the national land basic information 
system. Develop a family of intelligent software and computer 
map-making technologies. Using systems engineering methods, 
conduct kuti development and typical experimentation as well as 
applied research at different levels. 
  3) Technology on Map Applications, Map Variety, and Map 
Making and Printing 
  Develop electronic maps, dynamic maps, and tactile maps and 
an atlas of the nation's land and resources. 
  4) Overhaul Traditional Mapping Technology To Make It 
Analytical, Digital, and Intelligent 
  Research the creation of an production system integrating 
photographic surveying with remote sensing so that Chinese-made 
analytical mapping and orthographic projection technology and 
equipment will by and large meet the needs of space remote 
sensing image geometric processing. Explore ways of combining 
photographic surveying, remote sensing, map-making, and the 
geographical information system into an integrated practical 
system. Create a pool of experts in aerial and space 
photographic imaging auto-interpretation and a multi-function 
graphic image mini work station. 
  5) Research on New Technology in Oceanic Surveying and 
Mapping 
  Research and set technical standards for surveying and 
mapping territorial waters. Use space technology to establish an 
oceanic geodetic control net. Determine with precision the 
geographical position of islands in China's territorial waters, 
the datum line of the nation's territorial waters, and the 
geographical coordinates of the contiguous zones, exclusive 
economic zone, and the continental shelf's point of inflection. 
Study the average sea surface of China's territorial waters and 
its oceanic geoidal surface and unify the land and sea datum 
elevation datum planes. Develop new technology to survey the sea 
floor topography and oceanic gravity magnet force. Establish an 
oceanic surveying and mapping data base and create a basic 
oceanic map. 
  6) Research on New Industrial Surveying Technology 
  Focus on the development of precision industrial surveying 
technology and large-scale automated map-making technology. 
Research and develop special instruments and equipment for use 
in industrial surveying. 
  7) Research Multi-Purpose New Cadastral Surveying Technology 
  Concentrate on the development of light-weight low-altitude 
large-scale machine-aided cadastral surveying technology and 
multi-function urban cadastral information systems. 
  8) Research the Real-Time Surveying Technology of Industrial 
Control and Engineering Dynamic Monitoring and Testing 
  Concentrate on the development of CCD planar array 
synchronized solid digital photographic systems and robotic 
vision systems. 
  9) Research the Basic Technical Parameters of China's 
Surveying Satellites, High-Resolution Multi-Band Intelligent 
Sensor, and Cultural Spectrum. 
  10) Research on Basic Surveying and Mapping Theory 
  Examine such theories as global geodesy, relativistic 
geodesy, geographic terminology, theoretical cartography, 
remote-sensing imaging theory, atmospheric refraction, image 
reproduction, recent adjustment, and other theories and methods. 
  11) Research on Soft Science in Surveying and Mapping 
  Concentrate on the research of surveying and mapping 
industrial policy, development strategy, industrial management, 
technology and equipment policy, commercialization of production 
units, the use of surveying and mapping achievements in return 
for payment, and other theories, rules, and regulations. 
<H5>  Standardization and Metrology </H5>
  Standardization and metrology are the technical base of 
national economic and social development. 
  Standardization involves every area of the national economy 
and S&amp;T. It should develop at the same pace and in 
coordination 
with all branches of S&amp;T in order to close the gap between 
itself and that of S&amp;T overall. That way the application of 
S&amp;T 
achievements in production would be accelerated and S&amp;T 
would be 
more closely linked to all the important elements of modernized 
mass production, developing organic ties and producing optimal 
results. 
  Metrology is an advanced basic discipline that serves all 
quarters of society. People in metrology study all theoretical 
and practical matters relating to measurement, including 
physical quantity unit and the theory of quantitative value; the 
physical quantitative unit and the establishment, duplication, 
and transmission of its bench-marks and standards; the method 
and execution of measurement and estimation of its accuracy; and 
the measuring of physical constant quantities, materials, and 
material characteristics. 
  In the next 2 to 3 decades, not only must we solve the 
problems relating to measurement standards and testing 
technology in order to improve labor productivity and product 
quality, lower consumption, and improve social security, but we 
must also develop new measurement theories and methods and work 
out major measurement standards and testing technology in 
scientific research and high-tech industry. 
  1. Development Strategy and Goals 
  1) Development Strategy Standardization and the development 
of the science of measurement should be guided by the strategic 
focus of national economic development. Adhere to the strategic 
thinking of combining service with improvement, with the former 
driving the latter. Provide social and economic development and 
S&amp;T development with an effective guarantee of 
standardization 
and measurement technology. 
  In the past S&amp;T work in standardization emphasized 
setting or 
revising standards. Now the emphasis should shift from 
increasing the number of standards to adjusting the structure of 
standards and setting up a sound standardized system; from the 
standardization of traditional industries to a push for the 
standardization of high-tech and high-tech industries, so that 
standardization proceed in tandem with high-tech development as 
much as possible; and from simple technical standardization to 
paying equal attention to technical standardization and 
managerial standardization. Double research on the 
standardization of modern management to provide a standardized 
managerial system and a set of standards uniform across the 
nation to every sector of the national economy to help them 
modernize the management of social and economic information, 
automate the office, and formulate macro supplementary policies. 
At the same time, every effort should be made to begin research 
on the standardization of technology common to both civilian and 
military users in order to lay a unified technical foundation 
for the joint use of technology by both the military and 
civilians and making technology interchangeable between war-time 
uses and peace-time uses. 
  The S&amp;T of measurement is a broad and 
technology-intensive 
discipline. Since the requirements of each field are different, 
we must differentiate between the various levels and adopt 
different development policies and strategic focus. As far as 
industrial and agricultural production, energy, transportation 
and communications, foreign trade, public security, and the 
people's living are concerned, we should marshall the resources 
of all regions, trades, and professions with a view toward 
raising labor productivity, improving quality, and lowering 
consumption and, given unified values of measurement, work 
mighty hard to develop testing technology, perfect legal 
measuring techniques, and solve practical problems by delving 
deep into reality. As far as key national projects, Sino-foreign 
joint ventures, environmental protection, and medicine and 
public health are concerned, the measurement testing center of 
the region or industry involved should take the lead in ensuring 
coherent measurement and testing. Measurement scientific 
research organs at the national levels shall expand research on 
the basic and commonly-used technology of the science of 
measurement, identifying key areas for scientific probing, and 
work on resolving the major measurement issues in energy, new 
materials, and high-tech industries. We must develop and improve 
China's scientific measurement system. While making sure that 
quantitative values in every sector in China are consistent with 
their international counterparts and contribute to national 
economic, social, and S&amp;T development, we must work to keep 
measurement technology developing slightly ahead of S&amp;T to 
build 
up the necessary measurement base for sustained economic, social 
and S&amp;T development in the next century. 
  2) Strategic Goals 
  Standardization 
  a) Speed up the adoption of international standards and 
advanced international standards by the various industries and 
sectors. Raise the level of production technology in China. 
Expedite technical progress in enterprises and improve their 
product quality and international competitiveness. Goal: by the 
end of the Eighth Five-Year Plan, 80 percent of national 
standards and industrial standards will be international 
standards and advanced international standards; by the year 2000 
all national standards and industrial standards will basically 
be international standards and advanced international standards; 
by the year 2020 national standards will have reached the 
international level, with some of them being incorporated into 
the body of international standards. 
  Formulate and enforce a series of energy-saving standards 
and 
pursue enterprise energy balance standardization. By the year 
2000 the efficacy of some energy-saving and energy-consuming 
equipment should come up to advanced world standards at the time. 
  b) Build up a technological basis for standardization before 
the year 2000 in such high-tech fields and high-tech industries 
as microelectronics, information, automation, biology, new 
materials, energy, space technology, laser, oceanography, and 
human engineering, going all out to set up a standardized system 
in pacesetting fields such as spaceflight, information, and 
human engineering. By 2020, a coherent standardized system that 
is suited to China's national conditions and meets the 
requirements of the international marketplace should be in place. 
  In accordance with the interlinked standards of the open 
international system, we should draw up and perfect a computer 
data information and network standards agreement. Complete the 
OSI high-level agreement and CIMS model system programming and 
launch system uniform standards testing. Put together the basics 
of a Chinese language information processing standardized 
system; some standards relating to Chinese character coding and 
Chinese character parameters shall be incorporated into the body 
of international standards. 
  c) Set up a system of agricultural standards by 2000 in 
order 
to lay a technological foundation for the transformation of 
agriculture into a modern sustained agriculture based on modern 
S&amp;T and management. By the year 2020, there should be a 
coherent 
system of agricultural standards with Chinese characteristics. 
  d) Accelerate research on the standardization of modern 
social management. Before the year 2000 we should have in place 
a standardization system for national economic information 
management and statistics, banking, wages and labor, archives, 
and intelligence and indexing. Bring about computer-aided 
management and equipment computerization. Establish a unified 
coding system for enterprises, institutions, and social organs 
across the nation. Create a bar code standardized system as a 
new data management technology for economic management and 
international trade. By the year 2020 such technology should 
come up to advanced world standards at the time. 
  e) Step up theoretical and applied research on 
standardization to technically ensure balanced development 
between the economy, on the one hand, and S&amp;T, on the other. 
By 
2000 there should be in place a standardization system which is 
based on national standards and is structurally sound and of a 
high standard. By 2020 China's standardization system should be 
as good as any in the world. 
  Measurement 
  a) Keep up with developments in measurement science and 
catch 
up with the rest of the world. 
  -- Establish our position on research on units of 
measurement. Fight for the place and voice that is due us in the 
process of forming a new international system of units. Enhance 
China's international reputation and protect its legitimate 
rights and interests. 
  -- As the international measurement standards system is 
being 
overhauled, we should master new developments, both theoretical 
and technological, in the natural standard system so that we 
basically keep pace with the establishment of an international 
natural standards system, at the same time struggling to take 
the lead in some areas of research work. 
  -- Reform the traditional value quantity transmission 
method. 
Reduce the number of transmission levels and ensure the quality 
of transmission. Introduce and implement the measurement 
assurance plan in the transmission of the major quantity values 
in several key areas before the year 2000. The plan should 
largely be introduced across the board before 2020 to advance 
the quality of quantity value transmission in China to a level 
approaching or matching the international standard. 
  -- By 2020 we should have come up with a host of major 
original achievements in the field of measurement that are of a 
breakthrough nature and are influential in the international 
measurement science community. 
  b) The development of engineering measurement and testing 
technology should basically meet the urgent need of ensuring 
product quality and increasing productivity. As far as the 
quality parameters of China's key products are concerned, we 
should have completed a majority of the necessary engineering 
measurement standards before 2000 and, by the year 2020, 
essentially put together an engineering measurement standards 
system. As for imported or Chinese-made automotive production 
lines, by 2000 we should basically be able to meet the need for 
on-line measurement and on-line calibration in major projects. 
By 2020 we shall have mastered a number of on-line measurement 
and calibration technologies. 
  c) Provide technical support for the development of key 
sectors in the national economy. 
  -- Agriculture. Before 2000 complete the reform of the unit 
of measurement for land area, putting an end to the present 
confusion in land area units and laying the most essential base 
for unifying the measurement of farmland area and calculating 
crop output. By 2000, the basics of an agricultural measurement 
system shall be in place, including soil analysis, 
meteorological and ecological observation, biochemical analysis, 
related (biochemical, nutritional) standard materials, and 
agricultural radiation dosages. This system shall be expanded 
and improved through 2020 to provide the modernization of 
Chinese agriculture with advanced measuring services. 
  -- Energy. Develop measuring and testing technology for 
energy transportation, energy consumption, and equipment 
efficacy. By 2000 we should have created an energy measuring 
system centered upon the energy measuring station and buttressed 
by large enterprises. Meanwhile, we should have resolved the 
measuring and testing problems that have appeared in the 
extraction of new energy. Continue to substantiate many 
standards for new energy sources and the appropriate advanced 
testing methods through 2020, forming a fairly complete energy 
measurement system. 
  -- Transportation and communications. Before 2000 complete 
the standards for harbor measuring equipment. Develop the 
technical means for automatic, rapid, and continuous weighing. 
Increase loading efficiency and catch up with advanced world 
standards by 2020. Ensure an increase in transport capacity and 
traffic volume as well as improvements in transportation safety 
in a measurement sense. (Unify measuring standards, enhance 
measurement precision, and inspect measuring instruments and 
tools on a mandatory basis.) 
  -- Materials. Provide a complete range of basic services for 
the improvement of the quality of major raw materials and the 
development of new ones (for instance, by analyzing and testing 
the various characteristics of the material, standard materials, 
and standard data). Use the technical base of measurement 
research institutions to set up a material performance testing 
service center. By 2020 our testing capability shall come up to 
advanced world standards. 
  d) To ensure and improve the quality and standards of 
measurement tools in the nation, there shall be testing 
equipment to gauge the performance of measurement instruments 
before the year 2000, with some equipment matching world 
standards. By 2020 the equipment should match world standards, 
with a measuring instrument quantity assessment system that can 
evaluate a complete range of tools. This will provide reliable 
technical support for the commercialization and 
industrialization of China's achievements in the field of 
measurement research and the drive by measurement instrument 
makers to send their products into the international marketplace 
in volume. 
  e) The state shall impose mandatory inspection on measuring 
tools in environmental monitoring, security and protection, and 
public health and medicine, with the standardization of 
measuring instruments in those fields being completed by 2000. 
By 2020 not only must such mandatory inspection be commonly 
practiced in China, but new measuring tools must also have been 
brought under similar inspection to provide an internally 
unified testing basis for global cooperation in environmental 
protection, public health and medicine, and the prevention of 
natural disasters. 
  2. Major Tasks and Priority Projects 
  Standardization 
  To achieve the development objectives in the field of 
standardization, we must promote the coordinated development 
between the national economy and S&amp;T. The following major 
research projects shall be completed in the next 2 to 3 decades: 
  a) Research on Standardization Technology in Agriculture 
(Including Forestry, Animal Husbandry, and Fishery) 
  Launch the standardization of the comprehensive development, 
comprehensive utilization, and protection of agricultural 
resources. Establish an agricultural comprehensive 
standardization system. Step up research on agricultural 
mechanization and agricultural engineering standardization, on 
setting standards on seeds, improved breeds and pesticides, and 
on the standardization of the sound use of grain. 
  b) Research on Standardization in High-Tech and High-Tech 
Industries 
  Formulate standards for microelectronics, biotechnology, 
automation technology, new materials, and new energy. Create 
standardization systems for nuclear power safety, spacecraft 
reliability engineering, and software engineering reliability 
management. Research and develop a series of standards for 
marine technology. Set up a standardization system for the 
production of high-tech products and the production evaluation 
of new drugs. Research and develop series standards for human 
engineering. 
  c) Research on Information Technology Standardization 
  -- research data communication and networking standards and 
agreement for the interlinked seven-tier open system. Conduct 
standardization testing on OSI high-level agreement. Press ahead 
with the research and application of standards for the open 
miyuejiani system. 
  -- Research and develop a Chinese-language information 
technology standards series revolving around Chinese-character 
information processing. Set standards for the word codes and 
word patterns of the languages of minority nationalities as well 
as their imprint technology. 
  -- Create a standardization system for computer integrated 
manufacturing system (CIMS). Complete standard formulation for 
the business decision-making system (BDMS), computer-aided 
design and manufacturing (CAD/ CAM), flexible manufacturing 
system (FMS), and other models for reference. 
  d) Research on the Standardization of Social Modernized 
Management. 
  Establish a standardization system for national economic 
information and statistics, electronic banking, and personnel 
and wage management. Establish a national uniform code 
identification system for enterprises, institutions, and social 
organizations. Establish a bar code standardization system, a 
standardization system for office automation, standardization in 
the service industry and environmental protection, an 
standardization system for the comprehensive utilization of 
natural resources, standardization of the criteria of fixed 
assets investment projects, and code standardization for the 
criteria system of land and resources information system. 
Establish a national economic information analysis, statistical, 
and accounting standardization system. 
  e) Standardization of Energy-Conserving Technology 
  Develop optimal matching standards for wind machines and 
water pump systems, and standards series for the economical 
operation of speed-regulating alternate current machines. Study 
new wall-building materials standards. Standardize enterprise 
energy balance and energy auditing criteria. Standardize 
energy-conserving equipment, energy-saving materials, and energy 
products. 
  f) Research on Basic and Applied Standardization Research on 
standardization theory and scientific and rational 
standardization system. 
  Standardization of terminology and graphic symbols. 
Enterprise standardization. The standardization of new product 
R&amp;D. Integration of electrical machinery and tools. 
Standardization of industrial goods stable batch process 
technology. Standardization of entire life-span equipment. Set 
up a work place safety standards system and electrical appliance 
safety standards system. Work on standards for textile products 
for either decorative or industrial uses. Research performance 
standards for textiles and apparel. Intensify standardization 
research on key national projects. 
  Measurement 
  To achieve the strategic objectives in measurement, we must 
ensure that quantitative values in all areas of society attain 
accuracy and consistency both at home and internationally, 
revolving around measurement science and testing technology. 
Taking into consideration both the systems nature of the science 
of measurement and the wide-ranging scope and diversity of its 
development and application, the key tasks fall into two groups. 
One group has to do with the development of the discipline 
itself, while the other is oriented to the national economy. 
  a) Development of the Science of Measurement and Testing 
Technology -- Research the creation of a system of measuring 
units based on the theory of relativity and quantum mechanics. 
Study the relations between fundamental physical constant and 
physical dimension when it comes to unit formation. Increase the 
measurement accuracy of the speed of light, electrical charge, 
Planck constant, gravitational constant, AVOGADRO constant, and 
other physical constants. Study the effects of the new unit 
system on S&amp;T and national economy and methods of effecting 
the 
transition from the current unit system to the new one. 
  -- Study ways of using the Josephson effect to establish 
voltage standards and using the quantized Hall effect to set up 
an electric resistance standard. Develop a new atomic clock 
using the ion trap mode-selecting method, raising the precision 
of frequency standard by an additional 2 to 3 numerical levels. 
Study optical frequency measuring method. Use the gas 
thermometer to conduct absolute temperature measurements. Use 
the low-temperature radiometer to enhance the sensitivity of the 
photometer. Conduct experiments in which natural bench marks are 
used to monitor mass object bench marks. Explore ways of 
establishing the molar bench mark. Study the technology of 
making natural bench marks instruments and ease the concern that 
state bench marks may be destroyed by war or natural disasters. 
Research and develop second-level natural bench marks. Broaden 
the application of natural bench mark technology in precision 
measurement in all areas. Alternately, set up a new national 
measurement bench mark system based on natural bench marks. 
  -- Develop measurement error theories. Put forward new 
criteria for assessing measuring capability and the quality of 
measurement work. Investigate the origins and propagation 
principles of measuring error. Probe the alternate theoretical 
limit of measurement precision. 
  -- Develop a calibration echelon theory based on a 
measurement guarantee concept. Research a new way to unify 
calibration. Study ways of making physical quantity convertible 
into frequency quantity and vice versa. Experiment with the 
communication pairing method of calibration. Study the 
conversion of ground domain and space domain into frequency 
domain and methods of the frequency domain processing of 
measuring information. By 2020 a new calibration echelon system 
should be in place. 
  -- Conduct an extensive study on setting measurement 
standards for engineering parameters. Establish an engineering 
measurement standards system for major industrial products such 
as large precision instruments, major technical equipment, 
microelectronic parts and components, space and aviation 
products, basic industrial materials and durable consumer goods. 
Establish wide-ranging international conversion channels and 
enter into a number of bilateral or multilateral international 
agreements, recognizing the results of an inspection or test. 
  -- Use new technology like laser, superconductivity, 
computer, fiber optics, and networking to develop new 
measurement principles and measuring methods. Research and 
develop new instruments and facilities for precision 
measurement. Study automation of the measuring process. Research 
expert systems in the main specialties in measurement and the 
artificial intelligence of measuring instruments. Establish an 
experimental base for measuring sensors and an integrated 
performance assessment system for such sensors. 
  -- Broaden the field of measurement. Study the measuring 
methods for biomass, chem-mass, psycho-mass, and physio-mass. 
Push back quantitative limitations. Closely revolving around the 
development of key sectors like agriculture, energy, materials, 
and information, we should study the measuring issues of such 
measuring ranges as super high, super-large, micro, and very low. 
  2) When it comes to application, we should target the 
requirements of the national development priority areas and the 
new industries and concentrate on tackling the following major 
issues: 
  -- Plan the development of agricultural measuring technology 
comprehensively. Develop measuring standards for agricultural 
metallurgical parameters. Unify meteorological observation 
magnitude. Develop a soil testing method and comprehensive 
assessment system that can be readily popularized. Provide 
accurate measuring tools for seed selection and preservation. 
Ensure the enforcement of food processing standards. The 
ultimate goal: the establishment of agricultural measuring 
systems required by modern agriculture. 
  -- Study calorific value testing methods and measuring 
standards for energy sources like petroleum and coal. Develop 
calibration methods for the appropriate standard material and 
analytical and testing equipment. Develop accurate measuring and 
testing methods for the conversion and comprehensive utilization 
of petroleum and coal. Develop technology for the manufacture 
and installation of large power generation equipment in order to 
improve the quality of its processing and operations. Develop 
nuclear power safety monitoring methods to ensure safety. 
Consider popularizing the use of boiler heat efficiency testing 
methods and electrical machinery power factor monitoring 
methods. Establish efficiency assessment methods and a quality 
control index for energy-saving products. Develop a complete set 
of energy-saving technology. 
  -- Provide solar spectral energy distribution and the 
geographical distribution of solar energy in China. Determine 
the spectral efficacy of solar energy conversion materials. Set 
standards for testing solar energy conversion materials. Study 
testing methods or nuclear fusion experimentation to provide 
testing data determining the conditions and efficacy for nuclear 
fusion. Develop sample testing technology for wind energy and 
renewable energy sources to increase the utilization rate of 
wind energy and the conversion rate of renewable energy sources. 
  -- Develop methods to analyze and test the composition and 
structure of semiconductors, metals, polymers, and ceramics. 
Develop techniques to test the dynamic, magnetic, and chemical 
properties of materials. Create a data base containing 
information on the physical and chemical properties of the major 
materials used in China. Develop calibration methods for the 
standard materials and material testing equipment. 
  -- Research and develop large harbor measuring equipment, 
including track scales, vehicle scales, and electronic crane. 
Unify the calibration of harbor connections. Improve measurement 
precision to reduce errors and losses. Research the accurate 
measurement of the carrying capacity of railroads, automobiles, 
and bridges. Tap carrying capacity potential. Develop testing 
technology for the operating parameters of automobiles and ships 
to provide data to increase operating efficiency. Study both the 
real-time and the external measuring technology for pipe transit 
parameters to provide a testing basis for operations control. 
Improve the calibration precision of aviation safety inspection 
to provide maximum measuring guarantee for aviation safety. 
  -- Unify the reliability testing and assessment methods for 
the computer and its terminal equipment. Develop assessment 
methods for the quality of computer software. Raise the time 
synchronized precision in communications. Establish standards 
for testing submicron integrated circuit, single-membrane 
optional fiber technology parameters, and finished products. 
  -- Master the on-site calibration of the monitoring 
instruments for environmental pollution, earthquakes, and other 
natural disasters. Unify quantitative measurements and increase 
the consistency between the results of different monitoring 
methods and between one stratum and the next. Establish special 
measuring standards for items under mandatory inspection in the 
field of medicine and public health. Develop assessment methods 
for the parameter calibration and comprehensive reliability of 
complex diagnostic and therapeutic equipment, ultrasound, 
radiation, biomagnetism, and bio-electric detection equipment in 
order to ensure diagnostic accuracy and the safety and 
effectiveness of the treatment. Establish a calibration system 
for all sorts of high-sensitivity safety testing instruments. 
  -- Centralize planning but distribute across the nation 
testing bases with a man-made simulated environment for a 
variety of measuring instruments. The responsibility of the 
testing bases is to conduct research on the reliability of 
measuring tools and assessment methods. First and foremost, they 
shall ensure the quality of measuring tools used in regular 
inspection as well as those in mandatory inspection. At the same 
time, the bases should provide testing services for the 
development of new measuring tools. Develop calibration devices 
for environmental testing equipment. Standardize the criteria 
for the environmental testing of measuring tools. 
  -- Participate in experiments and research in physics. 
Examine and verify the general theory of relativity and study 
the method of gravitational waves. Research a testing technology 
for the manufacturing and experimental research of the 
high-energy accelerator and other large experimentation 
equipment. Examine plasma diagnostic technology and the methods 
used to test material properties in the vicinity of the 
high-temperature superconducting transition point. Develop 
tunable lasers and master spectral analysis technology. Conduct 
research on opto-electronic switches. Master spectral analytical 
technology. Master the methods for testing the performance of 
optoelectronic switches. Enhance the performance of high Tc 
SQUID and use it in detecting weak electric current and magnetic 
fields. 
<H5>  The Ten-Year Plan of Scientific and Technological </H5>
Development of the PRC and Outline of the Eighth Five-Year Plan 
(1991-1995-2000) 
  Introduction 
  Modern S&amp;T has been developing by leaps and bounds. Its 
conversion into real productive forces has been just as rapid, 
fully validating the scientific thesis that ``S&amp;T are the 
foremost productive forces.'' Faced with fierce competition in 
global S&amp;T, we must go all out to further China's S&amp;T, 
taking 
special pains to develop high-tech and its industries. There is 
no other way to revitalize the economy, fuel all-round social 
development, and make our way into the ranks of advanced nations 
in the world. The next decade will be a critical period in the 
development of China's economy and society. Only by relying on 
S&amp;T unwaveringly can we achieve the magnificent goals of 
economic construction and social development and realize our 
long-cherished wish of vitalizing a people and bringing 
prosperity to a nation. 
  Since the 3d Plenum of the 11th CPC Central Committee, 
S&amp;T in 
China has scored great achievements that have caught world 
attention. The party and the state have formulated a string of 
policies that are consistent with the trend of global S&amp;T 
development as well a the conditions in China, approved and 
implemented a host of S&amp;T plans, including projects to tackle 
key S&amp;T problems, the ``Spark Plan,'' ``863,'', the ``Torch 
Plan,'' industrial experimentation, and the popularization and 
diffusion of S&amp;T achievements and new technology. In all, 
China 
has come up with more than 120,000 S&amp;T achievements, solving 
technical problems important to economic development, defense 
build-up, and social development, generating over 280 billion 
yuan in profits, several times the total for the preceding 30 
years. Today China boasts a national S&amp;T army of over 10 
million 
people and an S&amp;T system with a complete lineup of 
disciplines, 
constituting a formidable S&amp;T force that can attack difficult 
S&amp;T projects. S&amp;T reform has established a place for the 
commercialization of technical achievements in all society. 
S&amp;T 
work is now characterized by in-depth planning and organic ties. 
S&amp;T organs in the development mode orient themselves to the 
economy and are in the process of being transformed. A new 
S&amp;T 
planning system that combines planned management with market 
regulation is taking shape. The mechanism of S&amp;T work as 
well as 
its framework and look have undergone profound and historic 
changes. All of that has laid a solid foundation for S&amp;T 
development in the 1990's. 
  Even as it has proved remarkably beneficial economically and 
socially, S&amp;T work has also run into some problems and 
difficulties, notably the following: the lack of overall 
planning and coordination in economic reform, S&amp;T reform, and 
other reforms; the absence of pressure and drive to rely on 
S&amp;T 
progress for economic development; under-investment in S&amp;t by 
the state, while the channels of investment by the financial 
community and enterprises have yet to be widened; most S&amp;T 
personnel are underpaid, and S&amp;T workers in old liberated 
areas, 
areas inhabited by minorities, border regions, impoverished 
areas, and three-front areas have many problems that must be 
resolved urgently. The S&amp;T management system must be 
straightened out. 
  The ``Ten-Year Plan of S&amp;T Development'' and ``Outline 
of the 
Eighth Five-Year Plan'' have been formulated in a spirit of 
pragmatism and striving for progress and in accordance with the 
spirit of the 7th Plenum of the 13th CPC Central Committee, the 
magnificent goals laid down in the ``Ten-Year National Economic 
and Social Development Plan and an Outline of the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan,'' and the development blueprint set forth in the 
``Medium- and Long-Term National S&amp;T Development Plan.'' They 
were formulated after we comprehensively analyzed the demands 
placed on S&amp;T progress by economic and social development and 
global economic and scientific development trends, taking into 
account the S&amp;T forces and solid work foundation already in 
existence as well as the problems and difficulties facing us. 
  To realize the objectives of struggle and accomplish the 
priority tasks in the outline, all sectors and all localities 
must work out an appropriate S&amp;T development plan in 
accordance 
with the demands of this ``outline'' and the reality in their 
own sector or locality. 
<H5>  1. The Goals and Guiding Principles of S&amp;T Development </H5>
1991-2000 
  1) Development Goals 
  S&amp;T work in China in the next 10 years must base itself 
on 
the goals and plans of economic and social development, abide by 
the principles of S&amp;T development itself, and orient itself 
to 
the main battleground of economic development, namely, 
contributing to the redoubling of the national economy. We must 
go all out to develop high-tech and high-tech industries, 
conduct basic research steadily and endlessly, centralize 
planning, and allocate resources rationally so that we can 
develop in depth and spur S&amp;T development in China across the 
board. 
  -- Organize forces and tackle key technical problems in the 
production technology of industry and agriculture, the 
modernization of equipment, and social development. Work hard to 
spread S&amp;T achievements, expedite the technological 
transformation of traditional enterprises, raise the technical 
and managerial standards, and make every effort to increase the 
contribution rate of S&amp;T progress to economic growth from the 
current 30 percent or so to about 50 percent. 
  -- Develop high-tech vigorously. Speed up the 
commercialization, industrialization, and internationalization 
of high-tech achievements. Strive to make high-tech industrial 
development zones a success. Work hard to increase annual 
high-tech output value to more than 400 billion yuan within a 
decade, accounting for 8 percent or so of the nation's total 
exports, up from the current 4 percent. 
  -- Step up basic research. Given China's actual needs and 
its 
S&amp;T edge and economic strength, we should go all out to 
approach 
or match advanced international standards in some areas of basic 
research. Develop a host of world-class basic research 
institutions. 
  -- Give top priority to the nurturing and utilization of 
qualified personnel to develop an outstanding S&amp;T corps that 
can 
compete globally. 
  -- Gradually establish a new S&amp;T system that meets the 
basic 
requirements of the development of a socialist planned commodity 
economy, that can take advantage of the combined strengths of 
both planned management and market regulation, that is 
consistent with S&amp;T development principles, and that is 
closely 
related to the economy, giving each other mutual support. 
  -- Adhere to the principle of combining the absorption and 
assimilation of imported technology with self-development so 
that major equipment and whole sets of technology in the leading 
sectors of the economy can basically hold their own within the 
country and match foreign standards of the mid-1980's. 
  2) Guiding Principles 
  -- Implement unwaveringly the strategic policy: ``Economic 
development must depend on S&amp;T, S&amp;T work must orient 
itself to 
economic development.'' Insist that S&amp;T be the foremost 
productive forces. Promote a close union between S&amp;T and the 
economy, making the most of S&amp;T as a guide and engine of the 
economy and society. 
  -- Firmly implement the strategic concept of ``develop 
high-tech and industrialize.'' Concentrate forces on a few major 
high-tech fields and work vigorously to come up to the 
international standard and narrow the gap with the rest of the 
world. In a small number of areas where China has an edge, we 
should innovate diligently and try hard to catch up, scrambling 
to make significant breakthroughs. Take strong measures to speed 
up the creation of high-tech industries. 
  -- Implement the party's policy of ``value knowledge and 
respect qualified personnel'' firmly. Fully mobilize the 
initiative, enthusiasm, and creativity of vast numbers of S&amp;T 
personnel. 
  -- Persevere in deepening S&amp;T reform steadfastly. 
Establish a 
new mechanism that would help bring about S&amp;T progress, 
economic 
prosperity, and social development, and is full of vitality and 
energy. 
  -- Adhere to the principle of combining self-development 
with 
technical import unwaveringly and put China's traditional 
industry on a new technological base. 
  -- Promote international S&amp;T cooperation and exchange 
firmly. 
Formulate and improve a S&amp;T cooperation policy in accordance 
with the principle of equality and mutual benefit. Create an 
environment conducive to international cooperation and globalize 
Chinese S&amp;T. 
  Implementing the above-mentioned principles across the board 
is the basic guarantee that Chinese S&amp;T would advance in the 
right direction, that our S&amp;T development goals would be 
achieved by the end of the century, and a new phase in S&amp;T 
work 
would be ushered in in the next century. 
<H5>  2. Major Tasks in S&amp;T 1991-2000 </H5>
  The mission of S&amp;T in the 1990's, first of all, is to 
orient 
itself to the main battlefield of economic development, use 
S&amp;T, 
particularly electronic information and automation technology, 
to transform traditional industries, thereby modernizing the 
production technology and equipment of traditional industries, 
make management and operations scientific, and establish a 
resource-saving economy that conserves both energy and land and 
is low on consumption. A second mission is to develop high-tech 
selectively and bring about its industrialization. A third 
mission of S&amp;T is to score significant achievements in 
adjusting 
the relations between man and nature, particularly in such areas 
as population control, environmental protection, and the sound 
development and utilization of resources and energy. Fourth, 
S&amp;T 
must make progress on basic research. 
  Even as we carry out the above-mentioned tasks, we must take 
great care to popularize and apply the achievements of S&amp;T so 
that potential wealth is translated into real material wealth. 
An all-out effort must be mounted to develop electronic 
technology to generate enormous economic benefits and turn it 
into a pillar of the national economy. 
  1) Agricultural and Rural S&amp;T 
  Agriculture is the cornerstone of the national economy. A 
sustained growth in agricultural output is critical to steady 
national economic development and will determine the success or 
failure of socialism in China. China's enormous population 
pressure and relative resource shortages, particularly the 
shortage of arable land and water, determine that it has no 
choice but to stay the course of using S&amp;T to vitalize 
agriculture. 
  The development goals of agricultural S&amp;T in the next 
decade 
are: 
  -- Develop and popularize S&amp;T achievements and advanced 
and 
suitable production technology assiduously. Boost the 
contribution rate of S&amp;T progress to agricultural growth from 
the present 35 percent to about 50 percent within this century. 
  -- Raise the S&amp;T standard in principal sectors of 
agriculture, including farming, forestry, animal husbandry, and 
fishery to match advanced world standards of the early 1980's. 
Continue our leadership in the world in a few selected areas 
where we have an edge, such as soil improvement, 
multi-resistance crop breeding, and crossbreeding. 
  -- Raise the technical and managerial standards of township 
and town enterprises and state-run farms, increasing the 
contribution by S&amp;T progress to the growth in the gross 
output 
value of township and town enterprises and state farms to 40-50 
percent. 
  -- Form a fairly coherent organizational structure and work 
system for agricultural S&amp;T R&amp;D. Put together the 
rudiments of a 
rural S&amp;T service system suited to the requirements of the 
development of a rural commodity economy. 
  Major Tasks: Stepping up the development and diffusion of 
S&amp;T 
achievements is the foremost task of agricultural workers in the 
next decade, particularly during the Eighth Five-Year Plan. By 
implementing the ``Spark Plan,'' ``Bumper Harvest Plan,'' 
``Torch Plan,'' achievement diffusion plans and other 
development and diffusion activities in all shapes and forms, 
the government shall boost the existing agricultural S&amp;T 
achievement popularization rate (including forestry and water 
conservancy) to 60 percent and above. 
  -- Concentrate our efforts on solving a number of major 
technical problems to promote agricultural development. 
  Breeding of good strains in agriculture, forestry, animal 
husbandry, and aquaculture. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan: 
About 250 new crop strains will be bred, increasing output by 
over 10 percent, and the varieties of major crops shall be 
changed once. In forestry, 120 new fine varieties of trees will 
be developed, increasing timber volume 10 to 20 percent. The 
popularization of improved breeds of livestock and aquatic 
products shall reach 30 percent. The focus of crop breeding is 
to increase output and resistance without sacrificing quality. 
The emphasis is on the development of grains, cotton, and 
oil-bearing crops. 
  Developing and tackling the problems of agricultural regions 
comprehensively: During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we shall 
concentrate on five low- and medium-yield regions, namely Huang 
Hai-Huai Hai, the Song-Nen-Yi three-river plain, northern arid 
region, loess plateau, and red and yellow earth in the south, 
and set up 50 agricultural development demonstration areas of 
different types where problems are to be tackled 
comprehensively. The intensive production of crops, timber, 
livestock, and aquatic products will be provided with 
cultivation and livestock-raising technology. This will 
scientifically and technically guarantee high yields in the five 
regions mentioned above with a combined area of about 800 
million mu of low- and medium-yield farmland. 
  The rational development, utilization, and protection of 
agricultural natural resources: In the next decade, we must 
develop and utilize agricultural natural resources rationally, 
limit the destruction of agricultural natural resources and the 
agricultural ecological environment, and step up the monitoring 
and evaluation of farmland, pasture, forests, beaches, and 
bodies of waters in earnest. Put forward rational development 
and comprehensive utilization plans. 
  Agricultural engineering and technology and the 
transportation, storage, processing, and comprehensive 
utilization of agricultural products: Develop agricultural 
technical installations. Research and develop mechanized 
equipment necessary for farming and aquaculture on an 
appropriate scale as well as the storage, transportation, and 
processing of agricultural products. Study comprehensive 
utilization technology for crop straw, rice cakes, waste 
residues, and waste liquids, which would increase fodder 
resources. 
  -- Stimulate S&amp;T progress in township and town 
enterprises 
and state farms. To guide township and town enterprises to rely 
on S&amp;T progress and follow the intensive development road, 
300 
pillar industries and 100 regional development zones are to be 
built during the Eighth Five-Year Plan, 100 sets of advanced and 
suitable equipment will be provided, and 2 million qualified 
S&amp;T 
workers in a variety of fields will be trained so that township 
and town enterprises and major industries like construction and 
building materials, textiles and apparel, light industry, and 
the fodder industry will gradually form themselves into groups 
and become progressively more professionalized and modernized. 
Select a number of state farms and collective farms as 
demonstration sites for intensive operation and scale 
management; work on transforming them into agricultural 
factories. 
  2) Energy 
  Energy is a key engine of national economic development. It 
is the mission of China's energy S&amp;T to provide the technical 
support for developing and conserving energy. 
  Development goals of energy S&amp;T in the next decade: 
  -- Fifty percent of the principal technical equipment in the 
energy industry should match advanced world standards of the 
late 1980's. Plants that exist in large numbers in many places 
should basically be able to hold their own within the nation. In 
the major energy-consuming industries, 20 percent of their 
equipment should be of the energy-efficient type. 
  The tasks in the Eighth Five-Year Plan are: 
  -- Solve the technical problems relating to large open-cut 
coal mines, coal layers which are hard to exploit, and deep coal 
seams. The emphasis is on comprehensive mechanized tunneling and 
support plants. Develop comprehensive mining technology and 
equipment for providing 10,000 tons of coal a day. Provide 
technical assurance against serious coal mine accidents. 
  -- To tap the resource potential of old coal fields in the 
east and exploit low-permeability oil deposits and oil and gas 
reserves in complex block oil-fields. We should perfect thick 
oil steam removal technology. Speed up the experiment involving 
the industrialization of polymer oil removal. Achieve major 
breakthroughs in three-time oil-recovery and horizontal well 
drilling technology. Develop technology for prospecting, 
recovering, and transporting oil and gas in deserts, on beaches, 
and offshore. 
  -- Develop advanced technology for building high-dam power 
stations and for navigation in conjunction with the development 
of hydro-electric resources in the upper reaches of the Huang 
He, the upper and middle reaches of the Chang Jiang and its 
tributaries, as well as the drainage area of the Hong Shui He. 
Develop large capacity high-parameter power generation 
technology and long-range power transmission technology. 
  -- Master the technology for building pressurized-water 
reactor nuclear power plants, with emphasis on the 600,000-kW 
power plant. Develop advanced nuclear fuel recycling technology. 
Complete the development of technology for building 200-megawatt 
low-temperature nuclear heat supply reactors. 
  -- Develop a variety of coal-burning and gasification 
technologies to suit different purposes. Develop technologies 
for the circulating fluidized-bed, pressurized fluidized-bed, 
and coal gasification combined power generation. 
  -- Develop a high-power wind generator, high-efficiency 
low-cost solar energy, and non-mineral energy sources such as 
hydrogen. 
  3) Transportation 
  Transportation is the artery of the national economy, 
indispensable to developing the economy and society and 
improving people's livelihood. 
  The goals and tasks of the development of transportation 
S&amp;T 
in the next decade are: 
  Provide S&amp;T guarantee that transportation capacity and 
transportation efficiency will increase significantly, with an 
increase in benefits; that Chinese transportation will gradually 
be based on modern infrastructural facilities, technology, 
equipment, and management; and that an integrated transportation 
system will be created. 
  -- Rail transport. Use advanced and appropriate technology 
to 
speed up new line construction and the overhauling of old 
railroad tracks. Gradually bring about motive power 
electrification, the popularization of the diesel engine, the 
modernization of transportation management, and the automation 
of transportation control. Further improve and diffuse 
heavy-duty transportation technology. Research and develop the 
second-generation heavy-duty unit train, MAGLEV train, and new 
locomotives. Develop a coherent high-speed train technology. 
During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we should increase the 
operating capacity of the heavy-duty unit train on the 
Dalian-Qinghuangdao line to 10,000 tons, and put the 160 
km-per-hour high-speed passenger and freight train into service. 
Also, we should launch research to develop the technology for 
building a special line for a 200 km-per-hour high-speed freight 
and passenger train. 
  -- Highway transportation. Gradually put together a system 
of 
national arterial roads made up of high-grade roads and highways 
to bring about high-speed high-efficiency motorized 
transportation, at the same time making possible the use of 
large trucks. Efforts should be made to achieve the 
modernization of road design, construction, repair and 
maintenance, management, and transportation services while 
continuing to perfect the technology for building high-grade 
asphalt highways. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we should 
concentrate on the development of technology to build cement or 
concrete road surfaces and the R&amp;D of road construction 
(maintenance) machinery, testing equipment, safety control 
systems, new highway passenger vehicles, and special trailers. 
  -- Waterborne transportation. Build an ocean-going fleet 
fitted with advanced technology and equipment. Form a 
high-efficiency north-south waterborne transportation system 
with large-tonnage vessels as its backbone. Work hard to develop 
shipping on the main tributaries of the river systems of the 
Chang Jiang, Zhu Jiang, and Heilong Jiang. Develop and 
popularize container transportation, the transportation of large 
quantities of bulk cargo, mixed passenger-cargo transportation, 
and barge transportation on inland waterways. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, we should concentrate on the development of 
technology for dredging the waterways in the estuaries and a 
host of essential dredging equipment. Research and develop 
high-speed passenger vessels for inland rivers, large 
shallow-water vessels, and self-loading vessels. Develop 
high-efficiency, low-energy consumption harbor loading and 
unloading equipment and maritime transportation control systems. 
  -- Civil aviation. Achieve breakthroughs in the design and 
manufacture of trunk carriers and helicopters. By the end of 
this century, China should have the basic capacity to design and 
manufacture 150- to 200-seat trunk carriers and light 
helicopters. Continue to develop and refine technology to ensure 
aviation safety and operating management technology. 
  -- Pipeline transportation. Master the technology for 
transporting a range of petroleum products through pipelines 
under adverse conditions or special conditions. Achieve hermetic 
transportation and optimal transportation. Build a system of 
pipelines capable of transporting a substantial volume of coal 
each year. Research focuses in the Eighth Five-Year Plan: 
Long-distance large-diameter pipeline transportation technology 
and equipment to carry oil from the deserts of Xinjiang. 
  4) Raw Materials 
  Raw materials are the cornerstone of national economic 
development. The goals of the development of the S&amp;T of raw 
materials in the next decades are: 
  -- Increase varieties. Improve quality. Adjust the mix of 
varieties. As far as raw materials are concerned, their variety 
and quality must come up to advanced world standards of the 
early 1980's in order to meet the requirements of the 
development of all industries and trades in the national economy. 
  -- Expedite the absorption and assimilation of imported 
technology and innovation. More and more petroleum equipment 
must be made in China. The production technology and whole 
plants of large raw material enterprises shall match the most 
advanced in the world in the 1980's. 
  -- Use microelectronics technology to overhaul raw materials 
traditional production technology. Electronics technology shall 
be widely adopted in the next decade in product design, 
production automatic control, and management in large and 
mid-sized enterprises in such industries as iron and steel, 
nonferrous metals, chemical industry, petrochemicals, and 
building materials. 
  -- Develop technology for the comprehensive utilization of 
resources and other technology that can save energy and lower 
consumption, thus providing technical support for the 
transformation of the traditional technologies of the raw 
materials industry. 
  Missions in the Eighth Five-Year Plan: 
  -- Iron and steel industry. Concentrate on solving the 
S&amp;T 
problems related to ore mining, smelting, and rolling. Create 
breakthroughs in new mining technology, blast furnace oxygen 
intensified iron making, direct current and plasma steel-making, 
and medium-width continuous casting rolling technology. The 
variety and quality of steel products should be such that they 
can meet the requirements of the development of industries like 
energy, transportation, machinery, electronics, light and 
textile industries. 
  -- Nonferrous metals. Develop energy-saving comprehensive 
technology focusing on aluminum and technology for the 
comprehensive utilization of multiple inter-grown metals to 
provide technical support for the development of lead, zinc, and 
copper. Study multiple processing technology for resources like 
tungsten which are found in abundance in China. 
  -- Chemical industry. Make the development of advanced 
large-scale production technology the top priority, focusing on 
the domestication of the production technology and equipment of 
such industries as petrochemical, chemical fertilizer, plastics, 
and agricultural plastic film. Speed up innovation in industries 
turning out chemical industrial products like agricultural 
pesticides and dyes and go all out to develop high-grade, 
precision, and fine products, so that about 70 percent of 
chemical industrial products reach international and advanced 
foreign standards. 
  -- Building materials. Concentrate on the R&amp;D and 
vigorous 
diffusion of energy-saving technology and residual heat 
utilization technology. Reduce energy consumption in the 
building materials industry significantly. Develop multiple 
processing technology for non-metallic materials. 
  5) Machinery 
  The machine industry provides equipment to the national 
economy, a key gauge of a nation's S&amp;T level and economic 
strength. 
  The S&amp;T development goals of the machine industry in 
the next 
decade and its missions in the Eighth Five-Year Plan are as 
follows: 
  --Concentrate on the development of whole sets of technical 
equipment and plants in such key areas as agriculture, energy, 
transportation, and raw materials. Accelerate the absorption and 
assimilation of imported technology and equipment. Enhance our 
capacity for self-development, self-design, and 
self-manufacturing so as to achieve the commercialized 
production of large hydropower stations, thermal power plants, 
power transmission and transformation facilities, and other 
equipment in metallurgy, mining, and chemical industry, with the 
overall technical standard catching up with the world standards 
of the late 1980's. Focus in the Eighth Five-Year Plan: Master 
and develop 300,000- and 600,000-kW sub-critical thermal power 
plants, 600,000-kW nuclear power generating plants, 
500,000-voltage alternating current and direct current power 
transmission and transforming equipment, large continuous 
rolling and large mining equipment, large chemical fertilizer 
manufacturing plants, and equipment capable of producing 300,000 
tons of ethylene each year. 
  -- Research and develop basic machinery and related basic 
parts. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, concentrate on 
mastering the technology essential to the design and manufacture 
of basic machinery and parts and components. Improve product 
quality and the technical standard to meet the requirements of 
the development of the machinery and equipment industry. 
  -- Develop technology for the integration of electrical 
machinery as well as advanced design and manufacturing 
technology and testing and sensing technology. Make a 
breakthrough in key simulating technology in the integration of 
electrical machinery during the Eighth Five-Year Plan. Develop 
and popularize numerical control machines, number-displaying 
measuring instruments, and automatic instruments, etc., where 
electronic information technology meets precision machinery, 
thus significantly lifting the technical standard and quality of 
mechanical products. By 2000, 30 to 40 percent of the major 
electrical mechanical products shall reach advanced world 
standards of the 1990's, integrated electrical mechanical 
products shall account for about 15 percent of all electrical 
mechanical products, and enterprises having adopted CAM 
technology shall account for 5 to 10 percent of all large and 
mid-sized enterprises. 
  -- Raise the design and manufacturing standards in the 
automobile and shipbuilding industries. By the end of the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, the automobile industry shall be using mostly 
Chinese-made parts and components. The principal types of 
civilian-use ships such as tankers and off-shore oil platforms 
shall be performing on a par with those in the rest of the world. 
  6) Light and Textile Industries 
  Light and textile industries are an important component of 
the national economy, a key source of state accumulation funds 
and foreign exchange. 
  The development goals of the light and textile industries in 
the next 10 years are: 
  Intensify the research and development of new technology, 
new 
processes, and new products. Increase the added value of 
products. Accelerate the technical transformation of small and 
mid-sized enterprises and lower their consumption of energy and 
materials. By the year 2000, the technical equipment of key 
sectors of the light and textile industries should be as 
advanced as the best in the world in the 1980's, while a major 
effort should be made to approach or match standards of the 
early 1990's in the case of some key pieces of equipment. New 
products and new varieties under research and development shall 
increase from the current 100,000 to 300,000. About 40 percent 
of the products shall be as good as their foreign counterparts 
in the late 1980's and early 1990's in terms of quality. S&amp;T 
progress shall account for 40 to 50 percent of the increase in 
the gross output value of the light and textile industries. 
  The major tasks of the S&amp;T of the light and textile 
industries during the Eighth Five-Year Plan are: 
  Improve the overall standard of light industrial and textile 
products. Develop die design, manufacturing, decorating, and 
packaging technologies common to both light and textile 
industries. 
  -- Develop new technology and new equipment for the salt, 
paper making, and ceramics industries. 
  -- Develop large-scale production technology for the 
chemical 
fiber raw materials industry. Improve post-printing fabric 
processing and surface finishing technology and the standard of 
cotton spinning equipment. 
  -- Study and popularize the use of electronic technology in 
the design, processing, and testing stages of the production 
process in the light and textile industries. 
  7) High-Tech Research and High-Tech Industries 
  High-tech and high-tech industries will be our tower of 
strength as we compete globally in the 21st century. China must 
develop its own high-tech and high-tech industries, vastly raise 
its labor productivity, and find its place in the international 
high-tech field. 
  The development goals of high-tech and high-tech industries 
in China in the next 10 years are: 
  In some high-tech areas where China has an edge, it shall 
keep up with developments in the world, make significant 
advances in the major technologies, step up applied research and 
engineering development, and diffuse high-tech achievements to 
form high-tech industries. High-tech research and 
industrialization shall be incorporated into the ``863'' 
high-tech national research plan as well as the plan to attack 
key technical problems and the ``Torch Plan,'' respectively. 
Concentrate on the development of electronic information, 
computers and computer software, communications, biotechnology, 
automation, new-generation energy sources and new materials, 
superconductivity, laser, and other high-technologies. 
  -- Biotechnology. Score new breakthroughs on three levels: 
keeping up with high-tech developments, applied research, and 
the establishment of a high-tech industry. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, the industry shall provide technical support for 
new developments in traditional industries like agriculture, 
medicine, and light and textile industries. Continue to research 
hybrid rice and popularize it on a large scale to boost output 
10 to 15 percent. Study new resistant strains of wheat, rice, 
and other major grains. Cut back on the use of pesticides 
significantly while ensuring increases in grain output. Launch 
gene-mapping plant research and make every effort to score 
research successes. Protein engineering: Keep up with 
international developments in protein structural evaluation, 
molecular design, and orientation transformation; develop one to 
two kinds of genetically engineered vaccines and new drugs and 
develop the capacity to export them. Launch 12 to 13 high-tech 
products with major economic and social benefits and put them on 
the market, gradually giving rise to the industry of 
biotechnology. 
  -- Microelectronics. The emphasis here is on silicon. During 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan, integrated circuitry shall be 
upgraded from the current 3 microns to 0.5 microns, production 
technology from the present 5 microns to 0.8 microns. Intensify 
research on gallium-arsenide large-scale integrated circuitry 
and master the production technology of small and medium-sized 
gallium arsenide integrated circuits. By the year 2000, 60 
percent of the domestic demand for large-scale integrated 
circuits shall be met by Chinese products. The R&amp;D of special 
equipment, testing instruments, and special materials shall also 
be a priority if we are to build a microelectronics industry 
that is rooted in China and has a capacity for self-development. 
  -- Photoelectronics technology. Develop a range of new 
electronic instruments and systems integrated technology to be 
used in remote sensing, calculation, and communications. Focus 
on the development of high-fiber-optical communications and 
optical calculation systems target products. Seek breakthroughs 
in the R&amp;D of key parts and components and in unit 
technology. 
  -- Space applied technology. Launch research on information 
acquisition and real-time signal processing technology revolving 
around space-to-ground observation and the monitoring of aerial 
targets. Conduct research on space materials and life sciences 
in conjunction with the development application of space 
microgravity. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we should focus 
on the R&amp;D of satellite-carried synthetic aperture radar, 
imaging spectroscope, and other new remote sensors. Make 
breakthroughs in the real-time satellite-to-ground transmission 
and processing technology of remotely sensed dynamic images and 
information as well as the applied technology of global spatial 
orientation systems. 
  -- Computer technology. The major missions are to build up 
China's own computer industry and increase the computer 
industry's share of the GNP from 3 to 4 percent and the market 
share of Chinese-made computers from the present 60 to 80 
percent. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we must make 
breakthroughs in the production technology of top-of-the-line 
microcomputers, work station systems, 32-bit minicomputer, large 
computer systems (the fourth generation), and key peripherals. 
Research and develop a computer system that behaves with basic 
intelligence and is geared toward intelligent applications. 
  -- Software technology. Concentrate on intelligent software 
development methods and tools. Create a software engineering 
development environment. Make breakthroughs in automated 
technology for software products production. Introduce a series 
of self-copyrighted software products and gradually form a 
software industry. 
  -- Communications technology. Press ahead in the direction 
of 
digitization, Use advanced communications technology to 
transform existing communications networks and monitor 
developments in communications technology in the world. During 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan, concentrate on the research of DS5 
fiber optic communications system, establish the experimental 
phase of DS5 fiber optic cable communications system, and 
conduct research on the 900 megahertz digital moving 
communications system. Make breakthroughs in the ATM technology 
of integrated wide-band digital network, satellite 
communication, digital microwave, block exchange, and fiber 
optical communications technology, and high-compressibility 
information sources processing technology. 
  -- Automation technology. We shall be geared toward 
application and go about working on four levels--tracking 
research, tackling difficult technical problems, developing 
target products, and applied engineering. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, a CIMS experimenting and research center is to 
be set up, along with seven unit laboratories. Four CIMS applied 
factories are to be designed and built and a host of target 
products involving key technologies are to be developed. The 
robot demonstration and experimentation assembly line is to be 
completed. Research and develop five types of robots: a 
remote-controlled mobile working robot for use in the nuclear 
power industry, a wall-climbing inspection robot, a robot which 
can work under adverse conditions, an underwater wireless robot, 
and a robot fitted with precision instruments. 
  -- A new generation of energy sources. Complete the design 
of 
the 10,000-kW coal-fired MHD-steam combined cycle intermediate 
demonstration power plant and the construction of some of the 
facilities. Complete the design of 60,000-kW experimental fast 
breeder reactor and the first-phase of construction. Complete in 
part the construction of 10,000-kW high-temperature gas-cooled 
reactor. Complete the preliminary design of the hybrid reactor. 
  -- New materials technology. Focus on applied research and 
industrialization. Keep up with the technology of a new 
generation of materials and innovate on it. Develop a host of 
essential materials for national defense build-up, high-tech 
development, and the technological transformation of traditional 
industries, and create a new materials industry. By the year 
2000 the annual output value of China's new materials industry 
should reach 30 billion yuan. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, 
we should concentrate on the development of electronic 
information materials, high-performance compound materials, new 
metallic materials, new high-polymer materials, superconducting 
materials, new ceramic materials, and biological functional 
materials. Establish about 20 development and testing bases for 
new material engineering and technology. 
  -- Superconducting technology. The emphasis here is on the 
research of practical and mature technology for high-temperature 
superconducting materials, high-temperature superconducting 
films, and high-temperature superconducting devices, going all 
out to make substantive breakthroughs. Also, explore the 
practical applications of low-temperature superconductivity. 
  -- Laser technology. The emphasis here is to conduct 
research 
on laser processing, laser testing, and new high-power laser 
devices. Develop a flexible laser processing system as well as 
laser devices and equipment for use in medicine so as to create 
a new laser industry. 
  8) High-Tech and New Tech Industrial Development Zones 
  The establishment of high-tech and new-tech industrial 
development zones is an essential part of China's strategy to 
develop high and new-tech industries. It will have enormous 
significance for converting high-tech achievements into direct 
productive forces without delay, speeding up the transition of 
China's high-tech industries, accelerating he transformation of 
traditional industries, enhancing the standing and 
competitiveness of Chinese commodities on the world market, and 
spurring economic, social, and S&amp;T developments in China. 
  The goals of high and new-tech development zones and their 
major tasks in the next decade are: 
  -- Commercialize, industrialize, and internationalize 
high-tech achievements. Launch a host of ``Torch Plan'' 
projects, of which 70 percent will be manufactured on a large 
scale and 30 percent will be exported to earn foreign exchange. 
Build a number of large-scale modern enterprises and enterprise 
groups each with hundreds of millions of yuan worth of output to 
take part in international competition. 
  -- The development zones will become bases of high-tech 
industries, from which the transformation of traditional 
industries using high-tech will spread far and wide; they will 
become the laboratories of the drive to deepen S&amp;T reform and 
the windows to the world. 
  -- Support and encourage S&amp;T personnel from scientific 
research organizations, colleges and universities, and large and 
mid-sized enterprises to enter development zones to found high- 
and new-tech enterprises of all forms and shapes, dominated by 
collective ownership. Nurture a host of S&amp;T entrepreneurs who 
are professionally skilled but also adept at management. 
  -- Develop high-tech industries, focusing primarily on 
electronic information, biotechnology, new materials, space and 
aviation, new energy sources and high-efficiency 
fuel-conservation, ecological science, oceanic engineering, 
laser technology, biomedical engineering, and radiation 
technology. Develop the various development zones selectively. 
  -- Develop high-tech industries, with the enterprises 
adopting an operating mechanism that gives them decision-making 
authority in their operations but requires them to be 
responsible for their own profits and losses and to achieve 
self-development and self-discipline. 
  9) Development of Enterprise Technology 
  Enterprises are the key players in the national economy, the 
meeting point between S&amp;T and the economy. The development of 
technology by enterprises and the application of the 
achievements are the fountainhead of enterprise progress. 
  The tasks of enterprise technological development in the 
next 
10 years are: 
  -- The development of basic products and their advanced 
technology. Focus on basic mechanical devices, electric parts, 
moulds, and related raw materials. Expedite the drive to improve 
the technical performance of finished industrial products and 
quicken their turnover. 
  -- Development of product design technology. The priorities 
are to develop design technology for advanced products, master 
CAD, and work hard to use it in conjunction with CAM in order to 
enhance China's capacity for industrial product design and 
development. 
  -- Development of key production technology and testing 
technology. Revolving around energy conservation, consumption 
reduction, and product quality improvement, we shall work to 
enhance the efficiency of modern enterprise management and 
overall enterprise quality. 
  During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, 251 large and mid-sized 
mainstay enterprises from among all industrial and 
transportation enterprises in the nation are to be selected for 
technological transformation, depending on the direction of 
product mix adjustment and industrial structure adjustment and 
the requirements of enterprise S&amp;T progress. The products of 
these enterprises should reach advanced world standards, thus 
working their way into the ranks of the best in the world and 
becoming the main force to compete with their international 
counterparts in the same industry. Seventeen good-quality 
products should be developed; they shall be widely used, boast 
advanced technical performance, be strongly competitive, and 
enjoy an international reputation. They shall change the look of 
industrial production in China notably. Select 20 pieces of key 
technology that are advanced, practical and commonly used for 
dissemination in enterprise technological transformation so as 
to raise to a new level the equipment and materials used in 
traditional industries. 
  10) Social Development 
  A rapidly growing population, relative resource shortages, 
and a deteriorating ecological environment are exerting 
tremendous pressure on China socially and economically. 
  The S&amp;T goals of social development in China in the next 
decade are: 
  Through R&amp;D, we must come up with a host of S&amp;T 
achievements 
to control population growth, improve the quality and health of 
the people, develop and utilize resources properly, protect the 
ecology, and prevent natural disasters. That way the state of 
society would be improved. 
  To achieve the above mentioned objectives, the S&amp;T work 
of 
social development will tackle the following major tasks in the 
next 10 years, including the implementation of the ``Man and 
Nature Research Project:'' 
  -- Population. Focus on population control technology. 
Develop advanced S&amp;T to improve the quality of the 
population. 
During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we shall concentrate on 
improving the existing birth control technologies and developing 
new birth control devices and drugs. Step up research on 
eugenics and good parenting. Put together the rudiments of a 
computer information system on demographic statistics and 
demographic trends management. 
  -- Medicine and public health. Step up research on the 
prevention and treatment of malignant tumors, heart diseases, 
brain diseases, vascular diseases, major infectious diseases, 
endemic diseases, and occupational diseases, using both Chinese 
medicine and Western medicine. Intensify clinical studies on 
Chinese medicine and herbal medicine as well as research on new 
drugs and new medical equipment and devices. 
  -- Geological prospecting. Work out a number of key 
technological problems relating to the search for mineral 
deposits. During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we must concentrate 
on the prospecting and assessment of mineral resources that are 
in short supply. Prospect and conduct studies on large mineral 
bases in Xinjiang with their precious and non-ferrous metals to 
provide a resource basis for the establishment of large mineral 
bases. 
  -- Water resources. Establish a water resources management 
science and take the first steps toward ameliorating the water 
shortage problem in northern China and leading cities. During 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan, we must put forward a strategic plan 
to harness the Huang He and Chang Jiang and develop their 
basins. Select areas to experiment with rapid river harnessing. 
Put forward a water resources supply-demand analysis and an 
optimal regulation plan and formulate management methods. 
  -- Oceanic development. Launch research on the quantitative 
forecasting of disastrous maritime environments and key 
technologies for the coastal environment. Select the continental 
shelf and certain sensitive areas in the exclusive economic zone 
for experiments in comprehensive prospecting and resource 
assessment. Acquire a clear knowledge of the natural 
environmental elements in Chinese islands and surrounding 
waters. Propose a comprehensive development and utilization plan. 
  -- Environmental protection and the prevention of natural 
disasters. Concentrate on the prevention and treatment of 
urban-rural environmental pollution and the prevention of major 
natural disasters. Provide S&amp;T guarantee for the protection 
of 
all ecological systems and nature preserves and soil and land 
restoration and improvement. Pay attention to and step up 
research on global environmental problems. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, we shall give priority to the research on 
technology to prevent disastrous climatic conditions, 
earthquakes, and geological disasters as well as research on 
urban disaster reduction. 
  -- Social public security. Step up research on technology to 
prevent law and order disasters and new technology to 
investigate and manage such disasters. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, concentrate on research on public order 
protective technology, intelligence-gathering technology, and 
material evidence identification technology. 
  -- Use of electronics in tertiary industry. Gradually set up 
an information network for the tertiary industry. Speed up 
computerization of banking, finance, and tax collection. 
Research and develop commercial commodity circulation technology 
and equipment. 
  -- Comprehensive experiments and pilot projects in social 
development. Work hard to set up about 30 testing sites during 
the Eighth Five-Year Plan and replicate them across the nation 
to enable S&amp;T to guide steady social development. 
  11) Basic Research 
  Basic research is the back-up force for both S&amp;T 
development 
and social development. It is the precursor and fountainhead of 
new tech and new inventions, the cradle of qualified personnel. 
  The goals of basic research in the next 10 years are: Launch 
multi-disciplinary comprehensive studies closely revolving 
around the strategic focuses of national economic 
development--agriculture, energy, materials, and 
information--and such major issues as population, medicine, 
resources, the ecology, and natural disasters. Provide the 
theoretical foundation and technical base for problem-solving 
and produce a host of major achievements that meet advanced 
world standards. 
  -- Nurture scientists who are highly accomplished 
academically and have significant influence on the international 
scientific community. Gradually form a corps of basic 
researchers with a balanced mix. It should be headed by 
outstanding young and middle-aged academic leaders. 
  -- Take solid steps to make a success out of key national 
laboratories and research institutes and centers that conduct 
basic research, gradually forming a number of integrated 
scientific research centers. Create an environment conducive to 
basic research. Create a new system favorable to mobility, 
cooperation, and competition. 
  The main substance and direction of basic research during 
the 
Eight Five-Year Plan: 
  -- Continue to support free project selection by scientists, 
keeping the total at about 20,000. 
  -- Building on the achievements of free selection of 
research 
topics by scientists, we should select 200-300 major topics in 
basic research in basic disciplines and applied basic 
disciplines that impact national economic and social development 
significantly and promise to have widespread applications. 
  For cutting-edge disciplines in which major breakthroughs 
are 
expected within this century and where China has an edge and is 
a leader in the world, and for major basic research which has 
important future applications and can put to use China's 
geographical and resource advantages, the state will treat them 
individually as separate major research projects. 
  12) Military S&amp;T [omitted in original] 
  13) Qualified S&amp;T Personnel 
  Qualified personnel are a prerequisite for the development 
of 
S&amp;T and economic revitalization. The acceleration of the 
build-up of a S&amp;T corps for China must be a top priority in 
national development. 
  The goals and missions in the next decade are: Steadily 
increase the size of the S&amp;T corps. Rationalize its structure 
and levels. Raise the level of scientific research notably. 
Nurture and develop an outstanding S&amp;T corps that meets the 
requirements of the four modernizations and can compete globally 
at a S&amp;T level: 
  -- Over time we should aim to achieve national 
self-sufficiency as far as the training of high-level S&amp;T 
personnel is concerned by working hard to put together several 
successful mainstay institutions of higher education. 
Institutions of higher education are the bases for training 
S&amp;T 
personnel. Also important as an incubator of S&amp;T personnel 
are 
scientific research institutions and large enterprises above the 
provincial, autonomous regional, and municipal levels. Economic 
development, scientific research, technical development, and the 
development of qualified personnel must be organically 
integrated. 
  Make the most of institutions of higher education. Identify 
a 
number of colleges and universities for special assistance, 
building them up as both educational centers and scientific 
research centers which can turn out high-level S&amp;T personnel 
even as they help solve major national S&amp;T problems. 
  Put key national laboratories and open departmental 
laboratories to the best possible use by conducting basic 
research and high-tech research there and turning out 
academically accomplished S&amp;T personnel. 
  Attach importance to the role senior experts in the 
industrial sector can play in training application-oriented 
high-level personnel. Conduct pilot programs in which 
institutions of higher education train graduate students jointly 
with large enterprises and scientific research institutions. 
Insist that people on the job be allowed to pursue an academic 
degree. Gradually expand part-time graduate programs for working 
people. Intensify continuing education for S&amp;T personnel. 
  -- Reform higher education. Turn out the necessary personnel 
schooled in basic disciplines and a substantial number of 
managerial experts. All specialties at the undergraduate level 
shall emphasize developing their students' comprehensive 
analytical abilities and practical problem-solving skills and 
enhance their graduates' adaptability to future work. Vocational 
education must highlight theoretical and practical training and 
intensify the development of practical abilities. 
  -- Make the most of S&amp;T personnel. Leaders at all levels 
should be adept at identifying talent and utilizing it, tapping 
qualified personnel in a variety of ways. Create an environment 
that helps young S&amp;T personnel demonstrate their talents. 
Solve 
the problem of talent under-utilization both institutionally and 
mechanically by changing the system and mechanism gradually. 
  Intensify ideological and political work aimed at S&amp;T 
personnel. Encourage them to work hard to scale new heights and 
make even greater contributions to the modernization of the 
nation. 
  -- Take practical steps to improve the working conditions of 
S&amp;T personnel and to raise their pay. During the Eighth 
Five-Year Plan, the wage level of S&amp;T personnel must 
basically 
be on a par with that of similar personnel in enterprises owned 
by the people. Subsidies should be paid at regular intervals to 
10,000 experts who have made important contributions. As far as 
S&amp;T personnel who undertake national scientific tasks are 
concerned, the state shall offer them a subsidy tied to their 
positions. Preferential remuneration should be paid to S&amp;T 
personnel working in the countryside, in remote border areas, 
underground, in the field, or under hazardous conditions. 
Research institutions making a profit should link their total 
payroll to the size of their profits. 
  Abolish the life tenure of technical positions and establish 
a regular promotion system so that more outstanding personnel 
have a chance to demonstrate their talents. 
  Priority should be given to solving the housing problems of 
young and middle-aged S&amp;T personnel who have made outstanding 
contributions, people who have returned to China upon completing 
their studies overseas, and senior S&amp;T personnel. Housing 
construction for scientific research units and institutions of 
higher education shall be one of the top recipients of capital 
construction investments during the Eighth Five-Year Plan and 
will be given funding priority. 
  14) Soft Science Research 
  A new area in modern S&amp;T development, soft science has 
become 
an important component of China's S&amp;T enterprise. Developing 
soft science research is a reliable guarantee that policy-making 
will become scientific and democratic. 
  The principal goals of soft science research in China in the 
next 10 years are: 
  -- Conduct multi-discipline multi-level comprehensive 
research by revolving closely around the major policy matters 
relating to the use of S&amp;T to promote economic and social 
development. Put forward problem-solving plans, measures, and 
policies. 
  -- Use modern scientific theories, methods, and tools to 
track soft science developments in certain fields overseas. Work 
hard to obtain a number of major breakthroughs. Train a host of 
soft science researchers who wield international influence. 
Raise soft science research to a new level. 
  -- Establish and perfect a soft science research network and 
foster the development of an S&amp;T consulting industry into an 
important industry in the tertiary sector by making full use of 
present human and material resources and taking proper measures. 
  The major missions of soft science research during the 
Eighth 
Five-Year Plan are: 
  -- Conduct research on long- and medium-range S&amp;T 
development 
strategy, major S&amp;T policies, S&amp;T areas slated for 
priority 
development, international development trends, and China's 
response in order to provide a scientific basis for national 
macro policy-making. 
  -- Formulate a medium- and long-range S&amp;T reform plan 
for the 
nation, including the goals, missions, and direction for each 
stage. Explore ways of combining S&amp;T planned management with 
market regulation and the forms such a union can take. 
  -- Study and assess the way in which major economic and 
S&amp;T 
policies, whether national, departmental, or local, have been 
implemented. Set up a system of assessment, a body of criteria, 
an assessment model, and methods of assessment. 
  -- Continue research on the theories and methods of soft 
science. Expedite the development and application of soft 
science. 
<H5>  3. Basic Goals and Major Tasks of Deepening S&amp;T Reform </H5>
  In the spirit of the ``Decision of the CPC Central Committee 
on S&amp;T Reform,'' S&amp;T reform in the 1980's has scored 
striking 
successes, tentatively creating a new operating mechanism that 
combines S&amp;T with the economy. The self-development capacity 
of 
S&amp;T work as well as its ability to serve economic development 
has been enhanced. The organizational framework of a 
multi-player, multi-form, and multi-function system dominated by 
public ownership but featuring a multitude of coexisting 
ownership systems is now in place. The S&amp;T personnel 
management 
system is off to a good start. S&amp;T work is set to develop in 
depth. Be that as it may, whatever reform that has been 
introduced has not fundamentally replaced the traditional 
system, so reform must be deepened by building on and improving 
the existing policies and measures. Every effort should be made 
to tentatively put together a new system favorable to economic 
development and S&amp;T progress by the end of this century, spur 
S&amp;T work to serve the planned commodity economy even better, 
shift economic development onto a new course of relying on 
S&amp;T 
progress and improving the workers' caliber, and further tap and 
liberate the foremost productive forces, S&amp;T. 
  The major tasks of deepening S&amp;T reform are: 
  1) Reform Planned Management and Strengthen the Market 
Regulatory Mechanism. 
  Major S&amp;T tasks that have an impact on the nation's 
economy 
and people's livelihood shall be organized and put together by 
government departments in accordance with the plan. In addition, 
introduce the competitive mechanism and abide by the law of 
value. As for the many S&amp;T projects under way all over China 
that are highly volatile and opportunistic, we should let the 
market regulate them on its own, while stepping up planned 
guidance and macro-management at the same time to make the most 
of the integration between the two. 
  -- Improve planned management and gradually reduce the reach 
of command planning while and broadening the scope of guidance 
planning. End fragmentation over time. Introduce the bidding 
system, the contract system, the responsibility system, and 
other project management tools. 
  -- Implement the policy of ``decontrol, vitalize, nurture, 
and guide.'' Open up the market vigorously. Formulate technical 
market management regulations and set up technical market 
management organs at all levels. Establish market support 
systems such as those for funds, materials, qualified personnel, 
and information that are suited to the market economy. Stimulate 
and develop the rural economy. Stimulate and develop the rural 
technical market even as we continue to develop the urban 
technical market. Make use of large and mid-sized enterprises 
and enterprise groups in a dual capacity, as recipients and 
users of technology and as developers and disseminators of 
technology. Successfully organize large nation-wide technical 
trade fairs, which can be comprehensive or specialized, at 
regular intervals and at permanent sites. Step up foreign trade 
in technology and open wider the window to foreign export trade. 
Go all out to increase foreign technology trade to 15 billion 
yuan by the latter half of the Eighth Five-Year Plan and 30 
billion yuan by the end of the century. 
  2) Reform of Scientific Research Institutions 
  By deepening the reform of the operating mechanism and 
searching for a new management system, we shall press ahead with 
the organizational adjustment of S&amp;T institutions during the 
Eighth Five-Year Plan, gradually forming a vital research force, 
small in size but energetic and well trained. 
  -- Deepen the reform of the funding system. Scientific 
research organs oriented to the development of technology: cuts 
in operating expenses funding for these organizations in 1991 
were about right. We should keep their institutional nature 
while continuing to guide and support their change in mode in a 
variety of ways. Social or public-interest-oriented social 
research organizations: Here the unitary funding system should 
be put to an end. Depending on the nature of their research and 
the extent to which their research achievements are 
commercialized, they should introduce the fund system and 
contract system. The government should increase assistance to 
them and encourage them to generate income diligently. As for 
basic research, we should continue to improve and strengthen the 
science foundation system. At the same time the government 
should select a number of major projects based on the 
requirements of long-term national economic development and 
organize their implementation directly by command. 
  -- Push on with the structural adjustment of S&amp;T 
organizations. Independent scientific research organizations 
owned by the whole people and oriented toward technological 
development should move in the direction of integrating 
scientific research with production and business under one roof, 
bringing about the union between S&amp;T and the economy in 
multiple 
ways. Public-interest oriented scientific research organizations 
should reorganize and streamline themselves in the midst of 
competition, networking with one another and socializing their 
functions. Basic research organs should take advantage of the 
strengths of institutions of higher education and the Chinese 
Academy of Science and gradually build up a high-standard 
research force. The development of private S&amp;T organizations 
should be nurtured and guided. Formulate and implement 
management regulations for private S&amp;T organizations. 
Stabilize 
and strengthen a policy of fostering them to develop them into a 
useful supplement to and organic part of the S&amp;T enterprise 
in 
China. Encourage and support individuals to set up scientific 
research organs and S&amp;T enterprises be they wholly funded 
undertakings, joint ventures, or cooperative ventures, either at 
home or overseas. 
  Select a number of key national scientific research 
organizations from among all types of scientific research 
organizations for extra assistance. To be selected, the 
organizations must go through a rigorous screening, using 
contribution to society as the criterion. 
  -- Reform the management system of scientific research 
organizations. Uphold and improve the institute (center) 
director responsibility system and technological 
development-oriented research organization contract 
responsibility system. Formulate appropriate implementation 
regulations. Support major research centers and institutes in 
exploring new management styles. Select a number of 
technological development-oriented scientific research 
organizations and S&amp;T enterprises (groups) to experiment with 
the shareholding system. Select basic research and public 
interest-oriented scientific research organizations to 
experiment with a management system featuring a board of 
directors or supervisors composed of unit leaders, leaders from 
the department in charge at the higher level, and authoritative 
figures from academe. 
  3) Promoting S&amp;T Progress in Enterprises 
  The priority mission here is to establish a mechanism 
whereby 
enterprises rely on S&amp;T progress and to enhance their 
ability to 
assimilate and develop technology. 
  -- Adopt policies and measures conducive to enterprises 
relying on S&amp;T progress. Establish a system of evaluation 
criteria to assess S&amp;T progress in enterprises in accordance 
with the characteristics of the industry in question and 
incorporate such a system into the enterprise contract 
management contract and director term-of-office objectives. Use 
a mix of economic, policy, legal, and the necessary 
administrative tools to reward the good performers and penalize 
the poor performers and expedite enterprise product turnover. 
  -- Accelerate the development of a S&amp;T progress 
assurance 
system within the enterprise. Large and mid-sized enterprises 
and enterprise groups must each put together a technical 
development organ by absorbing an independent scientific 
research institute or creating their own. Small and mid-sized 
enterprises and township and town enterprises should have their 
own sources of technological support. Popularize the 
engineer-in-chief technological responsibility system under the 
leadership of the factory director. 
  -- Step up the macro management of enterprise technological 
transformation. In accordance with the requirements of adjusting 
the national industrial structure and the product mix, and the 
industrial policy, the economic departments shall formulate a 
technological transformation plan and an annual plan in 
conjunction with the S&amp;T departments and carry out project 
verification and evaluation. 
  4) Deepen the Reform of Rural S&amp;T System 
  The core mission is to establish and perfect a coherent 
S&amp;T 
service system and S&amp;T management system revolving around the 
improvement and development of a dual-level operating system in 
the countryside combining centralization with separation, giving 
rise to a situation in which big S&amp;T supports big 
agriculture. 
  -- Develop a full S&amp;T service system. Encourage S&amp;T 
organs at 
the county level and below to develop into economic and 
technical entities bringing technology, agriculture, and trade 
under one roof and to play a leading role in rural S&amp;T work. 
Develop specialized technological associations and research 
societies in which peasants are the leading players and make the 
most of them as a link. Expedite the development of enterprises 
which enjoy an edge in technology, funding, materials, 
information, or market. Launch all kinds of economic and 
technical contract activities. Guide the development of 
contracting organizations in such a way that they form groups 
and become comprehensive and tangible entities. Adhere firmly to 
and improve the work of selecting the deputy county chief 
(mayor) for S&amp;T and deputy township (town) chief for S&amp;T. 
Perfect the rural S&amp;T management system. 
  -- Go all out to promote S&amp;T progress in township and 
town 
enterprises. Formulate a policy to encourage township and town 
enterprises to rely on S&amp;T progress. Step up technological 
guidance to such enterprises. Mobilize scientific research 
organizations and institutions of higher education and, in 
particular, large and mid-sized enterprises to provide them with 
a diverse range of services, including qualified personnel, 
technology, information, and products. Steer township and town 
enterprises onto the path of merger, cooperation, and 
specialization. Go for scale development and production. 
  5) Deepen the Reform of the Management System for S&amp;T 
Personnel 
  -- Step up macro regulation and control by the state over 
the 
distribution of S&amp;T qualified personnel. In accordance with 
the 
requirements of the adjustment of the state industrial 
structure, we should reinforce the S&amp;T forces in key 
industries 
and key projects through planned allocation and, with policies 
as a lever, support the development of small and mid-sized 
enterprises, township and town enterprises, and in the vast 
countryside. 
  -- Strengthen the market regulatory mechanism for S&amp;T 
qualified personnel management. Reform the S&amp;T personnel 
appointment system. Enterprises and institutional units should 
gradually introduce the appointment contract system. Safeguard 
the hiring freedom of enterprises and the job-selection freedom 
of individuals. Open up a market for qualified personnel. 
Gradually develop a qualified personnel movement service system 
centered upon intermediate organizations and a social security 
system at the heart of which is unemployment insurance. 
Formulate and improve regulations pertaining to the appointment 
contract system, resignation, dismissal, unemployment insurance, 
part-time employment, unpaid leave of absence, and the 
management of a record system on the floating population. 
  6) Intensify the Development of a Macro Regulation and 
Control System for S&amp;T Progress 
  -- Government at all levels must give top priority to 
S&amp;T 
work as part of the economic development strategy. Step up 
leadership and support in earnest. Formulate a uniform S&amp;T 
development strategy, policies, principles, and plans, and 
toughen the regulatory and control tools of S&amp;T departments 
in 
charge. Establish a system of indicators to measure S&amp;T 
progress 
in the national economy and throughout society and a 
corresponding supervision and assurance system. Accelerate the 
transition of economic development to reliance on S&amp;T. 
  -- Launch comprehensive pilot projects in S&amp;T reform. 
Introduce comprehensive coordinated reforms in the shareholding 
system, personnel system, wage system, housing system, and 
social security system in national high-tech and new-tech 
industrial development zones. Hammer out a new operating 
mechanism, organizational structure, and management method. 
Explore new ways to vigorously integrate planning with the 
market, reform with development, in order to provide the 
deepening of S&amp;T reform nationwide with successful examples. 
  -- Step up S&amp;T law-making. Enforce even more thoroughly 
the 
laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to S&amp;T and the 
economy. 
Do a good job in related work. Establish sound technical 
contract arbitration bodies. Waste no time in formulating laws, 
rules, and regulations, including ``S&amp;T Progress Law,'' 
``S&amp;T 
Reward Law,'' and ``Law for Research Institutes.'' Go all out to 
establish a fairly complete S&amp;T legal system by the year 
2000. 
<H5>  4. Adhere to the Open Policy and Reform. Vigorously Promote </H5>
International S&amp;T Cooperation 
  The reform and open policy of the party and the state have 
created the right conditions for absorbing advanced foreign 
technology extensively and exporting China's own superior 
technology and a favorable climate for technology transfer by 
other nations to China and cooperation and exchange. In a 
rapidly developing and changing world, the full utilization of 
every favorable condition to promote international S&amp;T 
cooperation and exchange vigorously should be an important 
long-term policy for the development of S&amp;T in China. 
  S&amp;T cooperation with foreign nations should serve 
economic 
and social development and S&amp;T progress. We should go about 
promoting such cooperation through multiple channels in a 
variety of ways based on the nation's S&amp;T development 
strategy 
and development plans. 
  1) Launch International S&amp;T Cooperation Across the Board 
Based on Needs and Possibilities 
  Even as we promote and perfect inter-governmental S&amp;T 
cooperation, we should expand the scope and scale of private 
S&amp;T 
cooperation by increasing the exchanges between enterprises, 
scientific research institutions, institutions of higher 
education, and private S&amp;T organizations, on the one hand, 
and 
foreign nations, on the other, and by encouraging interactions 
among scientists and entrepreneurs. There is more to 
international S&amp;T cooperation than bilateral cooperation, 
however; we should also fully utilize international 
organizations to carry out multilateral cooperation. Even as we 
widen S&amp;T interaction with developed nations, we should take 
care to strengthen and develop S&amp;T cooperation with 
developing 
nations. 
  Select a number of S&amp;T fields where China desperately 
has to 
gain an edge or already has an edge and participate in 
large-scale international S&amp;T research projects in those 
fields. 
Work out an international S&amp;T cooperation plan in the light 
of 
the projects set forth in the S&amp;T plans of all types at home. 
After doing studies, we should then enter into joint research, 
development, design, production, and information services with 
international S&amp;T institutions and international 
organizations 
selectively and purposefully. 
  2) Take Practical Steps To Absorb, Assimilate, and Improve 
Upon Imported Technology 
  The importation of technology must be coordinated with 
S&amp;T 
work at home and with technology trade. Give priority to the 
importation of software and key production technology. Do a good 
job in balancing technology, funds, equipment, management, 
qualified personnel, and the market. 
  Formulate laws and regulations on technological importation. 
Step up macro regulation and control and management to prevent 
unplanned and fragmented importation as well as duplication. 
Take practical steps to do a good job in the absorption and 
assimilation of technology. Explore new channels to find the 
funds needed to assimilate and improve upon imported technology. 
Make sure that scientific research organizations are involved in 
the entire process of importing, absorbing, assimilating, 
developing, and innovating upon technology. 
  Formulate laws and regulations to regulate technological 
exports. Tap the international technical market diligently. 
Develop an international cooperation medium bringing together 
technology and the economy and technology and trade. Make the 
most of high-tech and new-tech development zones. Attract 
foreign technology, funds, and qualified personnel to come to 
China to set up scientific research organizations or 
S&amp;T-oriented enterprises, including wholly foreign-funded 
concerns, joint ventures, or cooperative ventures. 
  3) Continue to Formulate and Perfect Policies Relating to 
the 
Promotion of the Foreign Contacts of S&amp;T Personnel, Academic 
Exchanges, and the Export of Intelligence 
  Create a liberal international S&amp;T cooperation 
environment. 
Allow more S&amp;T personnel to come in touch with the world 
directly and indirectly and orient themselves to the world. Make 
things easier for &amp;T personnel who want to attend 
international 
conferences, go overseas on an academic visit or as a visiting 
researcher, take a concurrent position overseas, or work in an 
international organization. We must work hard to host more 
international conferences in China and steer them to a wider 
spread of cities to energize the local academic world and enable 
even more S&amp;T personnel to take part in international 
academic 
activities. 
  Actively create the conditions to woo outstanding Chinese 
S&amp;T 
personnel overseas to return home to work. Invite foreign 
experts to come to China to engage in scientific research and 
teach or as production, business, or management advisers and 
consultants. 
  4) Create Conditions Favorable to International S&amp;T 
Cooperation 
  Intensify the collection and exchange of domestic and 
foreign 
S&amp;T information. Launch research on the state of S&amp;T in 
the 
various nations as well as their S&amp;T policies. Work out a 
S&amp;T 
cooperation strategy and policy with a country, bearing in mind 
its characteristics and strengths in different fields of S&amp;T. 
Open up new funding channels for foreign S&amp;T cooperation. 
Raise 
funds at home and abroad in multiple ways to give the necessary 
support to international S&amp;T cooperation. 
<H5>  5. Conditions and Measures of Support </H5>
  1) Increase S&amp;T Input To ensure the implementation of 
this 
``outline,'' the entire society must increase investment in 
S&amp;T, 
forming a funding triumvirate: state grants, funds raised by 
enterprises on their own, and loans from financial institutions. 
Work hard to attract private and overseas funds and establish a 
multi-level and multi-channel S&amp;T investment system. 
  In the next decade, S&amp;T investment must grow at a 
higher rate 
than the GNP so that R&amp;D spending in China will account for 
1.35 
percent of the GNP in the year 2000, about the same level as the 
middle-range developed nations, up from the 0.7 percent or so in 
1990. 
  -- The central government and local governments at all 
levels 
should take practical and effective steps to ensure that 
government spending on S&amp;T increase faster than both revenue 
and 
the GNP. Gradually adjust the share of the government budget 
that goes to S&amp;T. 
  Allocate S&amp;T spending rationally. Adjust the 
distribution of 
funds among basic research, applied research, high-tech 
research, and R&amp;D gradually so that over time an appropriate 
ratio is achieved. Increase the investment in intermediate 
testing and industrialization. 
  Increase investment in basic research. Continue to support 
basic research by allocating funds to defray its operating 
expenses, making grants to finance special projects, and through 
other channels. By the end of this century, spending on basic 
research should account for over 10 percent of the total R&amp;D 
budget. 
  Increase and protect investment in the national high-tech 
research development program (``863'' plan) and the plan to 
tackle key S&amp;T problems. Increase spending on recurrent 
operating expenses gradually. Intensify investment in the 
projects of industrial departments and major research 
institutions. Tap new funding sources to finance the 
modernization of equipment in scientific research units. Support 
industrial departments in building applied technology testing 
bases in order of priority. 
  Scientific research units are plagued by woefully obsolete 
facilities and equipment and insufficient investment in capital 
construction; these problems should be solved by increasing 
scientific research capital construction investment. Set aside a 
specified portion of the departmental capital construction 
investment budget as production-oriented capital construction 
investment. Allocate money, the amount of which should be 
increased over the years, for that purpose on a priority basis. 
Gradually expand the scale of capital construction investment in 
high-tech industrial development zones to speed up their 
development. Within 10 years high-tech industrial development 
zones shall have been created and operating on a fairly large 
scale. 
  Gradually increase the amount of foreign exchange allocated 
to import apparatus, equipment, technology, books, and other 
materials for use in scientific research. 
  -- Adjust the mix of loans. Increase the scale of S&amp;T 
lending 
by a wide margin. Take practical steps to end the funding 
shortages affecting the conversion of S&amp;T achievements into 
real 
productive forces. Promote the formation and development of 
high-tech industries. 
  -- Enterprises must increase S&amp;T development investment 
in 
earnest. Typically enterprises must set aside not less than 1 
percent of sales revenue, or 5 percent in the case of high-tech 
enterprises, to be used for technological development either 
within the enterprise itself or in the industry in question. In 
addition, an industrial (or departmental) S&amp;T development 
fund 
should be set up. 
  2) Improve S&amp;T Conditions 
  -- The build-up of the scientific research infrastructure. 
As 
part of the drive to promote in-depth S&amp;T development and 
deepen 
S&amp;T reform in the next decade, we must select, based on the 
requirements of the national economy and social development, a 
host of high-standard the scientific research institutes and 
institutions of higher education which have made major 
contributions for special support. Step up the build-up of 
scientific research infrastructure consisting of 
industry-oriented testing bases, engineering and technology 
research centers, and key national scientific laboratories, 
among other things. 
  During the Eighth Five-Year Plan, even as we continue to put 
the national industry-oriented testing bases on a sound footing, 
a host of national engineering and technical research centers 
must be set up in order of priority and in stages so as to make 
S&amp;T achievements more mature, more coordinated and more 
engineering-oriented. Strengthen the intermediate stages leading 
to the translation of S&amp;T achievements into productive 
forces. 
There will be 75 newly established key engineering laboratories, 
forming new S&amp;T bases for academic research and the training 
of 
qualified personnel. 
  Continue to improve the management of large-scale precision 
equipment. It should be distributed fairly. Promote the sharing 
and joint use of such equipment and increase the efficiency with 
which it is used. Give priority to the development of apparatus 
in common use in many areas. Increase the percentage of 
equipment made in China. 
  -- Ensuring the availability of S&amp;T materials. The 
three S&amp;T 
expenses and the materials required under the high-tech 
development plan should be itemized separately in the 
centralized material allocation and supply plan at both the 
national and the local levels. They should be made available on 
a priority basis. Develop new supply channels of materials on 
which there is a state monopoly of allocation and which are 
needed in scientific research, such as capital goods for the 
petrochemical and chemical industries and agriculture. 
  -- Strengthen and perfect the management and service system 
for raw materials, parts, components, chemical reagents, and 
special materials for use in scientific research. As for 
materials outside the plan needed for scientific research, 
materials departments and agricultural materials departments at 
all levels should make a great effort to secure their 
availability. 
  -- S&amp;T information assurance. Give priority to the 
establishment of a number of archives of Chinese documents and 
data bases, forming a national S&amp;T information on-line 
network 
based on data bases, resource centers, and service centers, 
which should cover all major cities in the nation and offer 
access to every major data base in the entire world. 
  Step up the gathering, processing, and reporting of 
information and intelligence needed for national S&amp;T and 
economic development. Intensify the tracking and study of S&amp;T 
achievements in the world. Complete a number of important 
information-gathering studies and reports to provide the 
information for scientific research and management policy-making. 
  3) Perfect the S&amp;T Finance and Taxation System -- 
Create a 
unified S&amp;T spending item in the government budget to ensure 
effective investment by the government in S&amp;T development. 
Enhance macro regulatory and control ability. 
  -- Financial and tax policies should continue to be biased 
in 
favor of the scientific research and technological development 
activities of scientific research units. Keep in place all 
existing financial and tax policies favorable to S&amp;T 
development. Scientific research units should continue to enjoy 
preferential tax treatment in such areas as technical income and 
incomes derived from new products and intermediate-testing 
products. 
  Encourage scientific research units to export technology and 
products and increase such exports. Gradually broaden the 
channels through which entities combining science with industry 
and trade can export their products. Foreign exchange derived 
from exports should continue to be retained in full by the 
scientific research unit concerned. Furthermore, a foreign 
exchange use target should be set. 
  Continue to offer scientific research units such 
preferential 
treatment as allowing them to import without paying tariffs or 
value-added-taxes apparatus and equipment needed in scientific 
research, parts and components necessary for repair and 
maintenance, and chemical reagents. 
  -- Formulate and perfect a financial policy that will spur 
S&amp;T progress in enterprises. Create a mechanism to encourage 
enterprises to increase S&amp;T investment.Funds spent by an 
enterprise on S&amp;T development may be counted as part of the 
total costs; alternately, the enterprise may be allowed to use 
the investment to offset its income tax payment in accordance 
with a set ratio. Introduce a policy that discriminates in favor 
of new products and against old. Apparatus and equipment used by 
an enterprise for S&amp;T development shall enjoy accelerated 
depreciation. 
  -- Formulate policies to promote integration between 
S&amp;T and 
banking. Create a S&amp;T risk investment mechanism for combining 
S&amp;T with banking. Actively nurture the establishment of 
S&amp;T-oriented financial institutions. Develop the leasing 
business in S&amp;T development. Gradually set up a socially 
conscious S&amp;T development guarantee body. Issue bonds and 
shares 
on a trial basis in high-tech and new tech development zones as 
a means of expanding the channels for the raising of short-term 
funds for high-tech development. 

